TRAITS OF THE PRAIRIES.
We
have wandered over the Louisiana prairies,
our little pony, like an adventurous bark, seemingly
trusting itself imprudently beyond the headlands, a
mere speck, moving among the luxuriant islands of
live oak that here and there sit so quietly upon the
rolling waves of vegetation. Myriads of wild geese
would often rise upon our intrusion, helping out the
fancy of being at sea; but the bounding deer, or
wild cattle, that occasionally resented our presence
and rattled off at break-neck pace, kept us firmly on
the land. In the spring seasons, the prairies are
covered with the choicest flowers, that mix with the
young grass in such profusion as to carpet them
more delicately, and more richly, than in the seraglio
of a sultan. Upon this vegetation innumerable
cattle feed and fatten, until they look pampered, and
their skins glisten like silk in the sun. Apparently
wild as the buffalo, they are all marked and
numbered
,
and in them consist the wealth of the
inhabitant
of the prairie. It is easy to imagine that
herdsmen
of such immense fields live a wild and free life;
ever on horseback, like the Arabs, they have no
fear save when out of the saddle, and nature has
kindly provided a steed that boasts of no
particular
blood, that may be called the yankee of his
kind, because it never tires, never loses its energy,
and makes a living and grows fat, where all else
of its species would starve.
The mustang pony, the invariable companion of
the inhabitant of the prairie, whether he is rich or
poor, is a little creature, apparently narrow-chested,
and small across the loins. Its head is not finely
formed or well set upon a straight neck. There is
a want of compactness about the figure, and a
looseness
about the muscles. The hind legs are long,
and form, from the hip to the hoof, a bend as regular
as a bow. It is not handsome, but it gives a spring
when under the saddle most delightful. The
mustang
is not subject to the ordinary evils of
horseflesh
.
Sparing in diet, a stranger to grain, easily
satisfied, whether on growing or dead grass, it seems
to be stubbed and twisted, tough and everlasting,
never poor or markedly fat; under all weathers and
seasons, it does an amount of work, with ease, that
turn all other horses, if they lived through it, into
broken down drudges. The eyes of the mustang
pony, however, tell you a tale; they are of a
witching
hazel, of curiously crimson-speckled blue, deep
and beautiful as a precious stone, and lighted up by
a bit of mischief that betrays the lurking devil within.
2
Such is the mustang pony, adapted to the prairie as
perfectly as its sunshine and flowers. Their riders
cherish the trappings for them that betray old Spain;
the saddle with its high pummel and crupper;
dangling
on either side are the enormous wooden
stirrups
,
looking like a huge pair of mallets; the whole
so disproportioned to the horse, that they appear to
be an overload of themselves. The bridle envelopes
the head as complicatedly as the bandages on a
broken arm, crossing and recrossing, filled with
side latches and throat latches, and holding a bit
that might be mistaken for some ancient machine of
torture; attached to which are levers so powerful,
that a slight jerk would snap off any thing in the
world but the under jaw of a mustang pony. Mounted
by a rider that is as much a part of him as his hide,
he goes rollicking ahead, with the eternal lope,
such as an amorous deer assumes when it moves
beside
its half galloping mate, a mixture of two or
three gaits, as easy as the motions of a cradle, and
in which may be traced some little of the stately
tramp of the Moorish Arabian, exhibited centuries
since upon the plains of the Alhambra, and pricked by
enormous spurs, that rattle with a tingling sound, of
which the mustang's sides, so far from resenting the
operation, seem to enjoy it as a dulled taste by
luxuries
requires mustard and cayenne.
The origin of the cattle of the prairies is lost in
obscurity; but the wide-spreading horn, the heavy
leg, and predominance of black and white, carries
the mind back to the times when old Spain sent her
colonies, with their rich possessions, under Pizarro
and Cortez, into the western world. Their ancestors,
in the troublesome times of early conquest, breaking
away from the restraint of their owners, in course
of centuries have multiplied and spread from the
Californias to the Gulf of Mexico. The wide
savannas, with their elevated boundaries of rich
dividing country of two great oceans, warmed by a
tropical sun, and cooled by the mountain breeze,
and covered by never-failing vegetation, have
multiplied
the cattle as the sands of the sea. Among
the
vacheries
of New Spain, they are killed for their
skins alone, their fat carcasses being left a prey to
the vulture and the wolf. Those that inhabit the
prairies of Attakappas and Opelousas are less
wastefully
disposed of, as their bodies find a quick sale,
to sustain the constantly increasing population that
concentrates at the mouth of the great valley of the
Mississippi.
In the warm month of June, commences the
annual herding of the cattle. At a place fixed upon
as the herding ground, a few horsemen will drive
together fifty thousand head; and when once grouped
together in a solid mass, from a peculiar instinct, a
whole troop of cavalry could not again scatter them
over the plain. It may readily be imagined that this
work is not accomplished without incidents and
accidents. In the excitement of the
drive
, horses
fall, or run headlong over slow-footed cows, bulls
stop to joust, enraged mothers plunge madly with
their horns, in pursuit of their calves. A sulky ox
refuses to move in the proper direction; off starts a
rider, who catching the stubborn animal by the tail,
it at once becomes frightened into a lope; advantage
is taken of the unwieldy body, as it rests upon the
fore feet, to jerk it to the ground; before the ox has
recovered from its astonishment, a hair rope has been
passed through his nose, secured to the mustang
pony's tail, and it is led along subdued by pain.
A stampede sometimes seizes the herd, and then,
with upturned heads and glaring eyes, the animals
rush along, making the earth tremble beneath their
feet. Then it is that feats of horsemanship are
performed
that would delight Bedouin Arabs. The
vacher
, armed with an ash stick, some seven feet in
length, pointed at the end by a small three-cornered
file, scours ahead of the flying cattle, thrusting his
rude weapon against their rumps, rolling them over
as suddenly on the prairie as if they were shot. Or
with a whip, with a handle of a few inches long, and
a heavy raw-hide thong of eight feet, will he lash
their recking sides, drawing blood from the flesh as
with a knife. Should the drove however move kindly,
as they start in the morning so they remain until night,
the same plodders in the rear, the same lordly
Andalusian
in the van. After the cattle have been at
the herding ground two or three days, their
respective
owners separate them and drive them off to
brand. Upon the hind quarter is pressed the hot
iron that marks ownership and servility. This is
known and numbered as the wealth of the
stock-raisers
of the prairies. The dowry of many a fair
bride is in cattle; the announcement of the birth of
a son or daughter gives rise to a gift, from some
kind uncle or doating aunt, to the new-comer, of
perhaps
a single white heifer. When the little one is
grown up, it finds in the sacredly-kept increase a fair
start in the world, from which may result a fortune.
Through the prairies meander no running streams,
yet the cattle have beautiful reservoirs of water to
slake their impatient thirst. The ponds of the
prairies call forth the admiration, their beauty being
even excelled by the simple and perfect contrivance
for their formation. The low and marshy spots of
the prairie offer to the heated hoofs of the herd a
cooling place for their feet; crowded in dense masses
upon these places, their continual stepping indents
the turf. The rains, attracted by the predisposition
to moisture, accumulate in these standing places,
mix with the earth, which is wrought into well
tempered
clay, and is in this form borne off upon the
hoofs of the cattle. As time rolls on, this constant
loss displays itself in the incipient basin:
deepening
by degrees, its bottom finally grows impervious
and a pond is made, and thus they are multiplied
indefinitely as demanded. Perfectly round and
shelving gently to the centre, they soon become
skirted with richer and more varied foliage than is
elsewhere to be met with. The melumbium rests
its huge leaves for a shade upon the surface of the
water, and rears its beautiful flowers in the air as
an ornament. The smaller water lilies spring up
upon the margins of the ponds; even the wild violet
is hidden away among the rank grass. Here resort
the plover, the wild goose, and duck, and the
delicately
plumed flamingo, that seems to have stolen
from the opening rose-bud its colour. The fruit of
2*
the melumbium fattens the feathered vagrants, and
the clear field that surrounds these choice feeding
places protects them from the wiles of the sportsman.
In the depths of these ponds, among the tangled
roots and grasses, sports the gormandizing trout, the
beautiful perch, and soft-shell terrapin, as innocent
of snares as if there were no anglers or aldermen
in the world.
But the greatest pride of the Louisiana prairie is
the live oak. In these beautiful wastes, the little
acorn, that views with the thimble of the fair hand in
size, swells into a vast world of itself. It would
seem incredible, but from the knowledge of
experience
,
that in so small a germ so much beauty and
strength could originate. The little rivulet that
gurgles down some gentle declivity, and is
obstructed
by the rolling stone, or falling limb of the
overhanging tree, turning into the proud swelling
river, bearing upon its surface the wealth of
commerce
,
and the rage of the driving storm, resembles
the oak, that from almost nothing becomes stately in
grandeur, and, unaffected, meets the rattling hail of
the cannon's mouth, and frowns defiance in the glare
of the lightning and the blasts of the hurricane.
The live oaks of the Louisiana prairie compare with
none but their own kindred which adorn the plains
that stretch away towards the tropics. In merry old
England, where the titled of the land, with a
reverence
that smacks of the superstitions of the Druid
priests, look upon their gnarled oaks as their
antiquities
,
and trace back their history with the same pride
they do their own exalted race, they would almost fall
down and worship, could they see these wonders
of the new world, that overtop their favourites as the
Jura does the Alps. Among them, there are none
touched with age, or promising in youth; they all
seem to be rejoicing in their prime, and to stand
forth terrible in their strength; yet their waving
branches rustle as delicately as the brachen, and the
evergreen leaves glisten in the sun, and at a
distance
from their delicacy appear like silken fringe.
Stand beside the mighty trunks!behold the huge
columns of iron gray, how hard they look, and well
adapted to sustain the huge forest above them in the
air!the gigantic limbs aspire to reach the horizon!
how they have gracefully bent and bowed in their
onward course, and tapered off, almost imperceptibly,
to little stems! In those limbs we see the broad swell
of the seventy-four, and the ribs for her sides.
What a world is above you in the noble confusion!
what a rich mellowed light plays in the vernal shades!
The lively squirrel has found a speck in the bark
wherein to make its nest; and the delicate twig way
yonder, which bears that cluster of leaves, so far in
the clouds, hides beneath its quiverings the nest of
the little bird that will teach its happy young to
try their ambitious wings to fly through the broad
world within the body of the tree, resting their tiny
pinions by the way, as eagles do, when they soar
among the clouds and stoop upon the precipice.
Here, when the summer sun radiates from the heated
plain, and the dust flies from every step upon the
parched soil, come the cattle by thousands to cool
their burning sides in the never-failing shade, and, in
quiet repose, pass the noon of day. Nature, beautiful
in her economy, thus erects her sacred temples, for
the benefit of her creatures. Centuries before the
cattle that now rest so quietly beneath these oaks
came to our continent, the wild buffalo took their
place, and the wilder Indian was the keeper of the
vacheries
. By whom and when was planted the
acorn? How came the magic seed so mysteriously
scattered over the vast field? What drew them to the
moist places, and buried them beside the
watercourses
?
and in the old times of their youth, who
were the dryads to preserve the tender plant from
the cud, or heavy crushing foot? Easy indeed is it,
in looking upon these wonderful exhibitions of nature,
reared up in so lovely places, open ever to the
sunshine
and the storm, with no shade but from the
clouds, no ambitious rivals to retard their growth,
to imagine, in their first budding, they were the care
of fairy hands, and protected by guardian spirits,
until they grew into temples, whose foundations reach
deep into the earth, and whose canopy catches the
first rays of the morning sun.
Ho! for the prairies! those broad fields in the
arcana of nature, where the grasses and
ground-flowers
revel, and their interlaced roots usurp the
soil, broad rolling waves of green earth that glisten
in the setting sun, as if they would turn a sparkling
ripple from their tops, and then settle down into quite
inland seas. Rich wastes, whereon the deer roam
as in a boundless park, and where the cattle herd
in stately pride swelling their sleek sides with
never-failing
herbage,where the horizon plays before
you in deceptive circles, seeming to sink from your
wearied footsteps as you move towards it;grand
trysting-places of magnificent sport, where man and
beast, free from the crowded mart or thick-set forest
trees, perform their different parts on nature's
grandest
stage, exulting in freedom.
A PIANO IN ARKANSAW.
We
shall never forget the excitement which seized
upon the inhabitants of the little village of
Hardscrabble
,
as the report spread through the
community
that a real piano had actually arrived within
its precincts. Speculation was afloat as to its
appearance
and its use. The name was familiar with
everybody; but what it precisely meant, no one
could tell. That it had legs was certain; for a stray
volume of some traveller was one of the most
conspicuous
works in the floating library of
Hardscrabble
;
and said traveller stated he had seen a piano
somewhere in New England with pantalettes on.
An old foreign paper was brought forward, in which
there was an advertisement headed Soiree, which
informed the citizens generally, that Mr.
Bobolink
would preside at the piano.
This was presumed by several wiseacres, who had
been to a menagerie, to mean that Mr. Bobolink
stirred the piano up with a long pole, in the same
way the showman did the lions and rhi-no-ce-rus.
So public opinion was in favour of its being an
animal, though a harmless one; for there had been
a land speculator through the village a few weeks
before, who distributed circulars of a Female
Academy, for the accomplishment of young ladies.
These circulars distinctly stated the use of the
piano to be one dollar per month. One knowing
old chap said, if they would tell him what so-i-ree
meant, he would tell them what a piano was, and no
mistake.
The owner of this strange instrument was no less
than a very quiet and very respectable late merchant
in a little town somewhere north, who, having
failed at home, had emigrated into the new and
hospitable country of Arkansas, for the purpose of
bettering his fortune, and escaping the heartless
sympathy of his more lucky neighbours, who seemed
to consider him an indifferent and degraded man
because he had become honestly poor.
The new comers were strangers of course. The
house in which they were setting up their furniture,
was too little arranged to admit of calls; and as
the family seemed very little disposed to court
society, all prospects of immediately solving the
mystery that hung about the piano seemed hopeless.
In the mean time public opinion was rife. The
depository of this strange thing was looked upon by
the passers-by with indefinable awe; and as noises
unfamiliar reached the street, it was presumed that
the piano made them, and the excitement rose
higher than ever. In the midst of it, one or two old
ladies, presuming upon their age and respectability,
called upon the strangers and inquired after their
health, and offered their services and friendship;
meantime every thing in the house was eyed with
the greatest intensity, but seeing nothing strange, a
hint was given about the piano. One of the new
family observed carelessly, that it had been much
injured by bringing out, that the damp had affected
its tones, and that one of its legs was so injured
that it would not stand up, and that for the present
it would not ornament the parlour.
Here was an explanation, indeed: injured in
bringing outdamp affecting its tonesleg broken.
Poor thing! ejaculated the old ladies with real
sympathy, as they proceeded homeward;
travelling
has evidently fatigued it; the Mass-is-sip fogs
have given it a cold, poor thing! and they wished
to see it with increased curiosity. The village
agreed that if Moses Mercer, familiarly called Mo
Mercer, was in town, they would have a
description
of the piano, and the uses to which it was put;
and fortunately, in the midst of the excitement, Mo
arrived, he having been temporarily absent on a
hunting expedition.
Moses Mercer was the only son of old Mercer,
who was, and had been, in the state senate ever
since Arkansas was admitted into the Union. Mo,
from this fact, received great glory, of course; his
father's greatness alone would have stamped him
with superiority; but his having been twice to the
Capitol, when the legislature was in session,
stamped his claims to pre-eminence over all
competitors
;
and Mo Mercer was the oracle of the
renowned village of Hardscrabble.
Mo knew every thing; he had all the
consequence
and complacency of a man who had never
seen his equal, and never expected to. Mo
bragged extensively upon his having been to the
Capitol twice,of his there having been in the
most fashionable society,of having seen the
world. His return to town was received with a
shout. The arrival of the piano was announced to
him, and
he alone
of all the community was not
astonished at the news.
His insensibility was considered wonderful. He
treated the piano as a thing he was used to, and
went on, among other things to say, that he had seen
more pianos in the Capitol, than he had ever
seen woodchucks; and that it was not an animal,
but a musical instrument, played upon by the ladies;
and he wound up his description by saying that the
way the dear creeters could pull music out of it
was a caution to hoarse owls.
The new turn given to the piano excitement in
Hardscrabble, by Mo Mercer, was like pouring oil
on fire to extinguish it, for it blazed out with more
vigour than ever. That it was a musical instrument,
made it a rarer thing than if it had been an animal
in that wild country, and people of all sizes, colours,
and degrees, were dying to see and hear it.
Jim Cash was Mo Mercer's right hand man;
in the language of refined society, he was Mo's
toady,in the language of Hardscrabble, he was
Mo's wheel-horse. Cash believed in Mo Mercer
with an abandonment perfectly ridiculous. Mr.
Cash was dying to see the piano, and the first
opportunity
he had alone with his Quixotte, he
expressed
the desire that was consuming his vitals.
We'll go at once and see it, said Mercer.
Strangers! echoed the frightened Cash.
Humbug! Do you think I have visited the
3
`Capitol' twice, and don't know how to treat
fashionable society? Come along at once, Cash,
said Mercer.
Off the pair started, Mercer all confidence, and
Cash all fears, as to the propriety of the visit. These
fears Cash frankly expressed; but Mercer repeated,
for the thousandth time, his experience in the
fashionable
society of the Capitol, and with pianos,
which he said, was synonymous. And he finally
told Cash, to comfort him, that however abashed
and ashamed he might be in the presence of the
ladies, that he needn't fear of sticking, for he
would put him through.
A few minutes' walk brought the parties on the
broad galleries of the house that contained the object
of so much curiosity. The doors and windows were
closed, and a suspicious look was on every thing.
Do they always keep a house closed up this way
that has a piano in it? asked Cash, mysteriously.
Certainly, replied Mercer, the damp would
destroy its tones.
Repeated knocks at the doors, and finally at the
windows, satisfied both Cash and Mercer that
nobody
was at home. In the midst of their
disappointment
,
Cash discovered a singular machine at the end
of the gallery, crossed by bars and rollers, and
surmounted
with an enormous crank. Cash approached
it on tiptoe; he had a presentiment that he beheld
the object of his curiosity, and as its intricate
character
unfolded itself, he gazed with distended eyes,
and asked Mercer, with breathless anxiety,
what
that was?
Mercer turned to the thing as coolly as a north
wind to an icicle, and said, that was it.
That IT!! exclaimed Cash, opening his eyes
still wider; and then, recovering himself, he asked
to see the tones.
Mercer pointed to the cross-bars and rollers.
With trembling hands, and a resolution that would
enable a man to be scalped without winking, Cash
reached out his hand, and seized the handle of the
crank; (Cash at heart was a brave and fearless man;)
he gave it a turn, the machinery grated harshly, and
seemed to clamour for something to be put in its
maw.
What delicious sounds! said Cash.
Beautiful! observed the complacent Mercer, at
the same time seizing Cash's arm, and asking him
to desist, for fear of breaking the instrument or
getting
it out of tone.
The simple caution was sufficient; and Cash, in
the joy of the moment at what he had done and seen,
looked as conceited as Mo Mercer himself. Busy
indeed was Cash, from this time forward, in
explaining
to gaping crowds the exact appearance of the
piano, how he had actually taken hold of it, and, as
his friend Mo Mercer observed, pulled music out
of it.
The curiosity of the village was thus allayed, and
it died comparatively away; Cash, however, having
rose to almost as much importance as Mo Mercer, for
having seen and handled the thing.
Our northern family knew little or nothing of
all this excitement; they received the visits and
congratulations
of the hospitable villagers, and resolved
to give a grand party to return some of the kindness
they had received, and the piano was for the first
time moved into the parlour. No invitation on this
occasion was neglected; early at the post was every
visiter, for it was rumoured that Miss Patience
Doolittle
would, in course of the evening, perform on
the piano.
The excitement was immense. The supper was
passed over with a contempt that rivals that cast
upon an excellent farce played preparatory to a dull
tragedy, in which the
star
is to appear. The
furniture
was all critically examined; but nothing could
be discovered answering Cash's description. An
enormously
thick-leafed table
, with a spread upon
it, attracted little attention,
timber
being so cheap in
a new country, and so everybody expected soon to
see the piano brought in.
Mercer, of course, was the hero of the evening;
he talked much and loud. Cash, as well as several
young ladies, went into hysterics at his wit.
Mercer
grew exceedingly conceited even for him, as
the evening wore away; he asserted the company
present reminded him of his two visits to the
Capitol
,
and other associations equally exclusive and
peculiar.
The evening wore on apace, and still no piano.
The hope deferred that maketh the heart sick, was felt
by some elderly ladies, and by a few younger ones;
and Mercer was solicited to ask Miss Patience
Doolittle
to favour the company with the presence of
the piano.
Certainly, said Mercer. With the grace of a city
dandy, he called upon the lady to gratify all present
with a little music, prefacing his request with the
remark, that if she was fatigued, his friend Cash
could give the machine a
turn
.
Miss Patience smiled, and looked at Cash.
Cash's knees trembled.
All eyes in the room turned upon him.
Cash sweat all over.
Miss Patience said she was gratified to hear that
Mr. Cash was a musician; she admired people who
had a musical taste. Whereupon Cash fell into a
chair, as he afterwards observed, chawed-up.
Oh that Beau Brummel or any of his admirers
could have seen Mo Mercer all this while! Calm
as a summer morning, and as complacent as a
newly-painted
sign; he smiled and patronised, and was the
only unexcited person in the room.
Miss Patience rose, a sigh escaped from all
present
,the
piano was evidently to be brought in.
She approached the thick-leafed table, and removed
the covering, throwing it carelessly and gracefully
aside; opened it, and presented the beautiful
arrangement
of dark and white keys.
Mo Mercer at this, for the first time in his life,
looked confused; he was Cash's authority in his
descriptions
of the appearance of the piano; while
Cash himself began to recover the moment he
ceased to be an object of attention. Many a whisper
now ran through the room as to the tones, and
more particularly the crank; none could see
them.
3*
Miss Patience took her seat, ran her fingers over
a few octaves, and if Moses in Egypt was not
perfectly
executed
, Moses in Hardscrabble
was
.
The music ceased. Miss, said Cash, the moment
he could express himself, so entranced was he by
the music,Miss Doolittle, what was that
instrument
Mo Mercer showed me in your gallery once,
that went by a crank, and had rollers in it?
It was now the time for Miss Patience to blush;
so away went the blood to her cheeks, with
confusion
;
she hesitated, stammered, and said, if Mr.
Cash must know, that it was a-a-a-
yankee washing
machine
.
The name grated on Mo Mercer's ears as if rusty
nails had been thrust into them; the heretofore
invulnerable Mercer's knees trembled; the sweat
started to his brow as he heard the taunting
whispers
of visiting the Capitol twice, and seeing
pianos as plenty as woodchucks.
The fashionable vices of envy and maliciousness
were that moment sown in the village of
Hardscrabble
;
and Mo Mercer, the great and confident, the
happy and self-possessed, surprising as it may seem,
was the first victim sacrificed to their influence.
Time wore on, and pianos became common, and
Mo Mercer less popular; and he finally disappeared
altogether on the evening of the day a yankee
pedler of notions sold, to the highest bidder, six
patent, warranted, and improved Mo Mercer pianos.
PISCATORY ARCHERY.
[1]
[1]
The writer would mention, as a preliminary, that in
speaking
of fishes, no scientific names are used; he refers to some
that are familiar, the carp, for instance, of others that he
believes
are not yet classified by naturalists. As far as possible,
the technical names peculiar to the sport described are used,
as they are always more characteristic than any other.
In
treating of the most beautiful and novel sport
of arrow-fishing, its incidents are so interwoven
with ten thousand accessories, that we scarce know
how to separate our web without breaking it, or
destroying a world of interest hidden among the wilds
of the American forest. The lakes over which the
arrow-fisher twangs his bow, in the pleasant
springtime
,
have disappeared long before the sere and
yellow
leaf of autumn appears, and the huntsman's horn
and the loud-mouthed pack clamour melodiously
after the scared deer upon their bottoms. To explain
this phenomenon, the lover of nature must follow
us until we exhibit some of the vagaries of the great
Mississippi; and, having fairly got our flood and
field before us, we will engage heartily in the sport.
If you will descend with me from slightly broken
ground through which we have been riding,
covered
with forest trees singularly choked up with
undergrowth, to an expanse of country beautifully
open between the trees, the limbs of which start out
from the trunk, some thirty feet above the ground,
you will find at your feet a herbage that is luxuriant,
but scanty; high over your head, upon the trees, you
will perceive
a line
marking what has evidently been
an overflow of water; you can trace the beautiful
level upon the trees as far as the eye can reach. It
is in the fall of the year, and a squirrel drops an
acorn upon your shoulder, and about your feet are
the sharp-cut tracks of the nimble deer. You are
standing in the centre of what is called, by hunters,
a dry lake. As the warm air of April favours
the opening flowers of spring, the waters of the
Mississippi, increased by the melting snows of the
north, swell within its low banks, and rush in a
thousand streams back into the swamps and lowlands
that lie upon its borders; the torrent sweeps along into
the very reservoir in which we stand, and the waters
swell upwards until they find a level with the
fountain
itself. Thus is formed the arrow-fisher's lake.
The brawny oak, the graceful pecan, the tall poplar,
and delicate beech spring from its surface in a
thousand
tangled limbs, looking more beautiful, yet most
unnatural, as the water reflects them downwards,
hiding completely away their submerged trunks. The
arrow-fisher now peeps in the nest of the wild bird
from his little boat, and runs its prow plump into the
hollow that marks the doorway of some cunning
squirrel. In fact, he navigates for a while, his bark
where, in the fall of the year, the gay-plumed
songster
and the hungry hawk plunge midair, and float
not more swiftly nor gayly, on light pinioned wings,
than he in his swift canoe.
A chapter from nature: and who unfolds the great
book so understandingly, and learns so truly from its
wisdom, as the piscator? The rippling brook as it
dances along in the sunshine bears with it the
knowledge
,
there is truthfulness in water, though it be not
in a well. We can find something, if we will, to
love and admire under every wave; and the noises
of every tiny brook are tongues that speak eloquently
to nature's true priests.
We have marked that, with the rise of the waters
the fish grow gregarious, and that they rush along
in schools
with the waters that flow inland
from the
river, that they thus choose these temporary sylvan
lakes as depositories of their spawn; thus wittingly
providing against that destruction which would
await their young in the highways of their
journeyings
.
It is a sight to wonder at in the wilds of the
primitive forest, to see the fish rushing along the
narrow inlets, with the current, in numbers
incredible
to the imagination, leaping over the fallen tree
that is only half buried in the surface of the stream,
or stayed a moment in their course by the meshes
of the strong net, either bursting it by force of
numbers
,
or granting its wasteful demands by thousands,
without seemingly to diminish the multitude more
than a single leaf would, taken from its foliage.
We have marked, too, that these fish would besport
themselves in their new homes, secluding
themselves
in the shadows of the trees and banks; and,
as the summer heats come on, they would grow
unquiet
;
the outlets leading to the great river they
had left would be thronged by what seemed to be
busy couriers; and when the news finally spread
of
falling water
, one night would suffice to make the
lake, before so thronged with finny life, deserted; and
a few nights, perhaps, will only pass, when the narrow
bar will obtrude itself between the inland lake and
the river that supplied it with water. Such was the
fish's wisdom, seen and felt, where man, with his
learning and his nicely wrought mechanisms, would
watch in vain the air, the clouds, and see no signs
of falling water.
[2]
[2]
It may not be uninteresting to naturalists to be informed,
that these fish run into the inland lakes to spawn, and they
do it with the rise of the water of course. These overflows
are annual. A few years since the season was very singular,
and there were
three
distinct rises and falls of water, and at
each rise the fish followed the water inland, and spawned: a
remarkable example where the usual order of nature was
reversed in one instance, and yet continuing blindly consistent
in another. It is also very remarkable that the young fish,
native of the lakes, are as interested to mark the indications of
falling water as those that come into them; and in a long
series of years of observation, but one fall was ever known
where the fish were in the lakes.
Among arrow-fishermen there are technicalities,
an understanding of which will give a more ready
idea of the sport. The surfaces of these inland lakes
are unruffled by the winds or storms; the heats of
the sun seem to rest upon them; they are constantly
sending into the upper regions warm mists. Their
surfaces, however, are covered with innumerable
bubbles, either floating about, or breaking into
little circling ripples. To the superficial observer
these air-bubbles mean little or nothing; to the
arrow-fisherman
,
they are the very
language of his art;
visible writing upon the unstable water, unfolding
the secrets of the depths below, and guiding him,
with unerring certainty, in his pursuits.
Seat yourself quietly in this little skiff, and while
I paddle quietly out into the lake, I will translate to
you these apparent wonders, and give you a lesson
in the simple language of nature. An air-bubble is
an air-bubble, you say, and your fine distinctions
must be in the imagination. Well! then mark how
stately ascends that large globule of air; if you will
time each succeeding one by your watch, you will
find that while they appear, it is at regular intervals,
and when they burst upon the surface of the water,
there is the least spray in the world for an instant
sparkling in the sun. Now, yonder, if you will
observe
,
are very minute bubbles that seem to
simmer
towards the surface. Could you catch the air of
the first bubble we noticed, and give it to an
ingenious
chemist, he would tell you that it was a light
gas, that exhaled from decaying vegetable matter.
The arrow-fisherman will tell you they come from
an old stump, and are denominated
dead bubbles
.
That simmering was made by some comfortable
turtle, as he gaps open his mouth and gives his
breath to the surrounding element.
Look ahead of you: when did you ever see an
Archimedean screw more beautifully marked out
than by that group of bubbles? They are very light,
indeed, and seem thus gracefully to struggle into the
upper world; they denote the eager workings of
some terrapin in the soft mud at the bottom of the
lake. In the shade of yonder lusty oak you will
perceive what arrow-fishermen call a feed; you
see the bubbles are entirely unlike any we have
noticed
;
they come rushing upwards swiftly, like
handfuls
of silver shot. They are lively and animated
to look at, and are caused by the fish below, as they,
around the root of that very oak, search for insects
for food. To those bubbles the arrow-fisherman
hastens for game: they are made by the fish he calls
legitimate for his sport.
In early spring the fish are discovered, not only
by the bubbles they make, but by various sounds
uttered while searching for food. These sounds are
familiarized, and betray the kind of fish that make
them. In late spring, from the middle of May to
June, the fish come near the surface of the water
and expose their mouths to the air, keeping up, at
the same time, a constant motion with it, called
piping. Fish thus exposed are in groups, and
are called a float. The cause of this phenomenon
is hard to explain, all reasons given being
unsatisfactory
.
As it is only exhibited in the hottest of
weather, it may be best accounted for in the old
verse:
The sun, from its perpendicular height,
Illumed the depths of the sea;
The fishes, beginning to sweat,
Cry, `Dang it, how hot we shall be!'
There are several kinds of fish that attract the
attention
of the arrow-fishermen. Two kinds only
are professedly pursued, the carp and the
buffalo
.
Several others, however, are attacked for
the mere purpose of amusement, among which we
may mention a species of perch, and the most
extraordinary
of all fish, the gar.
The carp is a fish known to all anglers. Its
habits must strike every one familiar with them, as
being eminently in harmony with the retreats we
have described. In these lakes they vary in weight
from five to thirty pounds, and are preferred by
arrow-fishermen
to all other fish. The buffalo, a sort of
fresh-water sheep's-head, is held next in estimation.
A species of perch is also destroyed, that vary from
three to ten pounds; but as they are full of bones
4
and coarse in flesh, they are killed simply to test
the skill of the arrow-fisherman.
[3]
[3]
The carp to which we allude is so accurately described
in its habits in Blane's Encyclopedia of Rural Sports, when
speaking of the European carp, that we are tempted to make
one or two extracts, that are remarkable for their truthfulness
as applied to the section of the United States where
arrow-fishing
is a sport. In the work we allude to we have the
following:
The usual length of the carp in our own country (
England
)
is from about twelve to fifteen or sixteen inches; but
in warm climates
, it often arrives at the length of two, three, or
four feet, and to the weight of twenty, thirty, or even forty
pounds. Par. 3448. Again, The haunts of the carp of
stagnant
water are, during the spring and autumn months, in the
deepest parts, particularly near the flood-gates by which water
is received and let off
. In the summer months they frequent
the weed beds, and
come near to the surface
, and particularly
are fond of aquatic plants, which spring from the bottom and
rise to the top. Par. 3453. We find the fish retains the same
distinctive habits in both hemispheres, altering only from the
peculiarities of the country.
The incredible increase of fishes has been a matter
of immemorial observation. In the retired lakes and
streams we speak of, but for a wise arrangement of
Providence, it seems not improbable that they would
outgrow the very space occupied by the element in
which they exist. To prevent this consummation,
there are fresh-water fiends, more terrible than the
wolves and tigers of the land, that prowl on the finny
tribe with an appetite commensurate with their
plentifulness
,
destroying millions in a day, yet leaving,
from their abundance, untold numbers to follow their
habits and the cycle of their existence undisturbed.
These terrible destroyers have no true representatives
in the sea; they seem to be peculiar to waters
tributary
to the Mississippi. There are two kinds of
them, alike in office, but distinct in species; they
are known by those who fish in the streams they
inhabit
as the gar. They are, when grown to their
full size, twelve or fifteen feet in length, voracious
monsters to look at, so well made for strength, so
perfectly protected from assault, so capable of
inflicting
injury. The smaller kind, growing not larger
than six feet, have a body that somewhat resembles in
form the pike, covered by what look more like large
flat heads of wrought iron, than scales, which it is
impossible to remove without cutting them out, they
are so deeply imbedded in the flesh. The jaws of
this monster form about one-fourth of its whole
length; they are shaped like the bill of a goose,
armed in the interior with triple rows of teeth, as
sharp and well set as those of a saw. But
the terror
is the alligator gar, a monster that seems to
combine
all the most destructive powers of the shark and
the reptile. The alligator gar grows to the enormous
length of fifteen feet; its head resembles the alligator's;
within its wide-extended jaws glisten innumerable
rows of teeth, running down into its very throat in
solid columns. Blind in its instinct to destroy, and
singularly tenacious of life, it seems to prey with
untiring energy, and with an appetite that is increased
by gratification. Such are the fish that are made
victims of the mere sport of the arrow-fisherman.
The implements of the arrow-fisherman are a
strong bow, five or six feet long, made of black
locust or of cedar, (the latter being preferred.) An
arrow of ash, three feet long, pointed with an iron
spear of peculiar construction. The spear is eight
inches long, one end has a socket, in which is fitted
loosely
the wooden shaft; the other end is a flattened
point; back of this point there is inserted the barb,
which shuts into the iron as it enters an object, but
will open if attempted to be drawn out. The whole
of this iron-work weighs three ounces. A cord is
attached to the spear, fifteen or twenty feet long,
about the size of a crow quill, by which is held the
fish when struck.
Of the water-craft used in arrow-fishing, much
might be said, as it introduces the common Indian
canoe, or as it is familiarly termed, the dug out,
which is nothing more than a trunk of a tree, shaped
according to the humour or taste of its artificer, and
hollowed out. We have seen some of these rude
barks that claimed but one degree of beauty or
utility beyond the common log, and we have seen
others as gracefully turned as was ever the bosom of
the loving swan, and that would, as gracefully as
Leda's bird, spring through the rippling waves. To
the uninitiated, the guidance of a canoe is a mystery.
The grown-up man, who first attempts to move on
skates over the glassy ice, has a command of his
limbs, and a power of locomotion, that the novice
in canoe navigation has not. Never at rest, it seems
to rush from under his feet; overbalanced by an
overdrawn breath, it precipitates its victim into the
water. Every effort renders it more and more
unmanageable
,
until it is condemned as worthless. But
let a person accustomed to its movements take it in
charge, and it gayly launches into the stream; whether
standing or sitting, the master has it entirely under
his control, moving any way with a quickness, a
pliability
,
quite wonderful, forward, sideways,
backwards
;
starting off in an instant, or while at the
greatest speed, instantly stopping still, and doing all
this more perfectly than any other water-craft of the
world. The arrow-fisher prefers a canoe with very
little rake, quite flat on the bottom, and not more
than fifteen feet long, so as to be turned quick. Place
in this simple craft the simpler paddle, lay beside it
the arrow, the bow, the cord, and you have the whole
outfit of the arrow-fisherman.
In arrow-fishing, two persons only are employed;
each one has his work designatedthe paddler
and bowman. Before the start is made, a
perfect
understanding is had, so that their movements
are governed by signs. The delicate canoe is pushed
into the lake, its occupants scarcely breathe to get it
balanced, the paddler is seated in its bottom, near
its centre, where he remains, governing the canoe in
all its motions, without
ever taking the paddle from
the water
. The fisherman stands at the bow; around
the wrist of his left hand is fastened, by a loose loop,
the cord attached to the arrow, which cord is wound
around the forefinger of the same hand, so that
when paying off, it will do so easily. In the same
hand is, of course, held the bow. In the right, is
4*
carried the arrow, and by its significant pointing, the
paddler gives directions for the movements of the
canoe. The craft glides along, scarcely making a
ripple; a feed is discovered, over which the canoe
stops; the bowman draws his arrow to the head;
the game, disturbed, is seen in the clear water rising
slowly and perpendicularly, but otherwise perfectly
motionless; the arrow speeds its way; in an instant
the shaft shoots into the air, and floats quietly away,
while the wounded fish, carrying the spear in its
body, endeavours to escape. The pull is
managed
so as to come directly from the bow of the
canoe
;
it lasts but for a moment before the transfixed
fish is seen, fins playing, and full of agonizing life,
dancing on the top of the water, and in another
instant
more lies dead at the bottom of the canoe. The
shaft is then gone after, picked up, and thrust into
the spear; the cord is again adjusted, and the canoe
moves towards the merry makers of those swift
ascending
bubbles, so brightly displaying themselves
on the edge of that deep shade, cast by yonder
evergreen
oak.
There is much in the associations of arrow-fishing
that gratifies taste, and makes it partake of a refined
and intellectual character. Besides the knowledge
it gives of the character of fishes, it practises one in
the curious refractions of water. Thus will the
arrow-fisherman, from long experience, drive his
pointed shaft a fathom deep for game, when it would
seem, to the novice, a few inches would be more
than sufficient. Again, the waters that supply the
arrow-fisherman with game, afford subsistence to
innumerable
birds, and he has exhibited before him
the most beautiful displays of their devices to catch
the finny tribe. The kingfisher may be seen the
livelong day, acting a prominent part, bolstering up
its fantastic topknot, as if to apologize for a manifest
want of neck; you can hear it always scolding and
clamorous among the low brush, and overhanging
limits of trees, eyeing the minnows as they glance
along the shore, and making vain essays to fasten
them in his bill. The hawk, too, often swoops
down from the clouds, swift as the bolt of Jove;
the cleft air whistles in the flight; the sporting fish
playing in the sunlight is snatched up in the rude
talons, and borne aloft, the reeking water from its
scaly sides falling in soft spray upon the upturned
eye that traces its daring course. But we treat of
fish, and not of birds.
Yonder is our canoe; the paddle has stopped it
short, just where you see those faint bubbles; the
water is very deep beneath them, and reflects the
frail bark and its occupants, as clearly as if they
were floating in mid-air. The bowman looks into
the waterthe fish are out of sight, and not disturbed
by the intrusion above them. They are eating
busily
,
judging from the ascending bubbles. The
bowman lets fall the heel of his arrow on the
bottom of the canoe, and the bubbles instantly cease.
The slight tap has made a great deal of noise in the
water, though scarcely heard out of it. There can be
seen rising to the surface a tremendous carp. How
quietly it comes upwards, its pectoral fins playing
like the wings of the sportive butterfly. Another
moment, and the cold iron is in its body. Paralyzed
for an instant, the fish rises to the surface as if dead,
then, recovering itself, it rushes downwards, until the
cord that holds it prisoner tightens, and makes the
canoe tremble; the effort has destroyed it, and
without
another struggle it is secured.
When the fish first come into the lakes, they move
in pairs on the surface of the water, and while so
doing they are shot, as it is called, flying. In
early spring fifteen or twenty fish are secured in an
hour. As the season advances, three or four taken
in the same length of time is considered quite good
success. To stand upon the shore, and see the
arrow-fisherman
busily employed, is a very interesting
exhibition of skill, and of the picturesque. The little
dug out seems animate with intelligence; the
bowman draws his long shaft, you see it enter the
water, and then follows the glowing sight of the fine
fish sparkling in the sun, as if sprinkled with
diamonds
.
At times, too, when legitimate sport tires,
some ravenous gar that heaves in sight is made a
victim; aim is taken just ahead of his dorsal fin;
secured, he flounders a while, and then drags off the
canoe as if in harness, skimming it almost out of the
water with his speed. Fatigued, finally, with his
useless endeavours to escape, he will rise to the
surface
,
open his huge mouth, and gasp for air. The
water that streams from his jaws will be coloured
with blood from the impaled fish that still struggle
in the terrors of his barbed teeth. Rushing ahead
again, he will, by eccentric movements, try the best
skill of the paddler to keep his canoe from
overturning
into the lake, a consummation not always
unattained. The gar finally dies, and is dragged
ashore; the buzzard revels on his carcass, and every
piscator contemplates, with disgust, the great enemy
to his game, the terrible monarch of the fresh-water
seas.
The crumbling character of the alluvial banks
that line our southern streams, the quantity of fallen
timber, the amount of snags and sawyers, and
the great plentifulness of game, make the beautiful
art of angling, as pursued in England, impossible.
The veriest tyro, who finds a delicate reed in every
nook that casts a shadow on the water, with his
rough line, and coarser hook,
can catch fish
. The
greedy perch, in all its beautiful varieties, swim
eagerly and quickly around the snare, and swallow
it, without suspicion that a worm is not a worm, or
that appearances are ever deceitful. The jointed
rod, the scientific reel, cannot be used; the thick
hanging bow, the rank grass, the sunken log, the far
reaching
melumbrium
, the ever still water, make these
delicate appliances useless. Arrow-fishing only, of
all the angling in the interior streams of the
south-west
,
comparatively speaking, claims the title of
an
art
, as it is pursued with a skill and a thorough
knowledge that tell only with the experienced, and
to the novice is an impossibility.
The originators of arrow-fishing deserve the credit
of striking out a rare and beautiful amusement, when
the difficulties of securing their game did not require
it, showing that it resulted in the spirit of true sport
alone.
The origin of arrow-fishing we know not; the
country where it is pursued is comparatively of
recent
settlement; scarce three generations have passed
away within its boundaries. We asked the oldest
piscator that lived in the vicinity of these dry
lakes for information, and he told us that it was
old Uncle Zac, and gave us his history in a brief
and pathetic manner, concluding his reminiscences
of the great departed as follows:
Uncle Zac never know'd nothing 'bout flies, or
tickling trout, but it took him to tell the differance
'twixt a yarth-worm, a grub, or the young of a
wasp's nest; in fact, he know'd fishes amazin', and
bein' natur-ally a hunter, he went to shooten 'em with
a bow and arrer, to keep up yearly times in his
history, when he tuck inguns, and yerther varmints
in the same way.
PLACE DE LA CROIX.
A ROMANCE OF THE WEST.
There
is much of beautiful romance in the whole
history of the early settlements of Florida. De Soto
and Ponce de Leon have thrown around the records
of their searches for gold and the waters of life, a
kind of dreamy character that renders them more
like traditions of a spiritual than of a real world.
They and their followers were men of stern military
discipline, who had won honours in their conquests
over the Moors; and they came hither not as
emigrants
,
seeking an asylum from oppression, but as
proud nobles, anxious to add to their numerous
laurels, by conquests in a new world. The startling
discoveries,the fruits, the gold and the natives that
appeared with Columbus at the court of Isabella,
gave to fancy an impetus, and to enthusiasm a power,
that called forth the pomp of the Infallible Church
to mingle her sacred symbols with those of arms; and
they went joined together through the wilds of
America. Among the beautiful and striking
customs
of those days was the erection of the cross at
the mouths of rivers and prominent points of land that
presented themselves to the discoverers. The sacred
symbol thus reared in solitude seemed to shadow
forth the future, when the dense forests would be
filled with its followers instead of the wild savage;
and it cheered the lonely pilgrim in his dangerous
journeys, bringing to his mind all the cherished
associations of this life, and directing his thoughts
to another world. In the putting up of these crosses,
as they bore the arms of the sovereign whose
subjects
erected them, and as they were indicative of
civil jurisdiction and empire, the most prominent
and majestic locations were selected, where they
could be seen for miles around, towering above
every other object, speaking the advances of the
European, and giving title to the lands over which
they cast their shadows. Three hundred years ago
the sign of the cross was first raised on the banks of
the Mississippi. From one of the few bluffs or high
points of land that border that swift running river,
De Soto, guided by the aborigines of the country,
was the first European that looked upon its turbid
waters, soon to be his grave. On this high bluff,
taking advantage of a lofty cotton-wood tree, he
caused its majestic trunk to be shorn of its limbs;
and on this tall shaft placed the beam that formed
the cross. This completed, the emblazoned banners
of Spain and Arragon were unfurled to the breeze,
and, amid the strains of martial music and the firing
of cannon, the steel-clad De Soto, assisted by the
priests in his train, raised the host to heaven,
and declared the reign of Christianity commenced
in the valley of the Mississippi. The erection of
this touching symbol in the great temple of nature
was full of poetry. The forests, like the stars, declare
the wonderful works of the Creator. In the silent
grandeur of our primeval woods, in their avenues
of columns, their canopies of leaves, their festoons
of vines, the cross touched the heart, and spoke
more fully its office than ever it will glistening
among the human greatness of a Milan cathedral,
or the solemn grandeur of a St. Peters. Two
hundred years after Ponce de Leon mingled his
dust with the sands of the peninsula of Florida, and
De Soto reposed beneath the current of the
Mississippi
,
the same spirit of religious and military
enthusiasm
pervaded the settlements made by both
French and Spanish in this land of flowers.
Among the adventurers of that day were many who
mingled the romantic ambition of the crusaders with
the ascetic spirit of the monk, and who looked upon
themselves as ambassadors of religion to new nations
in a new world. Of such was Rousseau. It requires
little imagination to understand the disappointment
that such a man would meet with in the forest, and
as an intruder of the untractable red man. The
exalted
notions of Rousseau ended in despondence,
away from the pomp and influence of his church.
Having been nurtured in the Eternal city, he
had not the zeal, and lacked the principle, to
become
an humble teacher to humbler recipients of
knowledge.
Disregarding his priestly office, he finally mingled
in the dissipations of society, and in the year 1736,
he started off as a military companion to
D'Arteguette
in his expedition among the Chickasas.
The death of D'Arteguette and his bravest troops,
and the dispersion of his Indian allies, left Rousseau
5
a wanderer, surrounded by implacable enemies, he
being one of the few who escaped the fate of battle.
Unaccustomed to forest life, more than a thousand
miles from the Canadas, he became a prey of
imaginary
and real dangers. Unprovided with arms, his
food was of roots or herbs. At night the wild
beasts howled round his cold couch, and every
stump in the daytime seemed to conceal an Indian.
Now it was that Rousseau reviewed the incidents
of his past life with sorrow. He discovered, when
it was too late, that he had lost his peace of mind,
and his hopes of future existence for a momentary
enjoyment. Wasting with watching and hunger,
he prayed to the Virgin to save him, that he might,
by a long life of penance, obliterate his sins. On
the twelfth day of his wanderings he sank upon the
earth to die, and, casting his eyes upward in prayer,
he saw, far in the distance, towering above every
other object, the cross! It seemed a miracle and
inspired with strength his trembling limbs; and he
pressed forward that he might breathe his last at its
foot. As he reached it, a smile of triumph lighted
up his wayworn features, and he fell insensible to
the earth. Never, perhaps, was this emblem more
beautifully decorated or more touchingly displayed
than was the one that towered over Rousseau.
From indications, some fifteen years might have
elapsed since the European pilgrim had erected it.
One of the largest forest trees had been chosen that
stood upon the surrounding bluffs; the tall trunk
tapered upward with the proportion of a Corinthian
column, which, with the piece forming the cross,
was covered with ten thousand of those evergreen
vines that spread such a charm over the southern
landscape
.
It seemed as if nature had paid tribute to the
sacred symbol, and festooned it with a perfection and
beauty worthy of her abundance. The honey-suckle
and the ivy, the scarlet creeper and fragrant
jasmine
,
the foliage enameled with flowers, shed upon
the repentant, and now insensible, Rousseau a shower
of fragrance. Near where he lay, there was a narrow
and amply-worn footpath. You could trace it, from
where it lost itself in the deep forests, to where it
wound round the steep-washed bank until it touched
the water's edge. At this point were to be seen
the prints of footsteps; and traces of small fires were
also visible, one of which still sent up puffs of smoke.
Here it was that the Choctaw maidens and old
women performed their rude labour of washing. In
the morning and evening sun, a long line of the
forest children might be seen, with clay jars and
skins filled with water, carrying them upon their
heads, and stringing up, single file, the steep bank
and losing themselves in the woods; with their
half-clad
and erect forms, making a most picturesque
display, not unlike the processions figured in the
hieroglyphical paintings of Egypt.
Soon after Rousseau fell at the cross, there might
have been seen emerging from the woods, and
following
the path we have described, a delicately
formed Indian girl. In her hand was a long reed and
a basket, and she came with blithe steps towards the
river. As she passed the cross, the form of
Rousseau
met her eyes. Stopping and examining him,
with almost overpowering curiosity, she retreated
with precipitation, but returned almost instantly. She
approached nearer, until the wan and insensible face
met hers. Strange as was his appearance and colour,
the chord of humanity was touched, the woman
forgot
both fear and curiosity, in her anxiety to allay
visible suffering. A moment had hardly elapsed
before water was thrown in his face and held to his
lips. The refreshing beverage brought him to
consciousness
.
He stared wildly about, and discovered
the Indian form bending over him; he sank again
insensible to the earth. Like a young doe the girl
bounded away and disappeared.
A half hour might have elapsed, when there
issued out of the forest a long train of Indians. At
their head was the young maiden surrounded by
armed warriors; in the rear followed women and
children. They approached Rousseau, whose
recovery
was but momentary, and who was now
unconscious
of what was passing around him. The
crowd examined him first with caution, gradually,
with familiarity; their whispers became animated
conversation, and, finally, blended in one noisy
confusion
.
There were among those present many
who had heard of the white man and of his powers,
but none had ever seen one before. One Indian,
more bold than the rest, stripped the remnant of a
cloakfrom Rousseau's shoulder; another, emboldened
by this act, caught rudely hold of his coat, and as he
pulled it aside, there fell from his breast a small gilt
crucifix, held by a silken cord. Its brilliancy
excited
the cupidity of all, and many were the eager
hands that pressed forward to obtain it. An old
chief gained the prize, and fortunately for Rousseau,
his prowess and influence left him in undisputed
possession. As he examined the little trinket, the
Indian girl we have spoken of, the only female near
Rousseau, crossed her delicate fingers, and pointed
upward. The old chief instantly beheld the similarity
between the large and small symbol of Christianity,
and extending it aloft, with all the dignity of a
cardinal
,
the crowd shouted as they saw the
resemblance
,
and a change came over them all.
They associated at once the erection of the large
cross with Rousseau; and as their shout had again
called forth exhibitions of life from his insensible
form, they threw his cloak over him, suspended the
cross to his neck, brought, in a moment, green boughs,
with which a litter was made, and bore him with all
respect toward their lodges. The excitement and
exercise of removal did much to restore him to life;
a dish of maize did more; and nothing could
exceed
his astonishment on his recovery, that he should
be treated with such kindness; and as he witnessed
the respect paid the cross, and was shown by rude
gestures, that he owed his life to its influence, he
sank upon his knees, overwhelmed with its visible
exhibition of power, and satisfied that his prayer for
safety had been answered in the perfection of a
miracle. The Choctaws, into whose hands the
unfortunate
Rousseau had fallen, (although he was not
aware of the difference,) were not the bloody-minded
Cherokees, from whom he had so lately escaped.
Years before, the inhabitants of the little village, on
5*
their return from a hunting expedition discovered
the cross we have described; its marks then were
such as would be exhibited a few days after its
erection
.
Footsteps were seen about its base, that from
their variance with the mark left by the moccasin,
satisfied the Indians that it was not erected by any
of their people. The huge limbs that had been shorn
from the trunk bore fresh marks of terrible cuts,
which the stone hatchet could not have made.
As it is natural to the Indian mind, on the display
of power they cannot explain, they appropriately,
though accidentally, associated the cross with a
Great Spirit, and looked upon it with wonder and
admiration. Beside the cross there was found an
axe, left by those who had formed it. This was an
object of the greatest curiosity to its finders. They
struck it into the trees, severed huge limbs, and
performed
other powerful feats with it, and yet fancied
their own rude stone instruments failed to do the
same execution from want of a governing spirit
equal to that which they imagined presided over the
axe, and not from difference of material.
The cross and the axe were associated together in
the Indians' minds; and the crucifix of Rousseau
connected him with both. They treated him,
therefore
,
with all the attention they would bestow upon a
being who is master of a superior power. The terrible
and strange incidents that had formed the life of
Rousseau
,
since the defeat of his military associate,
D'Arteguette
,
seemed to him, as he recalled them in his
mind, to have occupied an age. His dreams were filled
with scenes of torment and death. He would start
from his sleep with the idea that an arrow was
penetrating
his body, or that the bloody knife was at his
heart; these were then changed into visions of
starvation
,
or destruction by wild beasts. Recovering his
senses, he would find himself in a comfortable lodge,
reposing on a couch of soft skins; while the simple
children of the woods, relieved of their terrors, were
waiting to administer to his wants. The change
from the extreme of suffering to that of comfort, he
could hardly realize. The cross in the wilderness,
the respect they paid to the one on his breast, were
alike inexplicable; and Rousseau, according to the
spirit of his age, felt that a miracle had been wrought
in his favour: and on his bending knees he renewed
his ecclesiastical vows, and determined to devote
his life to enlightening the people among whom
Providence
had placed him.
The Indian girl who first discovered Rousseau,
was the only child of a powerful chief. She was still
a maiden, and the slavish labour of savage married
life had, consequently, not been imposed upon her.
Among her tribe she was universally considered
beautiful; and her hand was sought by all the young
braves of her tribe. Wayward or indifferent to
please, she resolutely refused to occupy any lodge
but her father's, however eligible and enviable the
settlement might have appeared in the eyes of her
associates.
For an Indian girl she was remarkably gentle;
and, as Rousseau gradually recovered his strength, he
had, through her leisure, more frequent intercourse
with her than with any other of the tribe. There was
also a feeling in his bosom that she was, in the hands
of an overruling Providence, the instrument used to
preserve his life. Whatever might have been the
speculations of the elders of the tribe, as day after
day Rousseau courted her society and listened to the
sounds of her voice, we do not know; but his
attentions to her were indirectly encouraged, and
the Indian girl was almost constantly at his side.
Rousseau's plans were formed. The painful
experience
he had encountered, while following the
ambition of worldly greatness, had driven him back
into the seclusion of the church, with a love only to
end with his life.
He determined to learn the dialect of the people
in whose lot his life was cast, and form them into a
nation
of worthy recipients of the Holy Church;
and the gentle Indian girl was to him a preceptor, to
teach him her language. With this high resolve, he
repeated the sounds of her voice, imitated her
gesticulations
,
and encouraged, with marked preference,
her society. The few weeks that Rousseau passed
among the Choctaws, had made him one bitter,
implacable
bitter enemy. Unable to explain his office
or his intentions, his preference for Chechoula had
been marked by the keen eye of a jealous and
rejected
lover. Wah-a-ola was a young brave,
who had distinguished himself on the hunting and
war paths. Young as he was, he had won a name.
Three times he had laid the trophies of his prowess
at the feet of Chechoula, and as often she had
rejected
his suit. Astonished at his want of success,
he looked upon his mistress as labouring under the
influence of some charm, for he could find no
accepted
rival for her hand.
The presence of Rousseauthe marked preference
which Chechoula exhibited for his society, settled, in
his own mind, that the pale face was the charmer.
With this conviction, he placed himself conveniently
to meet his mistress, and once more pleaded his suit
before he exhibited the feelings of hatred which he
felt towards Rousseau. The lodge of Chechoula's
father was, from the dignity of the chief, at the head
of the Indian village, and at some little distance.
The impatient Wah-a-ola seated himself near its
entrance
,
where, from his concealment, he could watch
whoever entered its door. A short time only elapsed,
before he saw, in the cold-moonlight, a group of
Indian
girls approaching the Indian lodge, in busy
conversation, and conspicuously among them all,
Chechoula.
Her companions separated from her, and as she
entered her father's lodge, a rude buffalo-skin shut
her in. Soon after her disappearance, the little groups
about the Indian village gradually dispersed; the
busy hum of conversation ceased; and when
profound
stillness reigned, a plaintive note of the
whippoor-will
was heard; it grew louder and louder,
until it seemed as if the lone bird was perched on
the top of the lodge that contained Chechoula. It
attracted her ear, for she thrust aside the
buffalo-skin
,
and listened with fixed attention. The bird
screamed, and appeared to flutter, as if wounded.
Chechoula rushed toward the bushes that seemed to
conceal so much distress, when Wah-a-ola sprang
up and seized her wrist. The affrighted girl stared
at her captor for a moment, and then exclaimed,
The snake should not sing like the birds!
Wah-a-ola
relaxed not his hold; there was a volcano in
his breast, that seemed to overwhelm him as he
glared upon Chechoula with blood-shot eyes.
Struggling
to conceal his emotion, he replied to her
question
,
by asking if the wild-flowers of the woods
were known only to their thorns? The water
lilies grow upon smooth stones, said Chechoula,
striving violently to retreat to her father's lodge. The
love of Wah-a-ola was full of jealousy, and the salute
and reply of his mistress converted it into hate.
Dashing his hand across his brow, on which the
savage
workings of his passion were plainly visible, he
asked, if a brave was to whine for a woman like
a bear for its cubs? Go! said he, flinging
Chechoula's
arm from him; go! The mistletoe grows not
upon young trees, and the pale face shall be a rabbit
in the den of the wolf! From the time Rousseau was
able to walk, he had made a daily pilgrimage to the
cross, and there, upon his bended knees, greeted the
morning sun. This habit was known to all the tribe.
The morning following the scene between
Waha-ola
and Chechoula, he was found dead at the foot
of the sacred tree. A poisoned arrow had been
driven almost through his body. Great was the
consternation of the whole tribe. It was considered
a mysterious evidence of impending evil; while not
a single person could divine who was the murderer.
The mistletoe grows not upon young trees! thought
Chechoula; and for the first time she knew the full
meaning of the words, as she bent over the body of
Rousseau. She attended his obsequies with a
sorrow
less visible, but more deep than that of her
people; although the whole tribe had, in the short
residence of the departed, learned to respect him,
and to look upon him as a great Medicine. His
grave was dug where he had so often prayed, and
the same sod covered him that drank his heart's
blood. According to Indian custom, all that he
possessed, as well as those articles appropriated to
his use, were buried with him in his grave. His
little crucifix reposed upon his breast, and he was
remembered as one who had mysteriously come, and
as mysteriously passed away. A few years after the
events we have detailed, a Jesuit missionary, who
understood the Choctaw language, announced his
mission to the tribe, and was by them kindly
received
.
His presence revived the recollections of
Rousseau, and the story of his being among them
was told. The priest explained to them his office,
and these wild people, in a short time, erected over
the remains of Rousseau a rude chapel; his spirit
was called upon as their patron saint, and Chechoula
was the first to renounce the superstitions of her
tribe, and receive the Holy Sacrament of Baptism.
In the year 1829, a small brass cross was picked out
of the banks of the Mississippi, near Natchez, at the
depth of several feet from the surface. The crucifix
was in tolerable preservation, and was exposed by
one of those carvings of the soil so peculiar to the
Mississippi. The speculations which the finding of
this cross called forth, revived the almost forgotten
traditions of the story of Rousseau, and of his death
and burial at the Place De La Croix.
WIT OF THE WOODS.
Originally
the wild turkey was found scattered
throughout the whole of our continent, its habits
only differing, where the peculiarity of the seasons
compelled it to provide against excessive cold or heat.
In the clearing, it only lives in its excellent and
degenerated descendant of the farm-yard. In the
vast prairies and forests of the far west, this bird
is still abundant, and makes an important addition
to the fare of wild life. It is comparatively common
on the frontiers; but every passing year lessens
its numbers, and as their disappearance always
denotes
their death, their extermination is progressive
and certain. In Louisiana, Alabama, South
Carolina
,
and the southern states, there are fastnesses, in
which they will find support and protection for a
long time to come. The swamps and lowlands that
offer no present inducement to the settler, will
shelter them from the rifle; and in the rich
productions
of the soil they will find a superabundance of
food. The same obscurity, however, that protects
them, leaves the hole of the wildcat in peace; and
this bitter enemy of the turkey wars upon it, and
makes its life one of cunning and care. Nor is its
finely flavoured meat unappreciated by other
destroyers
,
as the fox and weasel select the young for an
evening repast, according to their strength. The
nest, too, may be made, even the young bird in peace
may have broken its shell, and frightened at its own
piping note, hid instinctively away, when the
Mississippi
will rise, bearing upon its surface the waters
of a thousand floods, swell within its narrow banks,
and overflow the lowlands. The young bird, unable
to fly, and too delicate to resist the influence of the
wet, sickens and dies. Upon the
dryness
of the
season the turkey-hunter builds his hopes of the
plentifulness of the game.
The wild turkey-hunter is distinct and peculiar.
The eccentric habits of the bird, its exceeding
wildness
is sympathized with, and enjoyed only by a
class of persons, who are themselves different from
the ordinary hunter. As a general thing,
turkey-hunters
,
if they are of literary habits, read Izaak
Walton, and Burton's Anatomy of Melancholy,
and all, learned or unlearned, are enthusiastic
disciples
of the rod and line. The piscator can be an
enthusiastic admirer of the opera, the wild
turkey-hunter
could not be, for his taste never carries him
beyond the simple range of natural notes. Here he
excels. Place him in the forest with his pipe, and
no rough pan ever piped more wilily, or more in
harmony with the scenes around him. The same
tube modulates the note of alarm, and the dulcet
sound of love; it plays plaintively the complaining
of the female, and, in sweet chirps, calls forth the
lover from his hiding-place; it carols among the
low whisperings of the fledgling, and expresses the
mimic sounds of joy at the treasure of food that is
found discovered under the fallen leaf, or hidden
6
away in the decayed wood. And all this is done so
craftily, that ears, on which nature has set her stamp
of peculiar delicacy, and the instinct, true almost as
the shadow to the sunlight, are both deceived.
It is unnecessary to describe the bird, though we
never see it fairly represented except in the forest.
The high mettled racer that appears upon the course
is no more superior to the well fed cart-horse than
is the wild turkey to the tame; in fact nothing
living
shows more points of health and purity of blood
than this noble bird. Its game head and clear
hazle eye, the clean firm step, the great breadth of
shoulder, and deep chest, strike the most superficial
observer. Then there is an absolute commanding
beauty about them, when they are alarmed or
curious
,
when they elevate themselves to their full
height, bringing their head perpendicular with their
feet, and gaze about, every feather in its place, the
foot upraised ready at an instant, to strike off at a
speed, that, as has been said of the ostrich,
scorneth
the horse and his rider.
The wild turkey-hunter is a being of solitude.
There is no noise or boisterous mirth in his pursuit.
Even the dead leaf, as it sails in circuitous motion
to the earth, intrudes upon his caution, and alarms
the wary game, which, in its care of preservation,
flies as swiftly before the imaginary, as before the
real danger. Often, indeed, is the morning's work
destroyed by the cracking of a decayed limb under
the nimble spring of the squirrel. The deer and
timid antelope will stop to gratify curiosity, the
hare scents the air for an instant, when alarmed,
before
it dashes off; but the turkey never speculates,
never wonders; suspicion of danger prompts it to
immediate
flight, as quickly as a reality.
The implements of the turkey-hunter are few and
simple; the call, generally made of the large
bone of the turkey's wing, and a sure rifle complete
the list. The double-barrel fowling-piece is used
when the game is plentiful, and requires little or no
science to hunt them, aim being taken at the head.
A turkey, wounded elsewhere than in the brain,
although
a rifle ball may have passed through its
body, seems to retain the power of locomotion in
the most remarkable manner, and will, when thus
crippled, run long enough, unless pursued by a dog,
to be lost to the hunter.
Where turkeys are plentiful and but little hunted,
indifferent persons succeed in killing them; of such
hunters we shall not speak. The bird changes its
habits somewhat with its haunts, growing wilder as
it is most pursued; it may therefore be said to be the
wildest of game. Gaining in wisdom according to
the necessity, it is a different bird where it is
constantly
sought for as game, from where it securely
lives in the untrodden solitude. The turkey will
therefore succeed at times in finding a home in
places comparatively thickly settled, and be so
seldom seen, that they are generally supposed to be
extinct. Under such circumstances, they fall victims
only to the very few hunters who may be said to
make a science of their pursuit. I rather think,
said a turkey-hunter, if you want to find a thing
very cunning
, you need not go to the fox or such
varmints; take a gobbler. I once hunted regular
after the same one for three years, and never saw
him twice. I knew the critter's `yelp' as well as I
know Music's, my old dear dog; and his track was
as plain to me as the trail of a log hauled through a
dusty road. I hunted the gobbler always in the
same `range,' and about the same `scratchins,'
and he got so, at last, that when I `called,' he would
run from me,
taking the opposite direction to my own
foot-tracks
. Now the old rascal kept a great deal
on a ridge, at the end of which, where it lost itself
in the swamp, was a hollow cypress tree.
Determined
to outwit him, I put on my shoes
heels
foremost
,
walked leisurely down the ridge, and got into
the hollow tree, and gave a `call,' and boys, said
the speaker exultingly, it would have done you
good to have seen that turkey coming towards me
on a trot, the fool looking at my tracks, and thinking
I had
gone the other way
.
Of all turkey-hunters, our friend W is the
most experienced; he is a bachelor, lives upon his
own plantation, studies, philosophizes, makes fishing
tackle, and kills turkeys. With him it is a science
reduced to certainty. Place him in the woods
where turkeys are, and he is as certain of their bodies
as if they were already in his possession. He
understands
the habits of the bird so well, that he will,
on his first essay, on a new hunting-ground, give
the exact character of the hunters the turkeys
have been accustomed to deal with. The most
crafty turkeys are those which W seeks,
hemmed in by plantations, inhabiting uncultivatable
land, and always in more or less danger of pursuit
and discovery, they become, under such
circumstances
,
beyond any game whatever wild. They seem
incapable of being deceived, and taking every thing
strange, as possessed to them of danger, whether a
moth out of season, or a veteran hunter, they
appear
to common, and even to uncommon observers,
annihilated from the country, were it not for their
footprints occasionally to be seen in the soft soil
beside the running stream, or in the light dust in
the beaten road.
A veteran gobbler, used to all the tricks of the
hunter's art, one who has had his wottles cut with
shot, against whose well-defended breast has struck
the spent ball of the rifle, one, who, although most
starved, would walk by the treasures of grain in the
trap and pen, a gobbler who will listen to
the plaintive note of the female until he has tried
its quavers, its length, its repetitions, by every rule
nature has given him, and then perhaps not answer,
except in a smothered voice for fear of being
deceived
.
Such a turkey will W select to break
a lance with, and, in spite of the chances against him,
win. We, then, here have the best specimen of
wild turkey-hunting, an exhibition of skill between
the perfection of animal instinct, and the superior
intellect of man.
The turkey-hunter, armed with his call, starts
into the forest, he bears upon his shoulder, the
trusty rifle. He is either informed of the presence
of turkeys, and has a particular place or bird in
view, or he makes his way cautiously along the
6*
banks of some running stream; his progress is slow
and silent; it may be that he unexpectedly hears
a noise, sounding like distant thunder; he then
knows that he is in close proximity of the game,
and that he has disturbed it to flight. When such
is the case his work is comparatively done.
We will, for illustration, select a more difficult
hunt. The day was towards noon, and the patient
hunter has met with no sign, when suddenly a
slight noise is heard, not unlike, to unpractised ears,
a thousand other woodland sounds; the hunter listens,
again the sound is heard, as if a pebble was dropped
into the bosom of a little lake. It may be that
woodpecker
,
who, desisting from his labours, has opened
his bill to yawnor, perchance, yonder little bird so
industriously scratching among the dead leaves of
that young holly. Again, precisely the same sound
is heard; yonder, high in the heavens, is a solitary
hawk, winging its way over the forests, its rude
scream etherealized, might come down to our ears
in just such a sound as made the turkey-hunter
listen
;
again the same note, now more distinct. The
quick ear of the hunter is satisfied; stealthily he
entrenches
himself behind a fallen tree, a few green
twigs are placed before him, from among which
protrudes the muzzle of his rifle. Thus prepared,
he takes his call, and gives one solitary
cluck
, so
exquisitely, that it chimes in with the running brook
and the rustling leaf.
It may be, that a half a mile off, if the place is
favourable to convey sound, is feeding a gobbler;
prompted by his nature, as he quietly scratches up
the herbage that conceals his food, he gives utterance
to the sounds that first attracted the hunter's
attention
.
Poor bird! he is bent on filling his crop; his
feelings are listless, common place; his wings are
away; his plumage on his breast seems soiled with
rain, his wattles are contracted and pale,look, he
starts, every feather is instantly in its place, he raises
his delicate game-looking head full four feet from
the ground, and listens; what an eye, what a stride
is suggested by that lifted foot! gradually the head
sinks; again the bright plumage grows dim, and
with a low
cluck
, he resumes his search for food.
The treasures of the American forest are before him;
the choice pecan-nut is neglected for that immense
grub-worm that rolls down the decayed stump,
too large to crawl,now that grasshopper is nabbed,
presently a hill of ants presents itself, and the bird
leans over it, peering down the tiny hole of its
entrance
,
out of which are issuing the industrious
insects
,
with wondering curiosity. Again that
cluck
greets his ear, up rises the head with lightning
swiftness
,
the bird starts forward a pace or two, looks
around in wonder, and answers back. No sound is
heard but the falling acorn, and it fairly echoes, as
it rattles from limb to limb, and dashes off to the
ground. The bird is uneasy, he picks pettishly,
smooths down his feathers, elevates his head slowly,
and then brings it to the earth; raises his wings as
if for flight, jumps upon the limb of a fallen tree,
looks about, settles down finally into a brownstudy,
and evidently commences thinking. An hour may
elapse, and he has resolved the matter over; his
imagination has become inflamed, he has heard
just enough to
wish to hear more
; he is satisfied that
no turkey-hunter uttered the sounds that reached his
ear, for they were
too few, and far between
, and there
rises up in his mind some disconsolate mistress, and
he gallantly flies down from his low perch, gives
his body a swaggering motion, and utters a distinct
and prolonged
cluck
, significant of both surprise and
joy. On the instant the dead twigs near by crack
beneath a heavy tread, and he starts off under the
impression he is caught; but the meanderings of
some poor cow inform him of his mistake.
Composing
himself, he listens, ten minutes since he
challenged
,
when a low cluck in the distance reaches his
ears.
Now, our gobbler is an old bird, and has escaped
with his life by a miracle several times He has
grown very cunning, indeed. He don't roost two
successive nights on the same tree, so that daylight
never exposes him to the hunter, who has hidden
himself away in the night, to catch him in the
morning's
dawn. He never gobbles without running a
short distance at least, as if alarmed at his own
noise. He presumes every thing suspicious, and
dangerous naturally, and his experience has
heightened
the instinct. Twice, when young, was he
coaxed within gunshot, but got clear by some fault
of the percussion caps. After that, was he fooled by
an idle school-boy, who was a kind of ventriloquist,
and would have been killed, had not the urchin's
gun been overloaded. Three times did he only
escape death by heedlessly wandering with his
thoughtless fellows. Once was he caught in a
pen, and got out by an overlooked hole in its
top. Three feathers of his last year's tail, decayed
under the weight of a spring-trap. He is, in fact,
a very deep bird, and will sit and plume
himself
,
when common hunters are about, tooting away,
but never so wisely as to deceive him twice.
They all reveal themselves by overstepping the
modesty
of nature, and
woo him too much:
his loves are
more coy, far less intrusive. Poor bird! he does
not know that W is spreading his snare for him,
and is even then so sure of his victim, as to be
revolving
in his mind whether his goodly carcass
should be a present to a married friend, or be served
up in savoury fumes from his own bachelor, but
hospitable
board.
The last
cluck
heard by the gobbler fairly roused
him, and he presses foward; at one time he runs
with speed, then stops as if not yet quite satisfied;
something turns him back; still he lingers only for a
moment in his course, until coming to a running
stream, where he will have to fly; the exertion seems
too much for him. Stately parading in the full
sunshine
,
he walks along the margin of the clear stream,
admiring his fine person as it is reflected in the
sylvan
mirror, and then, like some vain lover, tosses his
head, as if to say, let them come to me. The
listless gait is resumed, expressive that the chase is
given up. Gaining the ascent of a low bank, that
lines the stream he has just deserted, he stops at the
foot of a young beech; in the green moss that fills
the interstices of the otherwise smooth bank is hid
away a cricket; the turkey picks at it, without
catching
it; something annoys him. Like the slipper of
Cinderella, to the imagination of the young prince,
or the glimpses of a waving ringlet, or a jewelled
hand to the glowing passions of the young heart, is
the remembrance of that sound, that now full two
hours since was first heard by our hero, and has been,
in that long time, but
twice
repeated. He
speculates
that in the shady woods that surround
him, there must wander a mate; solitary she plucks
her food, and calls for me; the monster man,
impatiently
of his prey, doles not out his music so
softly or so daintily. I am not deceived, and by my
ungallant fears, she will be won by another
cluck
.
How well-timed the call. The gobbler entirely off
his guard, contracts himself, opens wide his mouth,
and rolls forth, fearlessly, a volume of sound for his
answer. The stream is crossed in a flutter, the toes
scarce indent themselves in the soft ground over
which they pass. On, on they plunge, until their
owner's caution again brings them to a halt. We
could almost wish that so fine a bird might escape,
that there might be given one call too much, one
that grated unnaturally on the poor bird's ear; but not
so; they lead him to his doom, filling his mind with
hope and love.
To the bird there is one strange incongruity in
the call, never before has he gone so far with so
little success; but the note is perfect, the time most
nicely given. Again he rolls forth a loud response,
and listens, yet no answer, his progress is slow. The
cluck
again greets his ear; there was a slight quaver
attached to it this time, like the forming of a second
note he is nearing his object of pursuit, and, with
an energetic call; he rushes forward, his long neck
stretched, and his head moving inquiringly from
side to side. No longer going round the various
obstacles he meets with in his path, but flying over
them as if impatiently, he comes to open ground,
and stops.
Some six hundred yards from where he stands
may be seen a fallen tree, you can observe some
green brush that looks as if it grew out of the very
decayed wood; in this brush is hidden away the
deadly rifle, and its muzzle is protruding towards
the open ground. Behind it is the hunter, flat upon
the ground, yet so placed that the weapon is at his
shoulder. He seems to be as dead as the tree in
front of him. Could you watch him closely, you
would perceive he scarcely winks for fear of
alarming
his game. The turkey, still in his exposed
situation, gobbles on the instant the hunter raises his
call to his lips, and gives a prolonged
cluck
, loud
and shrill, the first that could really be construed by
the turkey into a direct answer. The noble bird,
now certain of success, fairly dances with delight;
he starts forward, his feathers and neck amorously
playing as he advances; now he commences his
strut; his slender body swells, the beautifully
plumage of his breast unfolds itself, his neck curves,
drawing the head downward, the wattles grow scarlet,
while the skin that covers the head changes like
rainbow tints. The long feathers of the wings brush
the ground, the tail rises and opens into a
semicircle
,
the gorgeously coloured head becomes
beautifully
relieved in its centre. On he comes, with a
hitching gait, glowing in the sunshine in purple and
gold. The siren
cluck
is twice repeated; he
contracts
his form to the smallest dimensions; upwards
rises the head to the highest point; he stands upon
his very toes, and looks suspiciously around; fifty
yards of distance protects him from the rifle: he
even condescends to pick about. What a trial for the
expecting hunter! how does he recollect that one
breath too much has spoiled a morning's work!
The minutes wear on, and the bird again becomes
the
caller;
he gobbles, opens his form, and when fully
bloomed out, the enchanting
cluck
greets his ear;
on he comes, like the gay horse, towards the
inspiring
music of the drum, or like a gallant bark
beating
against the wind, gallantly but slowly.
The dark cold barrel of the rifle is now not
more silent than is its owner; the game is playing
just outside the very edge of its deadly reach; the
least mistake and it is gone. One gentle zephyr,
one falling twig, might break the charm, and make
nature revolt at the coyness apparent in the supposed
mistress, and the lover would wing his way full of
life to the woods. But on he comes, so still is every
thing that you can hear his wings as they brush the
ground, singularly plain, while the sun plays in
conflicting
rays and coloured lights about his gaudily
bronzed plumage.
The woods ring in echoing circles back upon you,
the sharp report of the rifle is heard; out starts,
alarmed by the noise, a blue jay, who squalls as he
passes in waving lines before you, so suddenly
wakened
was he from his sleep. But our rare and
beautiful
bird, our gallant and noble bird, our cunning
and game bird, where is he? The glittering
plumage
,
the gay step, the bright eye, all are gone,
without
a movement of the muscles, he has fallen a
headless
body to the earth.
7
THE
WATER CRAFT OF THE BACKWOODS.
Starting
among the volcanic precipices, eternal
snows, and arid deserts of the Rocky mountains,
the Snake river winds its sinuous way towards the
Pacific; at one time rushing headlong through deep
gorges of mountains, and at another time spreading
itself out in still lakes, as it sluggishly advances
through every varying scenes of picturesque grandeur
and of voluptuous softness. In all this variety, the
picture only changes from the beautiful to the
sublime
;
while the eye of the civilized intruder, as it
speculates on the future, can see on the Snake river,
the city, the village, and the castle, in situations
more interesting and romantic than they have yet
pretended themselves to the world. The solitary
trapper, and the wild Indian, are now the sole
inhabitants
of its beautiful shores; the wigwams of
the aborigines, the temporary lodge of the hunter,
and the cunning beaver, rear themselves almost side
by side, and nature reposes, like a virgin bride in
all her beauty and loveliness, soon to be stripped of
her natural charms, to fulfil new offices, with a new
existence. On an abrupt bank of this beautiful
stream, overlooking the surrounding landscape for
miles, a spot of all others to be selected for a site
of beauty and defence, might be seen a few lodges
of the Wallawallah Indians. On the opposite shore
stood a fine young warrior, decked with all the
tinsel gewgaws his savage fancy suggested to catch
the love of his mistress. With stealthy step he opened
the confused undergrowth that lined the banks,
taking
therefrom a delicate paddle. He searched in
vain, until the truth flashed upon him that some rival
had stolen his canoe. Readily would he have dashed
into the bosom of the swollen river, and, as another
Leander, sought another Hero; but his dress was
not to be spoiled. Like a chafed lion he walked
along the shore, his bosom alternately torn by rage,
love, and vanity, when, far up the bank, he saw a
herd of buffalo slaking their thirst in the running
stream. Seizing his bow and arrow, with noiseless
step he stole upon his victim, and the unerring shaft
soon brought it to the earth, struggling with agonies
of death. It was only the work of an adept to strip
off the skin, and spread it on the ground. Upon it
were soon laid the gayly-wrought moccasins, leggins,
and hunting-shirt, the trophies of honourable warfare,
and the skins of birds of beautiful plumage. The
corners of the hide were then brought together,
tied with thongs. The bundle was set afloat upon
the stream, and its owner dashed in its rear,
guiding
it to the opposite shore with its contents
unharmed
.
Again decking himself, and bearing his
wooing tokens before him, he leapt with the
swiftness
of a deer to the lodge that contained his mistress,
leaving the simplest of all the water-craft of the
backwoods to decay upon the ground.
The helplessness of age, the appealing eyes and
the hands of infancy, the gallantry of the lover,
hostile
excursions of a tribe, are natural incentives to
the savage mind to improve upon the mere bundle of
inanimated things, that could be safely floated upon
the water. To enlarge this bundle, to build up its
sides, would be his study and delight; and we have
next in the list of backwoods craft, what is styled
by the white man, the buffalo-skin boat. This
craft is particularly the one of the prairie country,
where the materials for its construction are always
to be found, and where its builders are always
expert
.
A party of Indians find themselves upon the
banks of some swift and deep river; there is no
timber to be seen for miles around, larger than a
common walking-stick. The Indians are loaded
with plunder, for they have made a successful
incursion
into the territory of some neighbouring tribe,
and cannot trust their effects in the water; or they
are perchance emigrating to a favourite
hunting-ground
,
and have with them all their domestic
utensils, their squaws and children. A boat is
positively necessary, and it must be made of the
materials at hand. A fire is kindled, and by it is
laid a number of long slender poles, formed by
trimming
off the limbs of the saplings growing on the
margin of the stream. While this is going on,
some of the braves start in pursuit of buffalo. Two
of the stoutest bulls met with are killed and stripped
of their skins. These skins are then sewed together.
The poles having been well heated, the longest is
selected and bent into the proper form for a keel;
the ribs are then formed and lashed transversely to
it, making what would appear to be the skeleton of
a large animal. This skeleton is then placed upon
the hairy side of the buffalos' skins, when they are
drawn round the frame and secured by holes cut in
the skin, and hitched on to the ribs. A little pounded
slippery-elm bark is used to caulk the seams, and
small pieces of wood, cut with a thread-like screw,
are inserted in the arrow or bullet holes of the hide.
Thus, in the course of two or three hours, a
handsome
and durable boat is completed, capable of
carrying eight or ten men with comfort and safety.
Passing from the prairie, we come to the thick
forest, and there we find the perfect water-craft of
the backwoodsof variety of the canoe. The
inhabitant
of the woods never dreams of a boat made
of skins; he looks to the timber for a conveyance.
Skilled in the knowledge of plants, he knows the
exact time when the bark of the tree will readily
unwrap from its native trunk. And from this simple
material he forms the most beautiful craft that sits
upon the water. The rival clubs that sport their
boats upon the Thames, or ply them in the harbour of
Mannahatta, like things of lifeformed as they are by
the highest scientific knowledge and perfect manual
skill of the two greatest naval nations in the worldare
thrown in the shade by the beautiful and simple bark
canoe, made by the rude hatchet and knife of the
red man. The American forest is filled with trees
whose bark can be appropriated to the making
of canoes. The pecan, all the hickories, with the
birch, grow there in infinite profusion. A tree of
7*
one of these species, that presents a trunk clear of
limbs for fifteen or twenty feet, is first selected. The
artisan has nothing but a rude hunting-knife and
tomahawk for the instruments of his craft. With the
latter he girdles the bark near the root of the tree;
this done, he ascends to the proper height, and there
makes another girdle; then taking his knife, and
cutting through the bark downwards, he separates
it entirely from the trunk.
Ascending the tree again, he inserts his knife
under the bark, and turning it up, soon forces it with
his hand until he can use a more powerful lever.
Once well started, he will worm his body between
the bark and the trunk, and thus tear it off, throwing
it upon the ground like an immense scroll. The
ross, or outside of the bark, is scraped off until
it is smooth; the scull is then opened, and braces
inserted to give the proper width to the gunnels of
the canoe. Strong cords are then made from the
bark of the linn tree or hickory, the open ends of
the bark scroll are pressed together and fastened
between clamps, the clamps secured by the cord. If
the canoe be intended only for a temporary use, the
clamps are left on. A preparation is then made of deer
tallow and pounded charcoal, and used in the place of
pitch to fill up the seams, and the boat is complete;
but if time permit, and the canoe be wanted for
ornament
,
as well as for use, then the clamps are
displaced
by sewing together the ends of the bark.
This simple process produces the most beautiful
model of a boat that can be imagined; art cannot
embellish the form, or improve upon the simple
mechanism
of the backwoods. Every line in it is
graceful. Its sharp bow, indeed, seems almost
designed
to clear the air as well as water, so perfectly
does it embrace every scientific requisite for
overcoming
the obstructions of the element in which it is
destined to move. In these apparently frail
machines
,
the red man, aided by a single paddle, will
thread the quiet brook and deep running river, speed
over the glassy lake like a swan, and shoot through
the foaming rapids as sportively as the trout; and
when the storm rages and throws the waves
heavenward
,
and the lurid clouds seem filled with molten
fire, you will see the Indian, like a spirit of the storm,
at one time standing out in bold relief against the
lightning-riven sky, and then disappearing in the
watery gulf, rivalling the gull in the gracefulness of
his movements, and rejoicing like the petrel in the
confusion of the elements.
The articles used in savage life, like all the works
of nature, are simple, and yet perfectly adapted to
the purposes for which they are designed. The most
ingenious and laborious workman, aided by the most
perfect taste, cannot possibly form a vessel so general
in its use, so excellent in its ends, as the calibash.
The Indian finds it suspended in profusion in every
glade of his forest home; spontaneous in its growth,
and more effectually protected from destruction from
animals, through a bitter taste, than by any artificial
barrier whatever. So with all the rest of his
appropriations
from nature's hands. His mind scarcely
ever makes an effort, and consequently seldom
improves
.
The simple buffalo skin, that forms a protection
for the trifles of an Indian lover when he would
bear them safely across the swollen stream, compared
with the gorgeous barge that conveyed Egypt's queen
down the Nile to meet Antony, seems immeasurably
inferior in skill and contrivance. Yet the galley of
Cleopatra, with all its gay trappings and its silken
sails glittering in the sun, was as far inferior to a
ship of the line as the Indian's rude bundle to the
barge of Cleopatra. Imagination may go back to
some early period, when the naked Phnician
sported upon a floating log; may mark his progress,
as the inviting waters of the Mediterranean prompted
him to more adventurous journeys; and in time see
him astonishing his little world, by fearlessly
navigating
about the bays, and coasting along the whole
length of his native home. How many ages after
this was it, that the invading fleets of classic Greece
proud fleets, indeed, on which the gods themselves
were interestedwere pulled ashore as now the
fisherman
secures his little skiff? Admire the proud
battle-ship riding upon the waves, forming a safe
home for thousands, now touching the clouds with
its sky-reaching masts, and then descending safely
into the deep. With what power and majesty does
it dash the intruding waves from its prow, and rush
on in the very teeth of the winds! Admire it as the
wonder of human skill; then go back through the
long cycle of years, and see how many centuries
have elapsed in thus perfecting it; then examine
the most elaborate craft of our savage life, and the
antiquity of their youth will be impressed upon you.
PICTURES OF BUFFALO HUNTING.
The
buffalo is decidedly one of the noblest victims
that is sacrificed to the ardour of the sportsman. There
is a massiveness about his form, and a magnificence
associated with his home, that give him a peculiar
interest. No part of North America was originally
unoccupied by the buffalo. Where are now cities
and towns, is remembered as their haunts; but they
have kept with melancholy strides before the march
of civilization, and now find a home, daily more
exposed and invaded, only on that division of our
continent west of the Mississippi. In the immense
wilds that give birth to the waters of the Missouri,
on the vast prairies that stretch out like inland seas
between the great lakes and the Pacific, and
extend
towards the tropics until they touch the foot
of the Cordilleras, the buffalo roams still wild and
free. Yet the day of his glory is past. The
Anglo-Saxon
,
more wanton of place than the savage
himself
,
possessed of invincible courage and unlimited
resources, and feeling adventure a part of life itself,
has already penetrated the remotest fastnesses, and
wandered over the most extended plains. Where
the live lightning leaps from rock to rock, opening
yawning caverns to the dilating eye, or spends its
fury upon the desert, making it a sheet of fire, there
have been his footsteps, and there has the buffalo
smarted beneath his prowess, and kissed the earth.
The child of fortune from the old world, the
favourite of courts, has abandoned his home and
affections
,
and sought, among these western wilds, the
enjoyment of nature in her own loveliness. The
American hunter frolics over them as a boy
enjoying
his Saturday sport. The Indian, like his fathers,
never idle, scours the mountain and the plain; and
men of whatever condition here meet
equal, as
sportsmen
, and their great feats of honour and of
arms are at the sacrifice of the buffalo.
In their appearance, the buffalos present a
singular
mixture of the ferocious and comical. At a first
glance they excite mirth; they appear to be the
sleek-blooded kine, so familiar to the farm-yard,
muffled about the shoulders in a coarse shawl, and
wearing a mask and beard, as if in some outlandish
disguise. Their motions, too, are novel. They dash
off, tail up, shaking their great woolly heads, and
planting their feet under them, with a swinging gait
and grotesque precision, that suggests the notion,
that they are a jolly set of dare-devils, fond of fun
and extravagances, and disposed to have their jokes
at the expense of all dignity of carriage, and the
good opinion of the grave portion of the world.
Upon nearer examination, you quail before the deep
destructive instinct expressed in the eye; the shaggy
mane distends, and shows the working of muscles
fairly radiant with power; the fore-foot dashes into
the hard turf, and furrows it, as if yielding water;
the tail waves in angry curves; the eyeballs fill
with blood, and with bellowing noise that echoes
like the thunder, the white foam covers the shaggy
jaws. Then the huge form grows before you into
a mountain, then is animal sublimity before you, a
world of appetite without thought, and force without
reason.
Standing on one of the immense prairies of the
south-west, you look out upon what seems to be
the green waving swell of the sea, suddenly
congealed
,
and it requires but little fancy to imagine,
when the storm-cloud sweeps over it, and the rain
dashes in torrents against it, and the fierce winds
bear down upon it, that the magic that holds it
immovable
may be broken, and leave you helpless on
the billowy wave. On such an expanse, sublime
from its immensity, roams the buffalo, in numbers
commensurate with the extent, not unfrequently
covering the landscape, until their diminishing forms
mingle in the opposite horizons, like mocking
spectres. Such is the arena of sport, and such in
quantity is the game.
To the wild Indian the buffalo hunt awakens the
soul as absorbingly as the defying yell on the
war-path
.
With inflated nostril and distended eye, he
dashes after his victim, revelling in the fruition of
all the best hopes of his existence, and growing in
his conceits of his favour with the Great Spirit.
To the rude white hunter, less imaginative than the
savage, the buffalo hunt is the high consummation
of his habit and power to destroy. It gratifies his
ambition, and feasts his appetite; his work is tangible;
he feels, hears, tastes, and sees it; it is the very
unloosing
of all the rough passions of our nature, with
the conscience entirely at rest. To the sportsman,
who is matured in the constraint of cities and in the
artificial modes of enlightened society, and who retains
within his bosom the leaven of our coarser nature,
the buffalo hunt stirs up the latent fires repressed by
a whole life; they break out with an ardour, and
he enters into the chase with an abandonment, that,
while it gratifies every animal sense possessed by
the savage and hunter, opens a thousand other
avenues of high enjoyment known only to the
cultivated
and refined mind.
INDIAN BUFFALO HUNTERS.
Among the Indians there are but few ways to
kill the buffalo; yet there are tribes who display
more skill than others, and seem to bring more
intellect
to bear in the sport. The Cumanches in the
south, and the Sioux in the north, are, from their
numbers, warlike character, and wealth, among the
aborigines,
the buffalo hunters
. The Cumanches in
winter inhabit one of the loveliest countries in the
world. While their summer haunts are covered
with snow, and desolated with storm, they are
travelling over the loveliest herbage, variegated with
a thousand perfumed flowers, that yield fragrance
under the crush of the foot. The wide savannas,
that are washed by the Trinity and Brasos rivers,
are everywhere variegated with clumps of live oak
trees, among which you involuntarily look for the
mansion of some feudal lord. Here are realized
almost
the wildest dreams of the future to the red man;
and here the Cumanches, strong in numbers, and
rich in the spontaneous productions of their native
land, walk proud masters, and exhibit savage
life in some of the illusive charms we throw around
it while bringing a refined imagination to view such
life in the distance. Thousands of this tribe of
Indians will sometimes be engaged at one time in a
buffalo hunt. In their wanderings about the prairies,
they will leave trails, worn like a long-travelled
road. Following the scouts, until the vicinity
of the animal is proclaimed, and then selecting a
halting place, favourable for fuel and water, the
ceremonies preparatory to a hunt take place. Then
are commenced, with due solemnity, the prayers of
the priests. The death-defying warrior, who curls
his finger in his scalp-lock in derision before his
enemies, bows in submission to the Invisible
presence
that bestows on the red man the great game
he is about to destroy. The fastings, prayers, and
self-sacrifices being finished, the lively excitement
of the chase commences.
The morning sun greets the hunter divested of
all unnecessary clothing,
his arrows numbered
, his
harness in order; a plume floats from his crown,
his long hair streams down his back, his
well-trained
horse, as wild as himself, anticipates the
sport, and paws with impatience the ground. Far,
far in the horizon are moving about, in black masses,
the game; and with an exulting whoop, a party
starts off
with the wind
, dash across the prairie, and
are soon out of sight.
8
The buffalo is a wary animal; unwieldy as he
appears, he has a quick motion, and he takes the
alarm, and at the approach of a human being,
instinctively
flies. An hour or two may elapse, when
the distant masses of buffalo begin to move. There
is evident alarm spreading through the ranks.
Suddenly
they fly! Then it is that thousands of fleet
and impatient horsemen, like messengers of the
wind, dash off
and meet the herds
. The party first
sent out are pressing them in the rear; confusion
seizes upon the alarmed animals, and they scatter in
every direction over the plain. Now the hunters
select their victims, and the blood is up. On speeds
the Indian and his horse. The long mane mingles
with the light garments of the rider, and both seem
instigated by the same instinct and spirit. On
plunges the unwieldy object of pursuit, shaking his
shaggy head, as if in despair of his safety. The
speed of the horse soon overtakes the buffalo. The
rider, dropping his rein, plucks an arrow from his
quiver, presses his knees to the horse's sides, draws
his bow, and with unerring aim, drives the delicate
shaft into the vitals of the huge animal, who rushes
on a few yards, curls his tail upwards, falters, falls
on his face, and dies. An exulting shout announces
the success, and the warrior starts off after another;
and if he has performed his task well,
every bow that
has twanged
marks the ownership of a huge carcass
upon the sea of the prairie, as sacredly as the
waiffe of the whaleman his victim on the sea itself.
Thus, when the day's sport is over, every arrow is
returned to its owner. If two have been used to kill
the same animal, or any are wanting, having been
carried away in mere flesh wounds, the want of
skill is upbraided, and the unfortunate hunter shrinks
from the sarcasms and observation of the successful
with shame.
Following the hunter are the women, the
labourers
of the tribe. To them is allotted the task of
tearing off the skin, selecting the choice pieces of
flesh, and preserving what is not immediately
consumed
.
Then follows the great feast. The Indian
gluts himself with marrow and fatness, his eyes
so bright with the fire of sport are glazed with
bestiality, and he spends days and nights in
wasteful
extravagance, trusting to the abundance of nature
to take care of the future. Such are the general
characteristics of the buffalo hunt; and the view
applies with equal truth to all the different tribes
who pursue, as a distinct and powerful people, this
noble game.
An Indian armed for the buffalo hunt, and his
horse, form two of the most romantic and picturesque
of beings. The little dress he wears is beautifully
arranged about his person, disclosing the muscles
of the shoulder and chest. Across his back is slung
his quiver of arrows, made from the skin of some
wild animal; his long bow, slightly arched by the
sinewy string, is used gracefully as a rest to his
extended
arm. The horse, with a fiery eye, a mane
that waves over his front like drapery and falls in
rakish masses across his wide forehead, a sweeping
tail ornamented with the brilliant plumage of
tropical
birds, champs on his rude bit, and arches his
neck with impatience, as the scent of the game
reaches his senses. Frequently will the two pass
along, the rider's body thrown back, and the horse
bounding gracefully along, as if in emulation of the
equestrians portrayed upon the Elgin marbles. Then
they may be seen dashing off with incredible
swiftness
,
a living representation of the centaur; and as
one of these wild horses and wilder men, viewed
from below, stand in broad relief against the clear
sky, you see a living statue that art has not
accomplished
.
The exultation of such a warrior, in the
excitement of a buffalo hunt, rings in silvery tones
across the plain, as if in his lungs was the music
of a well-chosen pack; the huge victims of
pursuit
,
as they hear it, impel on their bodies with
redoubled
speed, as if they knew there was a hurricane
of death in the cry.
A HUNTING-PARTY.
Take a hunting-party of fifty warriors, starting
on a buffalo hunt. Imagine a splendid fall morning
in the southern part of the buffalo grounds. The
sun rises over the prairie, like a huge illuminated
ball; it struggles on through the mists, growing
gradually brighter in its ascent, breaking its way
into the clear atmosphere in long reaching rays,
dispelling
the mists in wreathing columns, and starting
up currents of air to move them sportively about;
slowly they ascend and are lost in the ether above.
You discover before you, and under you, a rich and
beautifully variegated carpet, crowded with and
enamelled by a thousand flowers, glistening with the
pearly drops of dew, as the horizontal rays of the
sun reach them. Here and there are plants of higher
growth, as if some choice garden had been stripped
of its enclosures: shrubbery waves the pendant
blossom
,
and wastes a world of sweetness on the desert
air. Among these flowery coverts will be seen
browsing
the graceful deer and antelope. Far before you
are the long dark lines of the buffalo. In the centre
of the group feed the cows and calves. Upon the
outside are the sturdy bulls: some, with their mouths
to the ground, are making it shake with their rough
roar; others sportively tear up the turf with their
horns; others, not less playful, are rushing upon each
other's horns with a force that sends them reeling to
the ground. Animal enjoyment seems rife, as they
turn their nostrils upwards and snuff in the balmy
air and greet the warm sun, little dreaming that
around them are circling the sleek Indian, wilder,
more savage, and more wary than themselves.
Fancy these Indians, prompted by all the habits
and feelings of the hunter and warrior, mingling in
the sport the desire to distinguish themselves, as on
a field of honour, little less only in importance than
the war-path. With characters of high repute to
sustain, or injured reputations to build up, of victory
for the ear of love, of jealousy, of base passions, and
a thirst of blood, and you will have some idea of the
promptings of the hearts of those about to engage in
the chase.
The time arrives. The parties already out are
driving
the herd towards the starting-place of the
warriors
.
8*
They have sent up their war-cry in one united
whoop, that has startled the feeding monsters, as if
the lightning had fallen among them. With a
fearful
response, they shake their heads, and
simultaneously
start off. The fearful whoop meets them at
every point. Confusion seizes upon the herd. The
sport has begun. In every direction you see the
unequal
chase; the Indians seem multiplied into
hundreds
;
the plain becomes dotted over with the dying
animals, and the whoop rings in continuous shouts
upon the air, as if the fiends themselves were loose.
Now you see a single warrior: before him is
rushing
a buffalo which shows, from his immense size, that
he was one of the masters of the herd: his pursuer
is a veteran hunter, known far and near for his
prowess
.
Yonder go some twenty buffalos of every size,
pursued by three or four tyros, yet who know not
the art of separating their victim from the herd.
Yonder goes a bull, twice shot at, yet only wounded
in the flesh: some one will have to gather wood
with the women for his want of skill. There goes
an old chief: his leggins are trimmed with the hair
of twenty scalps, taken from the heads of the very
Indians on whose grounds he was hunting buffalo:
he is a great warrior; he sings that his bow unbent
is a great tree that he alone can bend. See the
naked arm, and the ridgid muscles, as he draws the
arrow to the
very head:
the bull vomits blood, and
falls: beyond him, on the grass, is the arrow; it
passed through where a rifle ball would have stopped
and flattened, ere it had made half the journey.
Here are two buffalo bulls side by side; they make
the earth tremble by their measured tread; their sides
are reeking with sweat. Already have they been
singled out. Approaching them are two horsemen;
upon the head of one glistens the silvery hair of age;
the small leggins also betray the old man: the other
is just entering the prime of life; every thing about
him is sound, full, and sleek. The eyes of one
dance with excitement, the blood flows quickly
through the dark skin, and gives a feverish look to
the lip and cheek. The other, the old man, has
his mouth compressed into a mere line; the eye is
open and steady as a basilisk, the skin inanimate.
What a tale is told in these differences of look! how
one seems reaching into the future, and the other
going back to the past! He of the flushed cheek
touches his quiver, the bow is bent, the arrow speeds
its way and penetrates its victim. The old man, he
too takes an arrow, slowly he places it across his
bow, then bending it as if to make its ends meet, he
leans forwardsends the arrow homethe bull falls,
while the first wounded one pursues his way. The
old man gives a taunting shout, as the token of his
success. The young warrior, confused by his want
of skill, and alarmed lest his aged rival should
complete
the work he so bunglingly began, unguardedly
presses too near the bull, who, smarting with his
wound, turns upon his heels, and, with one mad
plunge, tears out the bowels of the steed, and rolls
him and rider on the ground. He next rushes at the
rider. The Indian, as wary as the panther, springs
aside, and the bull falls headlong on the ground.
Ere he recovers himself the bow is again bent, the
flint-headed arrow strikes the hard rib, splits it
asunder
,
and enters the heart. The old warrior has
looked on with glazed eye and expressionless face.
The young man feels that he has added no laurels to
his brow, for an arrow has been spent in vain, and
his steed killed under him.
There goes a brave with a bow by his side,
and his right hand unoccupied. He presses his horse
against the very sides of the animal which he is
pursuing
.
Now he leans forward until he seems hidden
between the buffalo and his horse. He rises; a gory
arrow is in his hand; he has plucked it from a flesh
wound at full speed, and while in luck has, with
better aim, brought his victim to the earth. The
sun is now fairly in its zenith: the buffalos that have
escaped are hurrying away, with a speed that will
carry them miles beyond the hunter's pursuit. The
Indians are coming in from the field. The horses
breathe hard, and are covered with foam. The faces
of the Indians are still lit up with excitement, that
soon will pass away, and leave them cold and
expressionless
.
The successful hunters spare not the gibe
and joke at the expense of the unfortunate. Slowly
they wend their way back to the encampment;
their work is done.
The squaws, who, like vultures, have been
following
in the rear, have already commenced their
disgusting
work. The maiden is not among them;
slavery commences only with married life; but the
old, the wrinkled, the viragoes and vixens, are
tearing
off the skins, jerking the meat, gathering together
the marrow-bones, and the humps, the tongues, and
the pouch; and before the sun has fairly set, they are
in the camp with the rewards of the day's hunt.
The plain, so beautiful in the morning, is scattered
over with bodies already offensive with decay; the
grass is torn up, the flowers destroyed, and the wolf
and buzzard and the carrion-crow are disputing for
the loathsome meal, while their already gorged
appetites
seem bursting with repletion.
OUR FIRST BUFFALO STEAK.
On the confines of the buffalo hunting-grounds,
migrated a family, consisting of a strange mixture
of enterprise and idleness, of ragged-looking men
and homely women. They seemed to have all the
bad habits of the Indians, with none of their
redeeming
qualities. They were willing to live without
labour, and subsist upon the bounties of nature.
Located
in the fine climate of Northern Texas, the
whole year was to them little else than a continued
spring, and the abundance of game with which they
were surrounded afforded what seemed to them all
the comforts of life. The men never exerted
themselves
except when hunger prompted, or a spent
magazine made the acquisition of peltries
necessary
to barter for powder and ball. A more lazy,
contemptible set of creatures never existed, and we
would long since have forgotten them, had not our
introduction to them associated itself with
our first
buffalo steak
.
It was a matter of gratulation to my companions
as well as myself, that, after sleeping on the open
prairies, over which we had been travelling for many
days, we discovered ahead of us what evinced the
location of a squatter. A thousand recollections
of the comforts of civilized life pressed upon us
before
we reached the abode. We speculated upon the
rich treat of delicacies which we should enjoy. A
near inspection at once dispelled our illusions.
A large rudely-constructed shed, boarded up on the
northern side, was all we found. Upon nearer
examination
,
it appeared that this shed was the
common dwelling-place of the people described
above, with the addition of two cows, several goats,
poultry, and, as we soon after discovered, three
horses. Immediately around the caravansera the
prairie grass struggled for a sickly growth. As you
entered it, you found yourself growing deeper and
deeper in a fine dust, that had been in the course of
time worked out of the soil. Some coarse blankets
were suspended through the enclosure, as retiring
rooms for the women. On the ground were strewn
buffalo skins, from which the animal inhabitants kept
aloof. We entered without seeing a human being.
After some delay, however, a little nondescript, with
a white sunburnt head, thrust aside the blankets,
and hallooed out, They ain't injuns. The mother
then showed herself. She was as far removed from
feminine as possible, and appeared as unmoved at
our presence as the post that sustained the roof of
her house. We asked for lodging and food; she
nodded a cold assent and disappeared. Not disposed
to be fastidious, we endeavoured to make ourselves
as comfortable as possible, and wait for the
developement
of coming events. In the course of an hour a
woman younger than the first made her appearance,
somewhat attractive because younger. On hearing
the detail of our wants, she wrinkled her soiled
visage into a distorted smile, and told us that the
men would soon be home with buffalo meat,
and then our wants should be attended to.
Whatever might have been our disappointment
at what we saw around us, the name of buffalo meat
dispelled it all. The great era in our frontier
wanderings
was about to commence, and with smiles
from our party that for expression would have done
credit to rival belles, we lounged upon the skins
upon the ground. It is needless for us to say what
were our ideas of the men, soon to make their
appearance. Buffalo hunters of course, tall,
fine-looking
fellows, active as cats, mounted upon wild
steeds, armed with terrible rifles, and all the
paraphernalia
of the hunter's art. The Dutch angels, that
figure so conspicuously on many a gem of art in the
Lowlands, are certainly not farther removed
from the beautiful creations of Milton, than were
the buffalo hunters that we saw from the standard
our imagination and reading had conjured up.
Two short, ill-formed men, with bow-legs, long
bodies, and formidable shocks of red hair, destitute
of intelligence, clothed in skins, and moving with
shuffling gaits, were the realities of our conceptions.
Whatever might have been the charms of their faces,
our admiration was absorbed in viewing their nether
garments. They were made of undressed deer-skin,
the hair worn outside. When first made, they were
of the length of pantaloons, but the drying qualities
of the sun had, in course of time, no doubt
imperceptibly
to the wearers, shortened them into the
dignity of breeches. To see these worthies standing
up was beyond comparison ridiculous. They seemed
to have had immense pummels fastened to their
knees and seats. Under other circumstances, the
tailor craft of the frontier would have elicited great
merriment; but a starving stomach destroys jokes.
Courtesies suitable were exchanged, and the
preliminaries
for a hearty meal agreed upon, the basis of
which was to be
buffalo steaks
.
A real buffalo steak! eaten in the very grounds
which the animal inhabits! What romance! what a
diploma of a sportsman's enterprise! Whatever
might have been my disappointment in the hunters,
I knew that meat was meat, and that the immutable
laws of nature would not fail, though my notions
of the romantic in men were entirely disappointed.
A promise that our wants should soon be supplied
brought us to that unpleasant time, in every-day life,
that prefaces an expected and wished-for meal.
Seated, like barbarians, upon the floor, myself and
companions had the pleasing mental operation of
calculating how little the frontier family we were
visiting were worth for any moral quality, and the
physical exercise of keeping off, as much as possible,
thousands of fleas and other noxious insects that
composed
part of the dust in which we sat. While thus
disposed of, the hunters were busy in various ways
about the premises, and received from us the
elegant
names of Bags and Breeches, from some
fancied or real difference in their inexpressibles.
Breeches, who was evidently the business man,
came near where we were sitting, and threw down
upon the ground, what appeared, at a superficial
glance, to be an enormous pair of saddle-bags. He
then asked his companion in arms for a knife, to
cut off the strangers some buffalo steaks. Now if
the nondescript before me had as coolly proposed to
cut steaks off an ill-natured cur that was wistfully
eyeing the saddle-bags, no more surprise could have
been exhibited by my companions than was, when
they heard the suggestion.
The knife was brought, and Breeches made an
essay at cutting up the saddle-bags, which gave him,
dressed as he was in skins, the appearance of a wild
robber just about to search the effects of some
murdered traveller. The work progressed bravely,
and, to our surprise, soon were exhibited crude
slices of meat. What we saw was the fleshy parts
of a buffalo's hams, ingeniously connected together
by the skin that passed over the back of the animal,
and so dissected from the huge frame as to enable
it easily to be brought into camp. As the
sounds that accompany the frying of meat saluted
our ears, we moved into the open air, to avoid
the certain knowledge that we were about to
complete
the eating of the peck of dirt, said to be
necessary
before we die. Before the door were the
two horses belonging to our hosts, just as they
returned
from the hunt, and upon one still reposed the
huge pieces of meat, thus simply, and frontier-like,
held together for transportation.
9
Our first buffalo steak disappointed us. The
romance
of months and of years was sadly broken in
upon. The squalid wretchedness of those who
administered
to our wants made rebellious even our
hungry stomachs, and we spent our first night
of real disappointment on the great prairies, under
circumstances which we thought, before our sad
experience, would have afforded us all the
substantial
food for body and mind that we could have
desired.
OUR FIRST BUFFALO HUNT.
The morning following the adventure with the
steak found our little party, rifles in hand, and bent
upon a buffalo hunt. The animals, it would seem,
for the especial benefit of Breeches and Bags,
had come lower down than usual, and we were
among the animals much sooner than we expected
to be. So far fortune favoured us; and a gayer
party never set out on a frolic than followed the
deer-skin inexpressibles on the fine December
morning to which we allude. As we jaunted along,
crushing a thousand wild flowers under our horses'
feet, the deer would bound like visions of grace and
beauty from our presence; but we essayed not such
small game. Our ideas and nostrils expanded, and
we laughed so loud at the merry conceit of a man
drawing a deadly weapon on a helpless thing as
small as a woodcock, that the wild half devil and
half Indian horses on which we were mounted
pricked up their ears and tails, as if they expected
the next salute would be the war-whoop and a fight.
Ahead of us we beheld the buzzard circling in
groups, whirling down in aerial flights to the earth,
as if busy with their prey. We passed them at their
gross repast over a mountain of meat that had, the
day before, been full of life and fire, but had fallen
under the visitation of our guides and scarecrows, and
provided the very steaks that had met with so little
affection from our appetites. Soon we discovered
signs of immediate vicinity of the buffalo, and on a
little examination from the top of a swell of land,
we saw them feeding off towards the horizon, like
vast herds of cattle, quietly grazing within the
enclosure
of the farm-yard. As far off as they were,
our hearts throbbed violently as we contemplated
the sanguinary warfare we were about to engage
in, and the waste of life that would ensue. Still we
were impelled on by an irresistible and overpowering
instinct to begin the hunt.
Breeches and Bags carried, over their shoulders,
poles about six feet long; but as they were destitute
of any spear, we looked upon them as inoffensive
weapons, and concluded they had come out just to
act as guides. In fact we could not imagine that such
beastly-looking fellows, so badly mounted, could
hunt any thing. For ourselves, we were armed with
the terrible rifle, and so satisfied were we of its
prowess, that we thought the very appearance of its
muzzle more deadly than the rude implement of
warfare used by the Indians.
Keeping to the windward of the buffalo, we skirted
round until we got them between us and the shed
wherein we passed the night. Then the signal was
given, and in a pellmell manner we charged on,
every man for himself. We approached within a
quarter of a mile before the herd took the alarm.
Then, smelling us on the air, they turned their noses
towards the zenith, gave a sort of rough snort, and
broke simultaneously off at a full gallop. As soon
as this noise was heard by our horses, they increased
their speed, and entered into the sport as ardently
as their riders. The rough beasts rode by Bags
and Breeches did wonders, and seemed really to fly,
while their riders poised themselves gallantly,
carrying
their long poles in front of them with a grace
that would have done honour to a Cossack bearing
his spear.
The buffalo, with their tails high in the air, ran
close together, rattling their horns singularly loud;
while the horses, used to the chase, endeavoured to
separate a single object for pursuit. This once
accomplished
,
it was easy to range alongside, and in
this situation the members of our party severally
found themselves, and drawing deadly aim, as they
supposed, the crack of the sharp rifle was heard
over the prairies, and yet nothing was brought to the
ground. Contrary to all this, a noble bull lay
helpless
in the very track I took, the fruit of Breeches'
skill, and from the energetic manner he pressed on,
we became satisfied that there was a magic in those
sticks we had not dreamed of. Our curiosity
excited
,
we ran across the diameter of a circle he was
forming and came by his side. Soon he overtook
his object of pursuit, and thrusting forward his pole,
we saw glittering, for the first time, on its end a short
blade; a successful thrust
severed the hamstring
, and
a mountain of flesh and life fell helpless on the
prairie. The thing was done so suddenly, that some
moments elapsed before we could overcome our
astonishment. My horse approached the animal
and thrusting forward his head and ears muted in
his face, and then commenced quietly cropping the
grass. It would be impossible for me to describe
my emotions as I, dismounting, examined the
gigantic
and wounded bull before me. There he lay, an
animal, that from his singular expression of face
and general appearance, joined with his immense
size, looked like some animated specimen of the
monsters of the antediluvian world. Rising on his
fore legs, with his hind ones under him, he shook
his mane and beard in defiance, and flashed from
his eyes an unconquerable determination that was
terrible to behold. His small delicate hoofs were
associated in our minds with the farm-yard and the
innocent pleasures of rural life. Gazing upwards, we
beheld, fearfully caricatured, the shaggy trappings of
the lion, and the wild fierceness of a perfect savage,
the whole rising above us in huge unwieldly
proportions
.
Making no demonstration of attack, the
expression
of defiance altered into that of seeming
regret and heartsick pain; his small bright eye
appeared to roam over the beautiful prairie, and to
watch the retreating herds of his fellows, as would
an old patriarch when about to bid adieu to the
world; and as he looked on, the tear struggled in
his eye, rolled over the rough sunburnt hair of his
9*
face, dashed like a bright jewel upon his knotted
beard, and fell to the ground. This exhibition of
suffering nature cooled the warm blood of the hunt
within me; the instinct of destruction was for the time
overpowered by that of better feelings, and could
we have restored to health the wounded animal, it
would have given us a thrill of real pleasure to have
seen him bounding over the plain, again free.
Instead
of this, we took from our belt a pistol, called
upon mercy to sanction our deed, and sent the cold
lead through the thoughtful eye into the brain: the
body sank upon its knees, in ready acknowledgment
of the power of man; the heavy head plunged
awkwardly to the ground; a tremulous motion passed
through the frameand it was dead.
The momentary seriousness of my own feelings,
occasioned
by the incidents above related, was broken
in upon by a loud exulting whoop, prolonged into a
quavering sound, such as will sometimes follow a loud
blast of a trumpet at the mouth of an expert player.
It was a joyous whoop, and vibrated through our
hearts; we looked up, and saw just before us a young
Indian warrior, mounted upon a splendid charger,
rushing across the plain, evidently in pursuit of the
retreating buffalo. As he swept by, he threw himself
forward in his saddle, placed his right hand over his
eyes, as if to shade them from the sun, making a
picture of the most graceful and eager interest. His
horse's head was low down, running like a rabbit,
while the long flowing mane waved in the wind like
silk. Horse and rider were almost equally undressed;
both wiry; and every muscle, as it came into action,
gave evidence of youth and power. Over the horse's
head, and inwrought in the hair of the tail, streamed
plumes plucked from the flamingo. Every thing was
lifemoving, dashing lifegay as the sunshine that
glistens on the rippling wave where the falcon wets
his wing. This soul-stirring exhibition warmed us
into action, and, mounting our horses, we dashed
after the red man. Our direction soon brought us
in sight of the retreating buffalo; and, with the Indian
and myself, dashed on a third person, the valiant
Breeches. I followed as a spectator, and,
keeping
close to both, was enabled to watch two beings
so widely different in form, looks, and action, while
bent on the same exciting pursuit.
Fortunately, two buffaloes, of large size, cut off from
the main body, were being driven towards us by
some one of our party; a distant report of a rifle, and
the sudden stopping of one of the animals told its
own tale. The remaining bull, alarmed by the
report
of the rifle, rushed madly on with enemies in
front and rear. Discovering its new danger, it
wheeled almost on its heels, and ran for life.
Whatever
might have been our most vivid imaginings of
the excitement of a buffalo chase, we now felt the
fruition beyond our sanguine hopes. Before us ran
the buffalo, then followed the Indian, and beside
him Breeches, so closely that you would have
thought a dark Apollo on a mettled charger, by
some necromancy casting the shadow of a
cornfield
scarecrow. We soon gained on the buffalo,
rapidly as he moved his feet under him. Breeches
poised his rude instrument to make the fearful cut
at the hamstrings, when the Indian, plucking an
arrow from his quiver, bent his bow, and pointing it
at Breeches's side, as we thought, let it fly. The
stick held by Breeches leaped from his grasp as
if it had been struck by a club; another instant, and
again the bow was bent; guiding his horse with his
feet, he came alongside of the buffalo, and drove the
arrow to the feather into his side. A chuckling
guttural
laugh followed this brilliant exploit, and as the
animal after a few desperate leaps fell forward and
vomited blood, again was repeated the same joyous
whoop that roused our stagnant blood at the
begining
of the chase.
The instant that Breeches dropped his stick,
his horse, probably from habit, stopped, and the one
I rode followed the example. The Indian dismounted
and stood beside the buffalo the instant he fell. There
was a simplicity and beautiful wildness about the
group that would have struck the eye of the most
insensible. The shaggy and rough appearance of
the dead animal, the healthy-looking and ungroomed
horse with his roving eye and long mane, and the
Indian himself, contemplating his work like some
bronze statue of antique art. Breeches, alike
insensible to the charms of the tailor's art, and the
picturesque, handed the Indian his first fired arrow,
and then stooping down, with a gentle pressure,
thrust the head of the one in the buffalo's body
through the opposite side, from which it entered, and
handed it to its owner, with disgust marked upon his
face, that displayed no great pleasure at his
appearance
and company.
Among the Indian tribes, there are certain styles
of doing things which are as essential to command
the attention and win the favour of a real hunter as
there are peculiar manners and modes commended,
and only acknowledged by sportsmen. A poor
despicable
tribe, bearing the name of Ta-wa-ki-na,
inhabiting
the plains of Texas, kill the buffalo by
hamstringing
them, and are, therefore, despised and
driven out from among Indian men. A young
Cumanche chief, fond of adventure, and friendly
with Breeches, had gone out of his way to join
in our sport; and having shown to the white man his
skill, and for Breeches his contempt for his
imitations
of a despised tribe, he passed on in pursuit of
his own business, either of war or of pleasure.
HAMSTRINGING THE BUFFALO.
The experience of our first buffalo-hunt satisfied
us that the rifle was not the most effective
instrument
in destroying the animal. The time consumed
in loading the rifle is sufficient for an Indian to shoot
several arrows, while the arrow more quickly kills
than the bullet. As the little party to which I was
attached had more notions of fun than any particular
method of hunting, a day was set apart for a buffalo
hunt, Ta-wa-ki-na fashion, and for this purpose
rifles were laid aside, and poles about seven feet
long, with razor blades fastened on them a few
inches from the end, so as to form a fork, were taken
in their place. Arriving in the vicinity of the
buffalo
,
those who were disposed entered into the sport
pellmell. Like a faithful squire I kept close at the
heels of Breeches, who soon brought a fine young
heifer bellowing to the ground. As the animal uttered
sounds of pain, one or two fierce-looking bulls that
gallantly followed in the rear, exposing themselves to
attack to preserve the weaker members of the herd,
stopped short for an instant, and eyed us with most
unpleasant curiosity. This roused the knight of the
deer skin, Breeches, and brandishing his stick over
his head with a remarkable degree of dexterity, he
dashed off as if determined to slay both at once.
My two companions who started out, Ta-wa-ki-nas,
had done but little execution, not understanding
their work, or alarmed at so near an approach of the
animals they wounded, without bringing them to the
earth. As Breeches dashed on after the bulls,
he severally crossed the route of all who were on
the chase; and as he was unquestionably the hero of
the day, all followed in his train, determined to see
hamstringing done scientifically.
It is a singular fact in the formation of the buffalo,
and the familiar cattle of the farm-yard, that,
although
so much alike in general appearance, the
domesticated animals will, after being hamstrung,
run long distances. The buffalo, on the contrary,
the moment the tendon is severed, falls to the ground
entirely helpless, and perfectly harmless beyond the
reach of its horns. A very short chase in company
with Breeches brought us up to one of the bulls;
he poised his stick, thrust it forward, and the
tendo
Achillis
, full of life and full of action, was touched
by the sharp blade; its tension, as it sustained the
immense bull in his upward leaps, made it, when
severed, spring back as will the breaking string of
the harp; and the helpless beast, writhing in pain,
came to the ground. One of our party witnessing
this exhibition, gave an exulting shout, and declared
he would bring a buffalo down, or break his neck;
he soon came beside a venerable bull, and as he
made repeated thrusts, a thousand directions were
given as to the manner of proceeding. The race
was a well-contested one, the heels of the pursued
animal were strangely accelerated by the thrusts
made at him in his rear. A lunge was finally
accomplished
by the Ta-wa-ki-na, that almost threw
him from his horse; the fearful cut brought the huge
bull directly under the rider's feet; the next instant
the noble steed was impaled upon the buffalo's horns,
and the unfortunate rider lay insensible on the
ground. The wrong hamstring, in the excitement,
had been cut, the animal
always falling on the
wounded side
. We hastened to our unfortunate
companion
,
chafed his temples, and brought him to his
senses. The first question he asked was,
whereabouts
the buffalo struck him. Happily, save the
loss of a generous steed, no great damage was done.
The Ta-wa-ki-na acknowledged hamstringing
buffalo was as contemptible as it was thought to be
by the Cumanche chief. Thus ended this novel and
barbarian hunt, that afforded incidents for many
rough jokes, and amusing reflections on
hamstringing
buffaloes.
As a reward for these frontier sports, it is but just
to say that we feasted plentifully upon buffalo steaks,
marrow bones, humps, and tongues, yet we were not
satisfied. There was a waste of life and of food
accompanying
the hunting of the animal, that, like an
ever-present spirit of evil, took away from our
enjoyment
that zest which is necessary to make it a
favourite sport.
SCENES ON THE MISSISSIPPI.
It
has been the policy of the United States
government to remove the Indians west of the
Mississippi
.
There, there is still a vast extent of
country
unoccupied, in which he can pursue,
comparatively
unrestrained, his inclinations, and pluck a few
more days of happiness before his sun entirely sets.
Occasionally may be seen in the south-west a large
body of these people, under the charge of a
government
officer, going to their new homes provided
for them by their white father. These
removals
are always melancholy exhibitions. The
Indians, dispirited and heart-broken, entirely
unconscious
of the future, with dogged looks, submit
to every privation that is imposed on them, and
appear
equally indifferent as to the receipt of favours.
Throwing aside every mark of etiquette among
themselves, the chief, who, among their native
haunts, is almost a sacred person, lies down, or takes
food promiscuously with the noblest or most
degraded
of his people; all distinctions of ages, as
well as caste, are thrown aside, and they seem a
mere mass of degraded humanity, with less seeming
capability of self-preservation than the brute.
Some two or three years ago, we took passage on
board of a boat bound from New Orleans to St.
Louis, which boat the government had engaged to
10
carry, as far towards their place of destination as
practicable, near four hundred Seminoles, who with
their chiefs had agreed to emigrate west of the
Mississippi
.
We were not particularly pleased with
our numerous and novel passengers, but the lateness
of the season lessened the chances of getting a boat,
and as most of the Indians were to remain in a
tender
,
lashed to the side of the steamer, we concluded
that a study of their manners and habits would
beguile
away the time of a long trip, and thus pay us
for the inconveniences we might be put to.
Unfortunately
the novelty of our situation too soon
passed away. The Indians, who on first
acquaintance
kept up a little display of their original
character
,
gradually relapsed into what appeared to be a
mere vegetable existence, and slept through the
entire twenty-four hours of the day. Of all the
remarkable
traits of character that dignify them in
history, we could not discern the least trace; yet,
among the brutal, insensible savages at our feet,
were many daring spirits, who had displayed in
their warfare with the whites dangerous talents, and
taken many a bloody scalp. The girls were
possessed
of little or no personal charms, while the
women, the labourers of the tribe, were as hideous
as any hags that can be imagined.
The heat of the weather and the confinement of
the boat had a dreadful effect on these poor wretches;
sickness rapidly broke out among them, and as they
stoutly refused to take the white man's medicine,
their chances of recovery were poor indeed. The
tender was turned into a perfect lazar-house, and
nothing could be seen but the affecting attentions
of the old squaws to their friends and relatives, as
they wasted away before their eyes. The infant
and patriarch lay side by side, consuming with slow
fever, while the corpse of some middle-aged person
lay at their feet, waiting for the funeral rites and the
obscurity of the grave. Vain were the prescriptions
of the medicine man of their tribe, he blew his
breath through a gaudy coloured reed upon the faces
of his patients, and recited his incantations without
success. He disfigured his person with new paint,
and altered his devices daily, still his patients would
die, and at every landing where the boat stopped
some poor Indian was taken ashore and hastily
buried. No one mourned over the corpse but the
females, and they only when intimately related to
the deceased. The father, son, or husband, as they
saw their relatives falling around them, scarce turned
their glazed eyes upon the dead, and if they did, it
was only to exclaim in guttural accents, Ugh!
and then turn away to sleep. Not an article
belonging
to the dead but was wrapped up with it or
placed in the coffin; the infant and his playthings,
the young girl and her presents, the squaw with her
domestic utensils, and the brave with his gun
and whatever property there was in his possession.
A beautiful custom, indeed; one that brings no
crocodile tears to the eyes of the living heir, or gives
the lawyer a chance for litigation.
Among those who died was one old veteran
warrior
,
who had particularly attracted our attention by
his severe looks and loneliness of habit, and we
watched attentively his exit from the world. He
seemed, as near as we could judge, to have no
realtives
about him; no one noticed him but the
doctor
,
who was markedly attentive. The old man was
a chief, and the scars that covered his body told of
many a dreadful encounter with man and beast.
His huge skeleton, as he moved about in his
ill-concealed
agony, looked like the remains of a giant,
exaggerated by its want of flesh. His hands were
small, and of feminine delicacy, occasionally he
would move them about in mute eloquence, then
clutch at the air, as if in pursuit of an enemy, and
then fall back exhausted. Recovering from one of
these fits, he tried to stand, but found it impossible,
he got however upon his elbow, and opening his
eyes for the first time in a long while, stared wildly
about him. A smile lit up his features, his lips
moved, and he essayed to speak. The sun, which
was at this time low in the west, shone full upon
him, his smooth skin glistened like burnished copper,
his long-neglected hair, of silvery whiteness, hung
over his head and face, while the scalp-lock
displayed
itself by its immense length, as it reached
his shoulder. His muscles, shrunken by age and
disease, moved like cords in performing their offices.
A very old man was dying. As his mouth opened
a faint chant was heard, the doctor, at the sound,
bent his head, and assumed an air of reverence.
The chant, as it continued to swell on the evening
breeze, reached the ears of the slumbering warriors
that lay about, and as they listened to the sounds, I
could discern their sottish eyes open and flash with
unearthly fires, sometimes exhibiting pleasure, but
oftener ferocity and hatred. The old man sang on,
a few raised to their feet, and waved their hands in
the air, as if keeping time, and occasionally some
aged Indian would repeat the sounds he heard. The
old man ceased, turned his face full to the setting
sun, and fell back a corpse. The Indians cast a
look in the direction of their homes, gave an
expression
of malignity, as well as sorrow, and then
silently and sluggishly sank into repose, as if nothing
had happened. That old fellow brags well of his
infernal deeds, observed one of the white men
accompanying
the Indians, and the red skinned
devils about here drink it in as a Cuba hound would
blood.
The intense heat of the weather, and the quietness
that reigned so profoundly among the Indians,
broken only by the saw and hammer of the carpenter
at the capstan, making coffins, made us sigh for a
landing-place, and a separation from such
melancholy
scenes. This desire was encouraged from the
well-known fact, that the savages grew every hour
more discontented and troublesome, and the song of
the dying old chief had not allayed their feelings,
or made them more comfortable.
The morning following the death of the old chief
had been preceded by one of those nights in which
the fog rose from the water so thick, that, in the
hyperbolical
language of the boatmen, you could make
feather-beds of it. The pilot had felt his way
10*
along for many hours, until the sudden crash that
shook every thing in the boat, convinced us that we
were aground. The engine stopped, and left us in
perfect silence and obscurity. Long after our
accustomed
late hour of rising, we dressed and went
on deck. The fresh mist blew in our faces with
sickening effect, and the sun  then two hours
highwas invisible. The shore, which was so near
that the breaking of twigs could be heard, as cattle,
or game moved about in it, was indiscernible.
Even the end of the boat opposite to the one on
which we stood was in obscurity. A deep, damp,
opaque Mississippi river fog, had swallowed us up.
As the sun continued to rise and gain strength in its
ascent, its rays penetrated through the gloom, and
we at last discovered it, looking about as brilliant
as illuminated cheese. On it came, working its way
through the fog by its rays, reaching them out as a
debilitated spider would his legs, and apparently
with the same caution and labour.
With the growing heat a gentle breeze sprang up,
and the fog rolled about in huge masses, leaving
spots of pure atmosphere, and then closing them up;
gradually it became more and more rarified, and
things at a distance began to appear all magnified
and mysterious. On came the sun, brightening and
enlarging, until his streaming rays dipped into the
water, and shot up to the zenith. The fog, no longer
able to keep its consistency, retired before its
splendour
in little clouds, which would sometimes rally,
and spread over the surface of the river, then,
breaking
asunder, vanish away into air, with a splendour
that rivalled the dying dolphin's tints. Now, for
the first time, could we learn our whereabouts. The
broad bosom of the Mississippi stretched far to the
front of us, while at the stern of our boat was one of
those abrupt banks that denote a sudden bend in the
river. This had deceived the pilot. On our right,
within a few hundred yards, lay the shore, lined
with huge trees, tangled with gigantic vines, and
waving with festoons of moss, giving them a sombre
appearance that was singular and repulsive. Wild
ducks and geese went screaming by, heron and
crane innumerable would come near us, but
discovering
the dark form of our boat, fly precipitately
away. The water glistened in the sun, and there
would rise from its quiet surface little columns of
mist, that would ascend high in the air and sail
along on the surface of the water, until
striking
the distant shore, they would roll over the
landscape, enveloping parts in momentary obscurity,
and not until near noon did the fog entirely
disappear
.
Then the sun, as if incensed with the veil
that had for a time kept him from his scorching
work, poured down its heat with more intensity,
leaving a foggy day, hotter before its close, than if
the sun had been unobscured in its appearance in
the morn.
While sitting in the cabin, congratulating
ourselves
on the prospect of getting off the bar, on
which we had so long been detained, the report of
a rifle was heard, fired from the deck, accompanied
by a loud yell. Another rifle was discharged, and
a loud Indian whoop followed, that made our blood
run cold. The ladies present turned pale, and the
commanding officer who had charge of the Indians,
somewhat astonished, left the cabin. A momentary
alarm seized upon us all. Could the old warrior's
death-song have incited mutiny! Crack! went another
rifle outside, and another shout; we could stand it
no longer, but rushed on deck. What a scene!
Not an Indian that was able but was upon his feet,
his eyes sparkling with fire, and his form looking as
active as a panther's. The sluggards of yesterday
were as sleek and nervous as horses at the starting
post, so perfectly had a little excitement altered
them. Their rifles, however, thank Heaven, were
not turned upon the white mantheir enemy was
between the boat and the shorein the waterin
the form of a very large black bear. It was a
beautiful
sight to see the savage springing with a
graceful
bound on some high place in the boat; and raise
his rifle to his eye, and before the report was heard
you could mark a red furrow on the head of the bear,
where it was struck by the ball as it passed its way
through the skin and flesh, without entering the
bone. While the bear, at these assaults, would
throw himself half out of the water, brush over the
smarting would with his huge paw, and then dash
on for life. Another shot, and another yell brought
the bear on the defensive, and showed he was
dangerously
wounded. While this firing was going
on, some Indians, armed only with knives, launched
a canoe that lay among their movables, and paddled
hurriedly out to the bear. No sooner was the canoe
within his reach than he put his huge paws on its
side, in spite of the thrusts aimed at his head, and
turned his enemies, with a somerset, into the water.
Loud shouts of laughter greeted this accident; the
little papooses and women fairly danced with
joy, while the crew of the boat yelled and shouted,
and swore at the sport as much as the savages
themselves
.The
bear turned from the boat, and looked
for his victims, but they were not to be seen;
precipitated
so suddenly into the water, they sank
below
the surface, like the duck when much alarmed,
and then thrust out their shining polls far from the
friendly hug of the bear. Laying their plans of attack
at once (for the firing of rifles was suspended,)
one of the Indians attracted the bear's attention, and
made towards him; they met, the floating canoe
between
them, and while thus skirmishing, the
unoccupied
Indian came up behind the bear, raised his
knife, and drove it deeply into his side, and then
disappeared, as a lump of lead would have done
about his own weight. The bear turned in the
direction
of this new attack, snapped and clawed in
the water in the greatest agony. Another stab was
given in the same way, and as the Indians again
disappeared
,
a white hunter, who had been looking
on, rifle in hand, quite coolly, sprang upon the
guards of the boat, and singing out red devils,
look out below, fired. The bear leaped entirely
out of the water, fell upon his back, and after a
convulsive
kick or two, floated a dead body on the
water. This exploit of the white man, so sudden
and unexpected, was greeted by a loud shout from
all parties. You see. said the hunter, as he
coolly laid down his rifleyou see, the bar has
feeling, stranggers, and whar is the use of
tormenting
the varmint? my old shooting iron never misses,
but if it had hit a red skin, by accident, I should
not have been ashamed of the shotfor the bar is
the best of the two, and a perfect Christian,
compared
with the best copper skin in the tender
thar
.
The Indians in the water, at this last shot,
expressed
a significant ugh, and approaching the
bear, gave him repeated thrusts with their knives;
that showed they thought him a hard lived and
dangerous
animal. In a few minutes they recovered
their canoe, and were towing the dead carcass
ashore. Fifty Indians at least now threw their blankets
aside, and leaping into the river, swam after the
bear ashore. The tearing off of the huge skin, and
jerking the meat, was despatched so rapidly, that it
indicated an accustomed work.
This little incident relieved the monotony, of all
others the most disagreeable, that of being aground
in the Mississippi, and the hours of labour which
were spent in releasing the boat, passed quickly
away, and by the time the Indians on shore
returned
to their friends in the tender, the bell sounded;
we moved: and the steamer pursued its way.
THE DISGRACED SCALP-LOCK;
OR,
INCIDENTS ON THE WESTERN WATERS.
Occasionally
may be seen on the Ohio and
Mississippi
rivers singularly hearty-looking men, that
puzzle a stranger as to their history and age. Their
forms always exhibit a powerful development of
muscle
and bone; their cheeks are prominent, and you
would pronounce them men enjoying perfect health
in middle life, were it not for their heads, which, if
not bald, will be sparsely covered with steel-gray
hair. Another peculiarity about this people is, that
they have a singular knowledge of all the places on
the river; every bar and bend is spoken of with
precision
and familiarity; every town is recollected
before
it was half as large as the present, or no town
at all. Innumerable places are marked out where
once was an Indian fight, or a rendezvous of robbers.
The manner, the language, and the dress of these
individuals
are all characteristic of sterling common
sensethe manner modest, yet full of self-reliance;
the language strong and forcible, from superiority of
mind rather than from education; the dress studied
for comfort, rather than fashionon the whole, you
become attached to them and court their society.
The good humour, the frankness, the practical sense,
the reminiscences, the powerful frameall indicate
a character, at the present day anomalous; and such
indeed is the case, for your acquaintance will be one
of the few remaining people now spoken of as the
last of the flat-boat men.
Thirty years ago the navigation of the western
waters was confined to this class of men; the
obstacles
presented to the pursuit in those swift-running
and wayward waters had to be overcome by
physical
force alone; the navigator's arm grew strong as
he guided his rude craft past the snag and
sawyer
,
or kept off the no less dreaded bar.
Besides
all this, the deep forests that covered the river
banks concealed the wily Indian, who gloated over
the shedding of blood. The qualities of the frontier
warrior associated themselves with the boatmen,
while he would, when at home, drop both these
characters
in the cultivator of the soil. It is no wonder,
then, that they were brave, hardy, and open-handed
men: their whole lives were a round of manly
excitement
;
they were hyperbolical in thought and in
deed, when most natural, compared with any other
class of men. Their bravery and chivalrous deeds
were performed without a herald to proclaim them
to the worldthey were the mere incidents of a
border
life, considered too common to outlive the time
of a passing wonder. Obscurity has nearly
obliterated
the men, and their actions. A few of the former
still exist, as if to justify their wonderful exploits,
which now live almost exclusively as traditions.
Among the flat-boatmen there were none that
gained the notoriety of
Mike Fink
. His name is still
remembered along the whole of the Ohio as a man
who excelled his fellows in every thing,
particularly
in his rifle-shot, which was acknowledged to be
unsurpassed. Probably no man ever lived who could
compete with Mike Fink in the latter
accomplishment
.
Strong as Hercules, free from all nervous
excitement
,
possessed of perfect health, and familiar
with his weapon from childhood, he raised the rifle
to his eye, and, having once taken sight, it was as
firmly fixed as if buried in a rock. It was Mike's
pride, and he rejoiced on all occasions where he
could bring it into use, whether it was turned against
the beast of prey or the more savage Indian; and in
his day these last named were the common foe with
whom Mike and his associates had to contend. On
the occasion that we would particularly introduce
Mike to the reader, he had bound himself for a while
to the pursuits of trade, until a voyage from the
head-waters of the Ohio, and down the Mississippi,
could be completed. Heretofore he had kept himself
exclusively to the Ohio, but a liberal reward, and
some curiosity, prompted him to extend his business
character beyond his ordinary habits and inclinations.
In accomplishment of this object, he was lolling
carelessly over the big sweep that guided the
flat on which he officiated; the current of the
river bore the boat swiftly along, and made his
labour
light; his eye glanced around him, and he
broke forth in ecstasies at what he saw and felt. If
there is a river in the world that merits the name of
beautiful, it is the Ohio, when its channel is
Without o'erflowing, full.
The scenery is everywhere soft; there are no
jutting
11
rocks, no steep banks, no high hills; but the
clear and swift current laves beautiful and
undulating
shores, that descend gradually to the water's edge.
The foliage is rich and luxuriant, and its outlines in
the water are no less distinct than when it is relieved
against the sky. Interspersed along its route are
islands, as beautiful as ever figured in poetry as the
land of the fairies; enchanted spots indeed, that seem
to sit so lightly on the water that you almost expect
them, as you approach, to vanish into dreams. So
late as when Mike Fink disturbed the solitudes of
the Ohio with his rifle, the canoe of the Indian was
hidden in the little recesses along the shore; they
moved about in their frail barks like spirits; and
clung, in spite of the constant encroachments of
civilization
,
to the places which tradition had designated
as the happy places of a favoured people.
Wild and uncultivated as Mike appeared, he loved
nature, and had a soul that sometimes felt, while
admiring
it, an exalted enthusiasm. The Ohio was his
favourite stream. From where it runs no stronger
than a gentle rivulet, to where it mixes with the
muddy Mississippi, Mike was as familiar with its
meanderings as a child could be with those of a
flower-garden. He could not help noticing with
sorrow
the desecrating hand of improvement as he
passed
along, and half soliloquizing, and half addressing
his companions, he broke forth:I knew these
parts afore a squatter's axe had blazed a tree;
'twasn't then pulling a  sweep to get a living;
but pulling the trigger's the business. Those were
times to see; a man might call himself lucky.
What's the use of improvements? When did cutting
down trees make deer more plenty? Who ever
found wild buffalo or a brave Indian in a city?
Where's the fun, the frolicking, the fighting? Gone!
Gone! The rifle won't make a man a living now
he must turn nigger and work. If forests continue
to be used up, I may yet be smothered in a
settlement
.
Boys, this 'ere life won't do. I'll stick to the
broadhorn 'cordin' to contract; but once done with
it, I'm off for a frolic. If the Choctas or Cherokees
on the Massassip don't give us a brush as we pass
along, I shall grow as poor as a starved wolf in a
pitfall. I must, to live peaceably, point my rifle at
something more dangerous than varmint. Six months
and no fight would spile me worse than a dead horse
on a prairie.
Mike ceased speaking. The then beautiful village
of Louisville appeared in sight; the labour of
landing
the boat occupied his attentionthe bustle and
confusion that followed such an incident ensued, and
Mike was his own master by law until his employers
ceased trafficking, and again required his services.
At the time we write of, there were a great many
renegade Indians who lived about the settlements,
and which is still the case in the extreme south-west.
These Indians generally are the most degraded of
their tribeoutcasts, who, for crime or dissipation,
are no longer allowed to associate with their people;
they live by hunting or stealing, and spend their
precarious
gains in intoxication. Among the throng
that crowded on the flat-boat on his arrival, were a
number of these unfortunate beings; they were
influenced
by no other motive than that of loitering
round in idle speculation at what was going on.
Mike was attracted towards them at sight; and as he
too was in the situation that is deemed most
favourable
to mischief, it struck him that it was a good
opportunity
to have a little sport at the Indians' expense.
Without ceremony, he gave a terrific war-whoop;
and then mixing the language of the aborigines and
his own together, he went on in savage fashion and
bragged of his triumphs and victories on the
war-path
,
with all the seeming earnestness of a real
brave. Nor were taunting words spared to
exasperate
the poor creatures, who, perfectly helpless,
listened to the tales of their own greatness, and their
own shame, until wound up to the highest pitch of
impotent exasperation. Mike's companions joined
in; thoughtless boys caught the spirit of the affair;
and the Indians were goaded until they in turn made
battle with their tongues. Then commenced a
system
of running against them, pulling off their
blankets
,
together with a thousand other indignities;
finally they made a precipitate retreat ashore, amid
the hooting and jeering of an unfeeling crowd, who
considered them poor devils destitute of feeling and
humanity. Among this crowd of outcasts was a
Cherokee, who bore the name of Proud Joe; what
his real cognomen was, no one knew, for he was
taciturn
,
haughtyand, in spite of his poverty and his
manner of life won the name we have mentioned.
His face was expressive of talent, but it was
furrowed
by the most terrible habits of drunkenness. That
he was a superior Indian was admitted; and it was
also understood that he was banished from his
mountain
home, his tribe being then numerous and
powerful
,
for some great crime. He was always looked
up to by his companions, and managed, however
intoxicated
he might be, to sustain a singularly proud
bearing, which did not even depart from him while
prostrated on the ground. Joe was filthy in his
person
and habitsin this respect he was behind his
fellows; but one ornament of his person was
attended
to with a care which would have done honour to
him if surrounded by his people, and in his native
woods. Joe still wore with Indian dignity his
scalp-lock
;
he ornamented it with taste, and cherished it,
as report said, that some Indian messenger of
vengeance
might tear it from his head, as expiatory of
his numerous crimes. Mike noticed this peculiarity;
and reaching out his hand, plucked from it a hawk's
feather, which was attached to the scalp-lock. The
Indian glared horribly on Mike as he consummated
the insult, snatched the feather from his hand, then
shaking his clenched fist in the air, as if calling on
Heaven for revenge, retreated with his friends. Mike
saw that he had roused the savage's soul, and he
marvelled wonderfully that so much resentment
should be exhibited; and as an earnest to Proud Joe
that the wrong he had done him should not rest
unrevenged
,
he swore he would cut the scalp-lock off
close to his head the first convenient opportunity he
got, and then he thought no more about it.
The morning following the arrival of the boat at
Louisville was occupied in making preparations to
pursue the voyage down the river. Nearly every
11*
thing was completed, and Mike had taken his favourite
place at the sweep, when looking up the river-bank,
he beheld at some distance Joe and his companions,
and perceived from their gesticulations that they were
making him the subject of conversation.
Mike thought instantly of several ways in which
he could show them altogether a fair fight, and then
whip them with ease; he also reflected with what
extreme satisfaction he would enter into the spirit of
the arrangement, and other matters to him equally
pleasing, when all the Indians disappeared, save Joe
himself, who stood at times reviewing him in moody
silence, and then staring round at passing objects.
From the peculiarity of Joe's position to Mike, who
was below him, his head and upper part of his body
relieved boldly against the sky, and in one of his
movements he brought his profile face to view. The
prominent scalp-lock and its adornments seemed to
be more striking than ever, and it again roused the
pugnacity of Mike Fink; in an instant he raised his
rifle, always loaded and at command, brought it to
his eye, and, before he could be prevented, drew
sight upon Proud Joe and fired. The ball whistled
loud and shrill, and Joe, springing his whole length
into the air, fell upon the ground. The cold-blooded
murder was noticed by fifty persons at least, and
there arose from the crowd an universal cry of horror
and indignation at the bloody deed. Mike himself
seemed to be much astonished, and in an instant
reloaded his rifle, and as a number of white persons
rushed towards the boat, Mike threw aside his coat,
and, taking his powder horn between his teeth, leaped,
rifle in hand, into the Ohio, and commenced
swimming
for the opposite shore. Some bold spirits
determined Mike should not so easily escape, and
jumping into the only skiff at command, pulled
swiftly after him. Mike watched their movements
until they came within a hundred yards of him, then
turning in the water, he supported himself by his
feet alone, and raised his deadly rifle to his eye. Its
muzzle, if it spoke hostilely, was as certain to send
a messenger of death through one or more of his
pursuers, as if it were lightning, and they knew it;
dropping their oars and turning pale, they bid Mike
not to fire. Mike waved his hand towards the little
village of Louisville, and again pursued his way to
the opposite shore.
The time consumed by the firing of Mike's rifle,
the pursuit, and the abandonment of it, required less
time than we have taken to give the details; and in
that time, to the astonishment of the gaping crowd
around Joe, they saw him rising with a bewildered
air; a moment more and he recovered his senses
and stood up
at his feet lay his scalp-lock!
The
ball had cut it clear from his head; the cord around
the root of it, in which were placed feathers and
other ornaments, held it together; the concussion had
merely stunned its owner; farther, he had escaped
all bodily harm! A cry of exultation rose at the
last evidence of the skill of Mike Finkthe
exhibition
of a shot that established his claim, indisputable,
to the eminence he ever afterwards heldthe
unrivalled
marksman of all the flat-boatmen of the
western waters. Proud Joe had received many
insults. He looked upon himself as a degraded,
worthless
being; and the ignominy heaped upon him he
never, except by reply, resented; but this last insult
was like seizing the lion by the mane, or a Roman
senator by the beardit roused the slumbering
demon
within, and made him again thirst to resent his
wrongs with an intensity of emotion that can only
be felt by an Indian. His eye glared upon the
jeering
crowd around like a fiend; his chest swelled and
heaved until it seemed that he must suffocate. No
one noticed this emotion. All were intent upon the
exploit that had so singularly deprived Joe of his
war-lock; and, smothering his wrath, he retreated to
his associates with a consuming fire at his vitals. He
was a different man from an hour before; and with
that desperate resolution on which a man stakes his
all, he swore by the Great Spirit of his forefathers
that he would be revenged.
An hour after the disappearance of Joe, both he
and Mike Fink were forgotten. The flat-boat, which
the latter had deserted, was got under way, and
dashing through the rapids in the river opposite
Louisville wended on its course. As is customary
when night sets in, the boat was securely fastened in
some little bend or bay in the shore, where it
remained
until early morn.
Long before the sun had fairly risen, the boat was
again pushed into the stream, and it passed through
a valley presenting the greatest possible beauty and
freshness of landscape the mind can conceive.
It was spring, and a thousand tints of green
developed
themselves in the half-formed foliage and
bursting buds. The beautiful mallard skimmed
across the water, ignorant of the danger of the white
man's approach; the splendid spoon-bill decked the
shallow places near the shore, while myriads of
singing-birds
filled the air with their unwritten songs. In
the far reaches down the river, there occasionally
might be seen a bear stepping along the ground as if
dainty of its feet, and, snuffing the intruder on his
wild home, he would retreat into the woods. To
enliven all this, and give the picture the look of
humanity
,
there might also be seen, struggling with the
floating mists, a column of blue smoke, that came
from a fire built on a projecting point of land, around
which the current swept rapidly, and carried every
thing that floated on the river. The eye of the
boatman
saw the advantage of the situation which the
place rendered to those on shore, to annoy and
attack
,
and as wandering Indians, in those days, did
not hesitate to rob, there was much speculation as to
what reception the boat would receive from the
builders
of the fire.
The rifles were all loaded, to be prepared for the
worst, and the loss of Mike Fink lamented, as a
prospect
of a fight presented itself, where he could use
his terrible rifle. The boat in the mean time swept
round the point; but instead of an enemy, there lay,
in a profound sleep, Mike Fink, with his feet
toasting
at the fire, his pillow was a huge bear, that had
been shot on the day previous, while at his sides,
and scattered in profusion around him, were several
deer and wild turkeys. Mike had not been idle.
After picking out a place most eligible to notice the
passing boat, he had spent his time in hunting, and
he was surrounded by trophies of his prowess. The
scene that he presented was worthy of the time and
the man, and would have thrown Landseer into a
delirium of joy, could he have witnessed it. The
boat, owing to the swiftness of the current, passed
Mike's resting place, although it was pulled strongly
to the shore. As Mike's companions came opposite
to him, they raised such a shout, half exultation of
meeting him, and half to alarm him with the idea that
Joe's friends were upon him. Mike, at the sound,
sprang to his feet, rifle in hand, and as he looked
around, he raised it to his eyes, and by the time he
discovered the boat, he was ready to fire. Down
with your shooting-iron, you wild critter, shouted
one of the boatmen. Mike dropped the piece, and
gave a loud halloo, that echoed among the solitudes
like a piece of artillery. The meeting between Mike
and his fellows was characteristic. They joked, and
jibed him with their rough wit, and he parried it
off with a most creditable ingenuity. Mike soon
learned the extent of his rifle-shothe seemed
perfectly
indifferent to the fact that Proud Joe was not
dead. The only sentiment he uttered, was regret
that he did not fire at the vagabond's head, and if
he hadn't hit it, why, he made the first bad shot in
twenty years. The dead game was carried on board
of the boat, the adventure was forgotten, and every
thing resumed the monotony of floating in a flat-boat
down the Ohio.
A month or more elapsed, and Mike had progressed
several hundred miles down the Mississippi; his
journey had been remarkably free from incident;
morning, noon, and night, presented the same banks,
the same muddy water, and he sighed to see some
broken land, some high hills, and he railed and
swore, that he should have been such a fool as to
desert his favourite Ohio for a river that produced
nothing but alligators, and was never at best half
finished.
Occasionally, the plentifulness of game put him in
spirits, but it did not last long; he wanted more
lasting excitement, and declared himself as perfectly
miserable and helpless as a wild-cat without teeth
or claws.
In the vicinity of Natchez rises a few abrupt hills,
which tower above the surrounding lowlands of the
Mississippi like monuments; they are not high, but
from their loneliness and rarity they create sensations
of pleasure and awe.
Under the shadow of one of these bluffs, Mike and
his associates made the customary preparations to
pass the night. Mike's enthusiasm knew no bounds
at the sight of land again; he said it was as pleasant
as cold water to a fresh wound; and, as his spirits
rose, he went on making the region round about,
according to his notions, an agreeable residence.
The Choctaws live in these diggins, said Mike,
and a cursed time they must have of it. Now if I
lived in these parts I'd declare war on 'em just to
have something to keep me from growing dull;
without some such business I'd be as musty as an
old swamp moccasin. I could build a cabin on that
ar hill yonder that could, from its location, with my
rifle, repulse a whole tribe if they came after me.
What a beautiful time I'd have of it! I never was
particular about what's called a fair fight; I just ask
half a chance, and the odds against me, and if I
then don't keep clear of snags and sawyers, let me
spring aleak and go to the bottom. Its natur that the
big fish should eat the little ones. I've seen trout
swallow a perch, and a cat would come along and
swallow the trout, and perhaps, on the Mississippi,
the alligators use up the cat, and so on to the end of the
row. Well, I will walk tall into varmint and Indian;
it's a way I've got, and it comes as natural as
grinning
to a hyena. I'm a regular tornado, tough as a
hickory, and long-winded as a nor'-wester. I can
strike a blow like a falling tree, and every lick makes
a gap in the crowd that lets in an acre of sunshine.
Whew, boys! shouted Mike, twirling his rifle like
a walking-stick around his head, at the ideas
suggested
in his mind. Whew, boys! if the Choctaw
divils in them ar woods thare would give us a brush,
just as I feel now, I'd call them gentlemen. I must
fight something, or I'll catch the dry rotburnt
brandy won't save me. Such were some of the
expressions which Mike gave utterance to, and in
which his companions heartily joined; but they never
presumed to be quite equal to Mike, for his bodily
prowess, as well as his rifle, were acknowledged to
be unsurpassed. These displays of animal spirits
generally ended in boxing and wrestling-matches, in
which falls were received, and blows were struck
without being noticed, that would have destroyed
common men. Occasionally angry words and blows
were exchanged, but, like the summer storm, the
cloud that emitted the lightning purified the air; and
when the commotion ceased, the combatants
immediately
made friends and became more attached
to each other than before the cause that interrupted
the good feelings occurred. Such were the
conversation
and amusements of the evening when the boat
was moored under the bluffs we have alluded to. As
night wore on, one by one of the hardy boatmen fell
asleep, some in its confined interior, and others
protected
by a light covering in the open air. The
moon arose in beautiful majesty; her silver light,
behind the highlands, gave them a power and
theatrical
effect as it ascended; and as its silver rays grew
perpendicular, they finally kissed gently the summit
of the hills, and poured down their full light upon
the boat, with almost noonday brilliancy. The
silence with which the beautiful changes of darkness
and light were produced made it mysterious. It
seemed as if some creative power was at work,
bringing form and life out of darkness. In the midst
of the witchery of this quiet scene, there sounded
forth the terrible rifle, and the more terrible
war-whoop
of the Indian. One of the flat-boatmen,
asleep on deck, gave a stifled groan, turned upon
his face, and with a quivering motion, ceased to live.
Not so with his companionsthey in an instant, as
men accustomed to danger and sudden attacks,
sprang ready-armed to their feet; bat before they
could discover their foes, seven sleek and horribly
12
painted savages leaped from the hill into the boat.
The firing of the rifle was useless, and each man
singled out a foe and met him with the drawn knife.
The struggle was quick and fearful; and deadly
blows were given amid screams and imprecations
that rent the air. Yet the voice of Mike Fink could
be heard in encouraging shouts above the clamour.
Give it to them, boys! he cried, cut their
hearts out! choke the dogs! Here's hell a-fire and the
river rising! then clenching with the most
powerful
of the assailants, he rolled with him upon the
deck of the boat. Powerful as Mike was, the Indian
seemed nearly a match for him. The two twisted and
writhed like serpents,now one seeming to have
the advantage, and then the other.
In all this confusion there might occasionally be
seen glancing in the moonlight the blade of a knife;
but at whom the thrusts were made, or who wielded
it, could not be discovered.
The general fight lasted less time than we have
taken to describe it. The white men gained the
advantage; two of the Indians lay dead upon the
boat, and the living, escaping from their antagonists
leaped ashore, and before the rifle could be brought
to bear they were out of its reach. While Mike
was yet struggling with his antagonist, one of his
companions cut the boat loose from the shore, and,
with powerful exertion, managed to get its bows so
far into the current, that it swung round and floated;
but before this was accomplished, and before any
one interfered with Mike, he was on his feet,
covered
with blood, and blowing like a porpoise: by
the time he could get his breath, he commenced
talking. Ain't been so busy in a long time,
said he, turning over his victim with his foot; that
fellow fou't beautiful; if he's a specimen of the
Choctaws that live in these parts, they are screamers;
the infernal sarpents! the dd possums!
Talking
in this way, he with others, took a general
survey
of the killed and wounded. Mike himself was
a good deal cut up with the Indian's knife; but he
called his wounds blackberry scratches. One of
Mike's associates was severely hurt; the rest escaped
comparatively harmless. The sacrifice was made at
the first fire; for beside the dead Indians, there lay
one of the boat's crew, cold and dead, his body
perforated
with four different balls. That he was the
chief object of attack seemed evident, yet no one of
his associates knew of his having a single fight with
the Indians. The soul of Mike was affected, and,
taking the hand of his deceased friend between his
own, he raised his bloody knife towards the bright
moon, and swore that he would desolate the
nation that claimed the Indians who made war
upon them that night, and turned to his stiffened
victim, that, dead as it was, retained the expression
of implacable hatred and defiance, he gave it a
smile of grim satisfaction, and then joined in the
general conversation which the occurrences of the
night would naturally suggest. The master of the
broad horn was a business man, and had often
been down the Mississippi. This was the first attack
he had received, or knew to have been made from
the shores inhabited by the Choctaws, except by
the white man, and he, among other things,
suggested
the keeping the dead Indians until
daylight
,
that they might have an opportunity to
examine
their dress and features, and see with certainty
who were to blame for the occurrences of the night.
The dead boatman was removed with care to a
respectful
distance; and the living, except the person
at the sweep of the boat, were soon buried in
profound
slumber.
Not until after the rude breakfast was partaken
of, and the funeral rites of the dead boatman were
solemnly performed, did Mike and his companions
disturb the corses of the red men.
When both these things had been leisurely and
gently got through with, there was a different spirit
among the men.
Mike was astir, and went about his business with
alacrity. He stripped the bloody blanket from the
Indian he had killed, as if it enveloped something
disgusting, and required no respect. He examined
carefully the moccasins on the Indian's feet,
pronouncing
them at one time Chickasas, at another
time, the Shawnese. He stared at the livid face,
but could not recognise the style of paint that
covered it.
That the Indians were not strictly national in
their adornments, was certain, for they were
examined
by practised eyes, that could have told the
nation of the dead, if such had been the case, as
readily as a sailor could distinguish a ship by its
flag. Mike was evidently puzzled; and as he was
about giving up his task as hopeless, the dead body
he was examining, from some cause, turned on its
side. Mike's eyes distended, as some of his
companions
observed, like a choked cat, and became
riveted. He drew himself up in a half serious,
and half comic expression, and pointing at the back
of the dead Indian's head, there was exhibited a
dead warrior in his paint, destitute of his scalp-lock,
the small stump which was only left, being stiffened
with
red paint
. Those who could read Indians'
symbols learned a volume of deadly resolve in what
they saw. The body of Proud Joe was stiff and
cold before them.
The last and best shot of Mike Fink cost a brave
man his life. The corpse so lately interred, was
evidently taken in the moonlight by Proud Joe and
his party, as that of Mike's, and they had risked
their lives, one and all, that he might with certainty
be sacrificed. Nearly a thousand miles of swamp
had been threaded, large and swift running rivers
had been crossed, hostile tribes passed through by
Joe and his friends, that they might revenge the
fearful insult, of destroying
without the life
, the
sacred scalp-lock.
12*
ALLIGATOR KILLING.
In
the dark recesses of the loneliest swamps, in
those dismal abodes where decay and production
seem to run riot; where the serpent crawls from his
den among the tangled ferns and luxuriant grass, and
hisses forth its propensities to destroy unmolested;
where the toad and lizard spend the live-long day in
their melancholy chirpings; where the stagnant pool
festers and ferments, and bubbles up its foul miasma;
where the fungi seem to grow beneath your gaze;
where the unclean birds retire after their repast, and
sit and stare with dull eyes in vacancy for hours and
days together; there, originates the alligator; there,
if happy in his history, he lives and dies. The
pioneer
of the forest invades his home; the axe lets in
the sunshine upon his hiding-places: he frequently
finds himself, like the Indian, surrounded by the
encroachments
of civilization, a mere intruder in his
original domain, and under such circumstances only
does he become an object of rough sport, the
incidents
of which deserve a passing notice.
The extreme southern portions of the United States
are exceedingly favourable to the growth of the
alligator
:
in the swamps that stretch over a vast extent
of country, inaccessible almost to man, they increase
in numbers and size, live undisputed monarchs of
their abodes, exhibiting but little more intelligence,
or exerting but little more volition than the decayed
trunk of the tree, for which they are not unfrequently
taken. In these swampy regions, however, are
frequently
found high ridges of land inviting
cultivation
.
The log cabin takes the place of the rank
vegetation
;
the evidences of thrift appear; and as the
running
streams display themselves, and are cleared for
navigation, the old settler, the alligator, becomes
exposed
,
and daily falls a victim to the rapacity of man.
Thus hunted, like creatures of higher organization,
he grows more intelligent, from the dangers of his
situation; his taste grows more delicate, and he wars
in turn upon his only enemy; soon acquires a
civilized
taste for pork and poultry, and acquires also a
very uncivilized one for dogs.
An alligator in the truly savage state is a very happy
reptile: encased in an armour as impenetrable as that
of Ajax, he moves about unharmed by surrounding
circumstances. The fangs of the rattlesnake grate
over his scales as they would over a file; the
constrictor
finds nothing about him to crush; the
poisonous
moccasin bites at him in vain; and the
greatest
pest of all, the musquitto, that fills the air of his
abode with a million stings, that burn the fleshlike
sparks of fire, buzz out their fury upon his carcass in
vain. To say that he enjoys not these advantages,
that he crawls not forth as a proud knight in his
armour
,
that he treads not upon the land as a master,
and moves in the water the same, would be doing
injustice to his actions, and his habits, and the
philosophical
example of independence which he sets to
the trembling victims that are daily sacrificed to his
wants.
The character of an alligator's face is far from
being a flattering letter of recommendation. It
suggests
a rude shovel; the mouth extends from the
extreme
tip of the nose backwards until it passes the ears;
indeed, about one-third of the whole animal is mouth,
with the exact expression of a tailor's shears; and
this mouth being ornamented with a superabundance
of rows of white teeth, gives the same hope of
getting
out of it, sound in body and mind, if once in, as
does the hopper of a bark-mill. Its body is short
and round not unlike that of a horse; its tail is very
long and flattened at the end like an oar. It has the
most dexterous use of this appendage, propelling
along, swiftly, and on land it answers the purpose of
a weapon of defence.
The traveller through the lonely swamp at
nightfall
often finds himself surrounded by these singular
creatures, and if he is unaccustomed to their presence
and habits, they cause great alarm. Scattered about
in every direction, yet hidden by the darkness, he
hears their huge jaws open and shut with a force that
makes a noise, when numbers are congregated, like
echoing thunder. Again, in the glare of the
campfire
,
will sometimes be seen the huge alligator
crawling
within the lighted circle, attracted by the smell
of foodperchance you have
squatted
upon a nest of
eggs, encased with great judgment in the centre of
some high ground you yourself have chosen to pass
the night upon. Many there are, who go
unconcernedly
to sleep with such intruders in their immediate
vicinity; but a rifle-ball, effectively fired, will most
certainly leave you unmolested, and the dying
alligator
,
no doubt, comforts itself that the sun will not
neglect its maternal charge, but raise up its numerous
young as hideous and destructive as itself.
The alligator is a luxurious animal, fond of all the
comforts of life, which are, according to its habits,
plentifully scattered around it. We have watched
them, enjoying their evening nap in the shades of
tangled vines, and in the hollow trunk of the cypress,
or floating like a log on the top of some sluggish pool.
We have seen them sporting in the green slime, and
catching, like a dainty gourmand, the fattest frogs,
and longest snakes; but they are in the height of
their glory, stretched out upon the sand-bar, in the
meridian sun, when the summer heats pour down
and radiate back from the parched sand, as tangibly
as they would from red hot iron. In such places
will they bask and blow off, with a loud noise, the
inflated air and water, that would seem to expand
within them as if confined in an iron pipe,
occasionally
rolling about their swinish eyes with a slowness
of motion, that, while it expresses the most perfect
satisfaction, is in no way calculated to agitate their
nerves, or discompose them by too suddenly taking
the impression of outward objects. While thus
disposed
of, and after the first nap is taken, they amuse
themselves with opening their huge jaws to their
widest extent, upon the inside of which, instinctively
settle, thousands of musquittoes and other noxious
insects
that infest the abode of the alligator. When
the inside of the mouth is thus covered, the reptile
brings his jaws together with inconceivable velocity,
gives a gulp or two, and again sets his formidable
trap for this small game.
Some years since, a gentleman in the southern part
of Louisiana, opening a plantation, found, after
most of the forest had been cleared off, that in the
centre of his land was a boggy piece of low soil
covering
nearly twenty acres. This place was
singularly
infested with alligators. Among the first
victims
that fell a prey to their rapacity, were a number
of hogs and fine poultry; next followed most of a
pack of fine deer hounds. It may be easily
imagined
that the last outrage was not passed over with
indifference
.
The leisure time of every day was
devoted
to their extermination, until the cold of winter
rendered them torpid and buried them up in the
mud. The following summer, as is naturally the
case, the swamp, from the heat of the sun,
contracted
in its dimensions; a number of artificial ditches
drained off the water, and left the alligators little else
to live in than mud, about the consistency of good
mortar: still the alligators clung, with singular
tenacity
,
to their native homesteads as if perfectly
conscious
that the coming fall would bring them rain.
While thus exposed, a general attack was planned,
carried into execution, and nearly every alligator of
any size was destroyed. It was a fearful and
disgusting
sight to see them rolling about in the thick
mud, striking their immense jaws together in the
agony of death. Dreadful to relate, the stench of
these decaying bodies in the hot sun produced an
unthought-of evil. Teams of oxen were used in vain
to haul them away; the progress of corruption under
the sun of a tropical climate made the attempt
fruitless
.
On the very edge of the swamp, with nothing
exposed but the head, lay a huge monster, evidently
sixteen or eighteen feet long; he had been wounded
in the melee, and made incapable of moving, and the
heat had actually baked the earth around his body as
firmly as if imbedded in cement. It was a cruel and
singular exhibition, to see so much power and
destruction
so helpless. We amused ourselves in
throwing things into his great cavernous mouth,
which he would grind up between his teeth.
Seizing
a large oak rail, we attempted to run it down his
throat, but it was impossible; for he held it for a
moment as firmly as if it had been the bow of a ship,
then with his jaws crushed and ground it to fine
splinters. The old fellow, however, had his revenge;
the dead alligators were found more destructive than
the living ones, and the plantation for a season had
to be abandoned.
In shooting the alligator, the bullet must hit just
in front of the fore legs, where the skin is most
vulnerable
;
it seldom penetrates in other parts of the
body. Certainty of aim, therefore, tells, in alligator
shooting, as it does in every thing else connected
with sporting. Generally, the alligator, when
wounded
,
retreats to some obscure place; but if wounded
in a
bayou
, where the banks are steep, and not
affording
any hiding-places, he makes considerable
amusement
in his convolutions in the water, and in his
efforts to avoid the pain of his smarting wounds. In
shooting, the instant you fire, the reptile disappears,
and you are for a few moments unable to learn the
extent of injury you have inflicted. An excellent
shot, that sent the load with almost unerring certainty
through the eye, was made at a huge alligator, and,
as usual, he disappeared, but almost instantly rose
again, spouting water from his nose, not unlike a
whale. A second ball, shot in his tail, sent him
down again, but he instantly rose and spouted: this
singular conduct prompted a bit of provocation, in
the way of a plentiful sprinkling of bits of wood,
rattled
against his hide. The alligator lashed himself
into a fury; the blood started from his mouth; he
beat the water with his tail until he covered himself
with spray, but never sunk without instantly rising
again. In the course of the day he died and floated
ashore; and, on examination, it was found that the
little valve nature has provided the reptile with, to
close over its nostrils when under water, had been
cut off by the first shot, and thus compelled him to
stay on the top of the water to keep from being
drowned. We have heard of many since who have
tried thus to wound them, and although they have
been hit in the nose, yet they have been so crippled
as to sink and die.
The alligator is particularly destructive on pigs
and dogs, when they inhabit places near plantations;
and if you wish to shoot them, you can never fail to
draw them on the surface of the water, if you will
make a dog yell, or pig squeal; and that too, in
places where you may have been fishing all day,
without suspecting their presence. Herodotus
mentions
the catching of crocodiles in the Nile, by
baiting
a hook with flesh, and then attracting the reptile
towards it by making a hog squeal. The ancient
Egyptian manner of killing the crocodile is different
from that of the present day, as powder and ball have
changed the manner of destruction; but the fondness
for pigs in the crocodile and alligator, after more than
two thousand years, remains the same.
13
A GRIZZLY BEAR HUNT.
The
every-day sports of the wild woods include
many feats of daring that never find a pen of record.
Constantly, in the haunts of the savage, are enacting
scenes of thrilling interest, the very details of which
would make the denizen of enlightened life
turn away with instinctive dread. Every Indian
tribe has its heroes, celebrated respectively for their
courage in different ways exhibited. Some for their
acuteness in pursuing the enemy on the war-path,
and others for the destruction they have
accomplished
among the wild beasts of the forest. A great
hunter among the Indians is a marked personage.
It is a title that distinguishes its possessor among
his people as a prince; while the exploits in which
he has been engaged hang about his person as
brilliantly as the decorations of so many orders.
The country in which the Osage finds a home
possesses
abundantly the grizzly bear, an animal formidable
beyond any other inhabitant of the North American
forests: an animal seemingly insensible to pain,
uncertain
in its habits, and by its mighty strength able
to overcome any living obstacle that comes within
its reach, as an enemy. The Indian warrior, of any
tribe, among the haunts of the grizzly bear, finds no
necklace so honourable to be worn as the claws of
this gigantic animal, if he fall by his own prowess;
and if he can add an eagle's plume to his scalp-lock,
plucked from a bird shot while on the wing, he is
honourable indeed. The Indian's smoke, like
the fire-side of the white man, is often the place
where groups of people assemble to relate whatever
may most pleasantly while away the hours of a long
evening, or destroy the monotony of a dull and idle
day. On such occasions, the old brave will
sometimes relax from his natural gravity, and grow
loquacious over his chequered life. But no recital
commands such undivided attention as the
adventures
with the grizzly bear; and the death of an
enemy on the war-path hardly vies with it in
interest.
We have listened to these soul-stirring adventures
over the urn, or while lounging on the sofa; and the
recital of the risks run, the hardships endured, have
made us think them almost impossible, when
compared
with the conventional self-indulgence of
enlightened
life. But they were the tales of a truthful
man: a hunter, who had strayed away from the
scenes once necessary for his life, and who loved,
like the worn-out soldier, to fight his battles over,
in which he was once engaged. It may be, and is
the province of the sportsman to exaggerate; but
the hunter, surrounded by the magnificence and
sublimity of an American forest, earning his bread
by the hardy adventures of the chase, meets with
too much reality to find room for colouringtoo
much of the sublime and terrible in the scenes with
which he is associated to be boastful of himself.
Apart from the favourable effects of civilization, he
is also separated from its contaminations; and
boasting
and exaggeration are settlements, weaknesses,
and not the products of the wild woods.
The hunter, whether Indian or white, presents
one of the most extraordinary exhibitions of the
singular capacity of the human senses to be improved
by cultivation. The unfortunate deaf, dumb, and
blind girl, in one of our public institutions,
[4]
[4]
Hartford Asylum for the Deaf and Dumb.
selects
her food, her clothing, and her friends, by the touch
aloneso delicate has it become from the mind's
being directed to that sense alone. The forest
hunter uses the sight most extraordinarily well,
and experience at last renders it so keen, that the
slightest touch of passing object on the leaves, trees,
or earth, seems to leave deep and visible
impressions
,
that to the common eye are unseen as the
path of the bird through the air. This knowledge
governs the chase and the war-path; this knowledge
is what, when excelled in, makes the master-spirit
among the rude inhabitants of the woods: and that
man is the greatest chief, who follows the coldest
trail, and leaves none behind by his own footsteps.
The hunter in pursuit of the grizzly bear is governed
by this instinct of sight. It directs him with more
certainty than the hound is directed by his nose.
The impressions of the bear's footsteps upon the
leaves, its marks on the trees, its resting-places, are
all known long before the bear is really seen; and
the hunter, while thus following the trail,
calculates
the very sex, weight, and age with certainty.
Thus it is that he will neglect or choose a trail: one
because it is poor, and another because it is small,
another because it is with cubs, another because it
is fat, identifying the very trail as the bear itself;
and herein, perhaps, lies the distinction between the
sportsman, and the huntsman. The hunter follows
his object by his own knowledge and instinct, while
the sportsman employs the instinct of domesticated
animals to assist in his pursuits.
The different methods to destroy the grizzly bear,
by those who hunt them, are as numerous as the
bears that are killed. They are not animals which
permit of a system in hunting them; and it is for
this reason they are so dangerous and difficult to
destroy. The experience of one hunt may cost a
limb or a life in the next one, if used as a criterion;
and fatal, indeed, is the mistake, if it comes to
grappling
with an animal whose gigantic strength enables
him to lift a horse in his huge arms, and bear it
away as a prize. There is one terrible exception
to this rule; one habit of the animal may be
certainly
calculated on, but a daring heart only can
take advantage of it.
The grizzly bears, like the tiger and lion, have their
caves in which they live; but they use them
principally
as a safe lodging-place when the cold of
winter renders them torpid and disposed to sleep.
To these caves they retire late in the fall, and they
seldom venture out until the warmth of spring.
Sometimes two occupy one cave, but this is not
often the case, as the unsociability of the animal is
proverbial, they preferring to be solitary and alone.
13*
A knowledge of the forests, and an occasional
trailing
for bear inform the hunter of these caves, and
the only habit of the grizzly bear that can with
certainty
be taken advantage of, is that of his being in
his cave alive, if at a proper season. And the
hunter
has the terrible liberty of entering his cave
singlehanded
,
and there destroying him. Of this only
method of hunting the grizzly bear we would attempt
a description.
The thought of entering a cave, inhabited by one
of the most powerful beasts of prey, is calculated to
try the strength of the best nerves; and when it is
considered that the least trepidation, the slightest
mistake, may cause, and probably will result in the
instant death of the hunter, it certainly exhibits the
highest demonstration of physical courage to pursue
such a method of hunting. Yet there are many
persons
in the forests of North America who engage in
such perilous adventures with no other object in
view than the sport or hearty meal. The hunter's
preparations to beard the lion in his den
commence
with examining the mouth of the cave he is
about to enter. Upon the signs there exhibited he
decides whether the bear is alone; for if there are
two, the cave is never entered. The size of the
bear is also thus known, and the time since he was
last in search of food. The way this knowledge is
obtained, from indications so slight, or unseen to an
ordinary eye, is one of the greatest mysteries of the
woods. Placing ourselves at the mouth of the cave
containing a grizzly bear, to our untutored senses
there would be nothing to distinguish it from one
that was empty; but if some Diana of the forest
would touch our eyes, and give us the instinct of
sight possessed by the hunter, we would argue thus:
From all the marks about the mouth of the cave,
the occupant has not been out for a great length of
time, for the grass and the earth have not been lately
disturbed. The bear is in the cave, for the last tracks
made are with the toe-marks towards the cave.
There is but one bear, because the tracks are regular
and of the same size. He is a large bear; the length
of the step and the size of the paw indicate this; and
he is a fat one, because his
hind feet do not step in
the impressions made by the fore ones
, as is always
the case with a lean bear. Such are the signs and
arguments that present themselves to the hunter; and
mysterious as they seem, when not understood, when
explained they strike the imagination at once as
being
founded on the unerring simplicity and the
certainty
of nature. It may be asked, how is it that
the grizzly bear is so formidable to numbers when
met in the forest, and when in a cave can be
assailed successfully by a single man? In answer to
this, we must recollect that the bear is only attacked
in his cave when he is in total darkness, and suffering
from surprise and the torpidity of the season. These
three things are in this method of hunting taken
advantage of; and but for these advantages, no
quickness
of eye, no steadiness of nerve or forest
experience
,
would protect for an instant the intruder
to the cave of the grizzly bear. The hunter, having
satisfied himself about the cave, prepares a candle,
which he makes out of the wax taken from the comb
of wild bees, softened by the grease of the bear.
This candle has a large wick, and emits a brilliant
flame. Nothing else is needed but the rifle. The
knife and the belt are useless; for if a struggle should
ensue that would make it available, the foe is too
powerful to mind its thrusts before the hand using it
would be dead. Bearing the candle before him,
with the rifle in a convenient position, the hunter
fearlessly enters the cave. He is soon surrounded by
darkness, and is totally unconscious where his enemy
will reveal himself. Having fixed the candle in the
ground in firm position, with an apparatus provided
he lights it, and its brilliant flame soon penetrates
into the recesses of the cavernits size of course
rendering the illumination more or less complete.
The hunter now places himself on his belly, having
the candle between the back part of the cave where
the bear is, and himself; in this position, with the
muzzle of the rifle protruding out in front of him, he
patiently waits for his victim. A short time only
elapses before Bruin is aroused by the light. The
noise made by his starting from sleep attracts the
hunter, and he soon distinguishes the black mass,
moving, stretching, and yawning like a person
awaked from a deep sleep. The hunter moves not,
but prepares his rifle; the bear, finally roused, turns
his head toward the candle, and, with slow and
waddling steps, approaches it.
Now is the time that tries the nerves of the hunter.
Too late to retreat, his life hangs upon his certain
aim and the goodness of his powder. The slightest
variation in the bullet, or a flashing pan, and he is
a doomed man. So tenacious of life is the common
black bear, that it is frequently wounded in its most
vital parts, and will still escape, or give terrible battle.
But the grizzly bear seems to possess an infinitely
greater tenacity of life. His skin, covered by matted
hair, and the huge bones of his body, protect the
heart, as if incased in a wall; while the brain is
buried in a skull, compared to which adamant is
not harder. A bullet, striking the bear's forehead,
would flatten, if it struck squarely on the solid bone,
as if fired against a rock; and dangerous indeed
would it be to take the chance of reaching the
animal's heart. With these fearful odds against the
hunter, the bear approaches the candle, growing
every moment more sensible of some uncommon
intrusion
.
He reaches the blaze, and either raises his
paw to strike it, or lifts his nose to scent it, either
of which will extinguish it, and leave the hunter
and the bear in total darkness. This dreadful
moment
is taken advantage of. The loud report of
the rifle fills the cave with stunning noise, and as
the light disappears, the ball, if successfully fired,
penetrates the eye of the huge animalthe only
place where it would find a passage to the brain;
and this not only gives the wound, but instantly
paralyzes, that no temporary resistance may be made.
On such chances the American hunter perils his life,
and often thoughtlessly courts the danger.
CONCORDIA LAKE.
[5]
[5]
A DIAGRAM ILLUSTRATING THE FORMATION OF INLAND LAKES,
NEAR THE BANKS OF THE MISSISSIPPI.
Opposite
the high bluffs of the Natchez lies
the beautiful country of Concordia, level as the
surface
of water, and rich in its soil as it is possible for
earth to be. At present a few large plantations
occupy much of its space, laid off in enormous fields,
where the plough sometimes progresses a mile
without
turning in the furrow. In old times the
Mississippi
ran through the lower part of Concordia,
making
one of those sudden bends where it comes back
almost to the very point of diverging. In one of its
capricious moods, it cut through this thus-formed
isthmus, and ran more directly to the sea, leaving a
kind of horse-shoe furrow to mark the old bed of
the river. The high waters of the spring, bearing
within their bosom the sediment of almost unlimited
caving shores, deposited in time at the mouth of the
cut off the solid earth, and thus formed, as has
been done a hundred times before and is constantly
doing now, the bed of an inland lake, bordering the
shores of the Mississippi. Thus originated the
beautiful lake of Concordia, upon the shores of
which, we can imagine, in years not far hence, the
continuous line of semi-palaces and the crowded
mart; and resting upon its waters the gay
pleasure-boat
,
and the cumbrous one of commerce, together
with all the associations of a country long settled
and full of wealth. At present, however, a different
scene is presented; comparatively all is wild; the
residences that reflect in its clear waters are like
angels' visits, few and far between, while the fairy
island, that is set like a gem in its centre, still
remains
in its primeval wilderness.
Along the shores of Concordia Lake is heard the
oft-repeated echo of the sharp rifle and the ringing
melody of the hound. In the luxuriant foliage of
the island the beautiful deer graze plentifully and
almost undisturbed. The wild turkey clucks to
daylight almost as securely as its representative in
the farm-yard. The hunter, starting his game on
the mainland, expects that it will plunge into the
lake to avoid the ruthless hound: and often, indeed,
is the angler startled from his quiet by the
deep-mouthed
bay of the hard-pressing pack while in
the still dark water, where he expected to deceive
the trout, and to which he stole so stealthily, there
will plunge the swelled-neck buck, bearing his
proud antlers aloft, and, breasting the waves nobly,
labouring for life. The light canoe or the rude skiff is
pressed into service, by some volunteer of the
hunt, and pushed across to the island. The
buck, thus pressed on all sides, and perhaps met
with a salute as he touches the shore from a
murderous
fowling-piece, plunges again into the lake.
Every thing seems full of animation: you hear the
shout of the hunters encouraging the dogs; amidst
the music, trumpet-tongued, the breezes seem to
spring up and shake the pendant foliage from
sympathy
.
At break-neck pace, the well-trained horse,
with distended eyes, leaps over the ravine and fallen
tree, the happiest being in the chase, then checks
his swift speed at command, and as steady as a rock
awaits the shot from off his back; then again bounds
forward to mark the work of death. The poor buck,
pressed on all sides, and at every movement of his
muscles parting, through his wounds, with his life's
blood, turns upon his enemies, rears, plunges and
strikes with his fore-feet; but he is dragged down
and slain, his hair turned forward as roughly as the
quills of the porcupine, his eye mysteriously green
from rage, and unflinching in its defiance to the last.
The excitement passes away. The horn rings
merrily
as a token of triumph, and silence again reigns.
The angler resumes his sport, and the flocks of
white crane settle down in the shallows. The waves,
caused by the last throes of the dying deer, spend
themselves in light shore-reaching circles until they
are lost in the mirrored surface, and the last token
of the presence of the most beautiful inhabitant of
the forest is obliterated as if it had not been.
The angling of Lake Concordia is one of its
distinctive
features: if you will go to the favourite places,
you can, at any time, overload yourself with fish.
In the centre of the lake is its outlet; the Cocodra, a
narrow and deep stream, bears off its waters towards
the great Mississippi; a few miles run, it widens into
Turtle Lake, with bolder, and therefore, seemingly
wilder scenery than is often to be met with in the
alluvial. Turtle is a beautiful name; it suggests
pleasant pictures. Upon the shores of Turtle Lake
is heard the cooing of many doves; but it is Turtle
Lake from its abundance of green, amphibious
soft-shells
that cover the fallen timber when the sun
shines hot, and drop into the water at your near
approach
As easy as falling off a log.
In the immediate influence of the Cocodra, you
can catch an abundance of trout or perch without
much skill or trouble; but as you approach the
extreme
ends or heads of the lake, more art and patience
are required. It has been convenient for us to throw
the line just where least reward might be expected,
14
yet we have always been paid for our labour, and
served our purpose well. We are great anglers,
though we seldom catch fish. There is a spirit in
the still waters or running brook that laves the soul,
but we cannot communicate with it, unless it comes
to us along the rod and line; herein, if naught else,
would be our reward.
The winds, and the sky, and the tide, and the bait,
and the tackle, affect catching fish; but they affect
not thought. We sit down under the shade of the
favourite tree, or the shelving bank, and cast our
snare, and philosophize. We have often let the
naked hook play the scarecrow among the game,
while we have watched the mischievous blackbird
shoot along the margin of the water, dabbling for
minnows. There were a pair of eagles when we first
knew Lake Concordia, that in the morning light rose
up over the lowlands, as if they would peep down
into the east, and surprise the sun at its getting up.
There were no towering Himmalahs to rest their wings
midway, and when they had gilded their pinions with
the coming glory, thus hailing the birth of another
day, then they would shoot down to earth as if with
glad tidings, and soar joyously over their wild home,
fanning the still air into zephyrs, and sending the
fearful waterfowl in confused groups from their
presence
.
A tall cypress that peered over its fellows,
held among its dead limbs at the top, a black
confused
mass that was known as the eagle's nest; it
was entrenched by matted foliage that revels in the
southern swamps, hiding away the alligator and other
reptiles: it was beyond the reach of the rifle; the
tallest and safest eyry for miles about. A hurricane
may have prostrated it, or the thunderbolt shattered
itthe eagles and their nest have disappeared.
A rough Virginia fence, over which the Cherokee
rose had entwined itself, as if in mercy to its jagged
appearance, made a good shade and a deep shadow
at some hours of the day, and from its prodigal wealth
in little buds, enlivened dull fishing. A little wren
we remember in particular, who had built its nest in
the hollow of the unsightly skull of an ox, suspended
on an upright post of the fence. It was a little
fellow
,
and busy beyond description; a perfect hen
hussy; there was always a stray horsehair, or bit of
moss in the wrong place, or too much down
protruded
from the eyeless sockets. We have watched the
bird as we sat lazily waiting our fortune, and thought
nature would thus pleasantly teach us a lesson of
industry
,
and also one of gratitude. We have seen its little
throat palpitate and swell with song until it seemed
almost to despair of wringing out its music. It would
throw its head upon its downy breast, and then raise
it with each ascending note until it fairly screamed
on its tiptoes, then tripping into its nest, a new
thought would suggest itself, and again the air would
be laden with sweet sounds, uttered, but never
written
,
inspired by Him who created the harmony which
met the ear when the stars sang together for joy.
A tap from our rod, but gently though, as if from a
beauty's fan, and we turn to our occupation
struggling
upon our line is a black perch; and now that
we remember it, the float was out of sight when that
bit of sweet sounds done up in feathers commenced
pouring out its little heart to the spring and the
sunshine
.
Our early friend Elliott is a devoted angler; he
has an interminable quantity of trappings; and when
we first looked into his collection of rods, reels, hooks
and swivels, we told him we feared they were like
the rules of logic, more for show than use. He
replied
,
we might make the same remark of the
marriage
ceremony, and think so too, if we put no value
upon legitimacy. We saw there was something
deeper than our philosophy in his answer, and have
believed in costly tackling ever since. We found
Elliott once fishing at a spot that commanded a fine
view of the lake; just beyond him, there ran out into
the water a sharp point graced with live oak trees
covered with moss; behind the deep foliage, the sun
was sinking, throwing dark shadows, while a stray
pencil of light would here and there glance through
the trees and kiss the water with almost blinding
brilliancy. His thoughts were dissipated, for he was
speculating upon the landscape, then listlessly
looking
at his success of the evening as an angler. He
held up his string to our gaze; upon it was a
beautiful fish burnished with silver; he was attractive
indeed, to look at, but one acquainted with its merits
knew too well of the infinite bones that spread under
his gay exterior as confusedly as the stems of a
brier-patch
.
This fish was kept merely for show. The
next, and only one, was a juvenile perch; the poor
innocent had scarcely got clear of the spawn, and
become
able to flourish in water fairly over its head,
when his want of experience had placed him at the
tender mercies of the hook and line. We pitied him
as he occasionally whipped his tail about, and then
worked his jaws upon the string that held him fast as
if it were a cud of bitterness. Such had been
Elliott's
fortune. With slowly decreasing interest had
he watched his float as it sat daintily on the water,
and wished it to disappear.
I love to see it tremble, said Elliott, pointing to
it, speaking in a softened voice, tremble as if it had a
pulse ere it darts so swiftly from the sight. What
expectations it gives rise to! It moves a little; some
gigantic fish has just brushed against the bait and
is now preparing to gulp it down. Again it
trembles
Elliott
struck, and drew into the air a little
one, playing its fins like a humming bird, and as
transparent as if it were made of amber. How
astonished
and disappointed were the beating hearts
at both ends of the line. Elliott took the incipient
off carefully, and let it roll down towards the water
through a little dry earth. How the prismatic
scales grow dim with the contact, but for its moving
about, it might be taken for a chip. A dash in the
waterit's offcleaned of dust, its yellow sides turn
downwards, and the little black line of its back
passes away like thought.
A juvenile toad that was playing leap-frog for
the sake of exercising his developing body, chanced,
as his bad luck would have it, to pass our way. A
little exertion secured the creature, and with as much
delicacy as a groomsman would place a ring upon
the finger of his beloved bride, Elliott secured the
toad on his hook, and committed it to the lake.
14*
The little unfortunate toad struck out for dear life,
and swam boyfully; but his time had come; the very
ripple his little arms made in the water had caught
the never-closed eye of a lazy trout. The fish came
to the surface, and eyed the bait as a gourmand will
the dishes of an arranging dessert, rolled over its
spotted sides sportively, and disappeared. An
instant
elapsed, when the trout appeared coming up
vertically, its fine head glistened in the sun a
moment
,
then, as quick as thought, again it disappeared;
it then rose, floated nearer the bait, mouthing at
it most provokingly. We were all excitement;
Elliott, on the contrary, performed his office as
silently and immovedly as a statue. In fact his rod
lay carelessly across his knee as if he never expected
to use it; but his eye the while was upon his game;
he knew its humours perfectly, and was contentedly
indulging its capriciousness. Presently the trout
turned and swam towards the centre of the lake
we thought it lost. Elliott raised his delicate rod,
and, for the first time, moved it slowly, skimming
his bait along the surface of the water in little leaps
a ripplea rushing noisea tail quivering in the air,
and our poor frog was in the trout's maw. The fish
had turned from its course to gather one more
dainty mouthful ere it buried itself in the deep water.
The capture was gracefully made, and the fish was
game to the last. The noble fellow pressed back
his gills, distended his mouth, until you could
put in it your hand to disengage the hook, then, laid
upon some wet moss, with a few convulsive
struggles
,
he dieda trophy of the angler's skill.
Among the fastnesses that border on Concordia
Lake still linger some few renegade Indians, who
make a precarious living in the barter of game;
disappearing sometimes for months, then presenting
themselves with illy-prepared peltries, a dead deer
or turkeythe sale of which procures their few
necessaries
and
again they will wander off, as wild
and heedless as the passing winds. These red
children complete the picturesque. Gypsy-like, they
choose the happiest locations for their smokes,
the men with the ingenuity of cats finding a soft and
fitting place for comfortable sleep, while the women
always sit by watching. An old oak, at whose foot
centuries since the earth-dissolving waters of the
Mississippi boiled, robbing the roots of its soil,
until
they protruded like the writhing forms of a
hundred
serpents, seeking nourishment deeper in the
bosom of the earth for their attempted exhumation.
An old oak, whose largest limbs are dead, yet, like
proud age, affects youth by false appointments; of
wigs, of manilla-scented muscadines; of rouge, of
the deep-red foliage of a hundred flowering vines;
of props, of the quick growing cotton-wood that
shoots aloft amid its vines; of stays, the convolving
grape, binding together its wind-whistled ribs.
Under this old oak we have frequent met a family
of the once powerful Choctaws. From where they
dozed away the noontide heats, but for a narrow
belt of intervening forest, could be seen the Natchez
bluffs, and on them, breaking darkly against the sky,
the ruins of old Fort Rosalie.
Four generations since, and the ancestors of this
Indian family, seven hundred strong, fell upon
the Natchez, while exulting over the massacre of
the French at the fort of Rosalie, stormed their
villages, liberated their prisoners, and, without loss,
exulted in the possession of three-score scalps. Ten
days after, the French from New Orleans completed
the victory, and thus destroyed the most singular
nation of all our aborigines; scattering them among
the Chicasas and Muscogees; and seizing their great
seer and two hundred prisoners as slaves. The flying
remnant of the tribe crossed the Mississippi, swept
by the old oak we have described in their flight,
coursed along the margin of Concordia Lake,
reflected
fleetingly in the Cocodra and Turtle lakes,
and entrenched themselves for deathly siege, in
ancient
mounds, a day's travel from their native homes,
over which the white man now incuriously wanders,
ignorant alike of their associations or purposes, and
known but to the few who cherish the traditions
and antiquities of our western home.
Such are a few of the incidents and associations
of Concordia Lake.
A FRONTIER INCIDENT.
Fortune favours the brave.
A frontier
military post, in peace or war, to the
great number of persons, is a place of much fun and
frolic. We are indebted to such a place for much
past pleasure and many pleasing recollections. The
soldier's life is one of adventure; few in the army,
indeed
,
are dull talkers, though all, in their way, can tell
events so thrilling in their details, that the manner is
unnoticed in the interest of the subjects themselves.
Then again, these military posts have some good
fellows
,
as hangers-on, that are nowhere else to be met
with; gentlefolks that at college were remarkable for
their low standing with the faculty, and for their
popularity
with the boys. Mad scapegraces, that after
graduating as doctors or lawyers, lost all their
practice
at home; the one by quoting too largely from
the imagination instead of the statutes, the other by
some unfortunate propensity to feel ladies' hands
instead
of their pulses, in an unprofessional manner.
Good dogs, indeed, but unsuited to the times; and
where else could they find a field for gibes and jests
like a new country? or more fit companions than the
officers of frontier garrisons? Besides, the officers
are so glad to meet with such refined company where
they least expected; and the hangers-on are so
delighted
to meet with champagne and pate de foie
gras where they least expected it. Thus, both
parties are always pleased, always ready to be happy,
and to do their best to make all around them so; and a
frontier garrison is a jolly place. Major Freeman was
the name of the commander of one of these military
posts; he possessed the most generous and warm
temperament
,
and, as is the consequence sometimes with
such persons, he was exceedingly passionate.
Educated
in a camp from his infancy, he had learned to
command, even in his boyhood, as he learned to grow,
without knowing anything about the matter,except
that he grew and commanded, and took one as much
as a matter of course as the other. As manhood and
middle age came on, as might be expected, his
influence
among his equals amounted to the highest
respect, and with his inferiors it was wonderful; they
would quail before his angry eye and tongue, as if
they saw lightning and heard thunder. And Major
Freeman was loved, almost idolized, by all who knew
him: and the helpless, injured innocent, though the
humblest being under his command, would from him
receive redress and protection. In early life, the
Major had won the fame of a brave and prudent
man; but many years of glorious ease had made him
the master-spirit in feats of the trencher: in this active
service, he told the best story, had the choicest
brands, the best cook, and with a delicacy almost
unknown, always turned his back, or shut up his
eyes, whenever you drank at his table or sideboard.
In him we had a frontier lion; and the way said lion
and his companions used to destroy the beasts of the
forest, including a considerable number of fowls of
the air, was huckleberry above the persimmon of
any native in the country, and astonished the natives
beyond any thing else, save the idea of a man's
keeping two varmints in a grass-patch, when he might
shoot a dozen by going a little way into the woods.
These varmints were two beautiful deer, which
the Major had purchased, when they were fawns, from
some wandering Indians; he had fed them with milk
from his own hand, and now that they were full
grown, they adorned the garrison park,the
favourites
on whom he bestowed those affections, which
would, most probably, under other circumstances,
have been lavished on a wife and children. These
deer, in fact, were sacred; if the roe eat up the
dahlias, jasmines, or other choice flowers of the
neighbouring gardens,if the buck kicked over
every child he met, and then half kicked out their
eyes,for these things were constant pastimes,the
Major would pleasantly observe, that flowers were
made for Fanny to eat, and Dick's heels were
perfectly
harmless, if the young ones were out of the
way: all was wrong; if so, the deer were right.
On a fine summer evening, the jolly good fellows
of the garrison, as they were wont, headed by the
Major, were whiling the time in the most agreeable
manner, by turns humorous and pathetic, the feeling
softened by choice wine, the mind disposed to quiet,
until we had arrived at that point, of all others the
most agreeable, that hallucination, when one is
entirely
satisfied with himself, and feels at peace and
good-will with all mankind. In this humour, for the
first time in our memory, we were interrupted. A
tall, scape-gallows-lloking fellow, thrust a strange
face in at the door without notice or ceremony; the
Major's eye flashed for a moment, but grew mild as
he discovered it was one of the people (the
soldiers
were under better discipline) that had
interrupted
us, and at the same time demanded what the
fellow wanted. The reply was prompt, and as
follows
:
I comprehend that you are fond of venison
in this 'ere place; well, I have a fine buck to sell
a r'al smasherand you can have him for precious
little plunder, and no mistake. The name of the
venison acted upon our senses like a charm, and we
congratulated each other with cordiality that would
have done honour to friends meeting after a long
separation. While this was going on, the Major
bargained
for the buck, provided he liked its appearance
on sight; and, purse in hand, and followed by his
gallant companions in knives and forks, went out to
see the carcass. Oh, horror! who shall describe the
scene that ensued! On the grass before us, lay a
magnificent buck slightly wounded, with his feet
bound, and panting from fear, as if his heart would
fly out of his mouth, and big round tears were
rolling
down his dappled cheeks. In affecting plight,
the Major discovered his favourite! Speechless with
rage, he looked at the poor prisoner, and then at its
keeper; and choking like a drowning man, he at last
exclaimed, with the voice of thunder, Damnation,
fellow, where did you get that deer? The astonished
countryman knew the man with whom he was
dealing
,
and his anger appalled him; and in choaking
accents he replied, as soon as his fright would let
him speak, I caught the thing in the river below, I
did. You are a liar! roared the Major, you
have been robbing my premises, and you shall rot in
prison, you shall ! then drawing the knife, he
stept forward, and with one dash unloosed the deer,
which struggled upon its feet and limped away; then
turning, as we thought, to unloose the robber's
windpipe
,
who had, on the appearance of the knife, broke
and made good his escape before he could be
molested
.
The Major in his rage, gasped convulsively
for a moment, and then, giving utterance to the
wildest
imprecations, disappeared. The effect of all this
on our party was dreadful; it was the first time in
his life that he had ever left his guests without a
smile, and an invitation to walk in, and be at
home. We viewed each other with rueful
countenances
,
and returned, unbidden, to the room we had
so recently left. Here we found the Major, moody
and dispirited, and this humour increased upon him
as we heard the report of a rifle, which deposited its
contents in the unfortunate deer's head, by the
Major's
orders, to release the poor creature from its
sufferings. In the midst of this embarrassing
situation
,
there burst into the room, contrary to all
military
etiquette, a reg'lar; his eyes staring, and his
mouth open. This piece of ill manners, and second
interruption, that too, from one of his own corps, was
too much for the Major as he then felt; and,
probably
taking advantage of thisexcept to give loose to
his pent-up feelings,he leaped the table, seized the
poor private by the throat, and hurled him to the floor,
15
exclaimingYou poltroon! and will you too,
without
a single mark of respect, enter into the presence
of your superiors? Do you think I will overlook
your impertinence as I did that scoundrel of a
countryman's
,
on the score of ignorance? No, no! cried
the poor soldier, forgive me, your two deers are safe;
and the one just shot isThe man said no more: the
Major reeled for a moment like one about to faint, then
throwing his purse at the poor soldier's head, gave
three cheers, in which all present joined, so loudly
and heartily, and with such unison, that the tumblers
and decanters on the table chimed like the ringing
of distant bells. Happiness was most singularly and
unexpectedly restored to our little party, and the poor
deer which had caused the only unwelcome
interruption
in our long social intercourse, apologized to
our entire satisfaction, in the richest steaks and
haunches that ever graced our table; and as we paid
our devoirs to the delicious viands, there flashed the
brightest wit, and passed the happiest hours, that
ever blessed the old campaigners of the
Frontier
Garrison
.
THE MISSISSIPPI.
I have been
Where the wild will of Mississippi's tide
Has dashed me on the sawyer.
Brainerd
.
The
North American continent, in its
impenetrable
forests, its fertile prairies, its magnificent
lakes, its veriety of rivers with their falls, is the
richest portion of our globe. Many of these
wonderful
exhibitions of nature are already shrines where
pilgrims from every land assemble to admire and
marvel at the surpassing wonders of a new world.
So numerous indeed are the objects presented, so
novel and striking is their character, that the
judgment
is confused in endeavouring to decide which
single one is worthy of the greatest admiration; and
the forests, the prairies, the lakes, the rivers, and
falls, each in turn dispute the supremacy. But to
us, the Mississippi ranks first in importance; and
thus we think must it strike all, when they consider
the luxurious fertility of the valley through which it
flows, its vast extent, and the charm of mystery that
rests upon its waters. The Niagara Falls, with its
fearful depths, its rocky heights, its thunder, and
bows of promise, addresses itself to the ear, and
the eye, and through these alone impresses the
beholder
with the greatness of its character. The
Mississippi, on the contrary, although it may have
few or no tangible demonstrations of power, although
it has no language with which it can startle the
senses, yet in a still small voice it addresses
the mind, with its terrible lessons of strength and
sublimity, more forcibly than any other object in
nature.
The name
Mississippi
was derived from the
aborigines of the country, and has been poetically
rendered the Father of Waters. There is little
truth in this translation, and it gives no idea, or
scarcely none, of the river itself. The literal
meaning
of the Indian compound Mississippi, as is the
case with all Indian names in this country, would
have been much better, and every way more
characteristic
.
From the most numerous Indian tribe
in the south-west we derive the name, and it would
seem that the same people who gave the name to
the Mississippi, at different times possessed nearly
half the continent; judging from the fact that the
Ohio in the north, and many of the most southern
points of the peninsula of Florida, are from the
Choctaw language. With that tribe the two simple
adjectives,
Missah
and
Sippah
, are used when
describing
the most familiar things; but these two
words, though they are employed thus familiarly
when separated, when compounded, form the most
characteristic name we can get of this wonderful
river. Missah, literally
Old big
, Sippah,
strong
,
Old-big-strong
; and this name is eminently
appropriate
to the Mississippi.
The country through which this river flows is
almost
entirely alluvial. Not a stone is to be seen,
save about its head-waters; but a dark rich earth
that looks eager for the hand of cultivation; for
vegetation lies piled upon its surface with a
luxuriant
wastefulness that beggars all description, and
finds no comparison for its extent, except in the
mighty river from which it receives its support.
This alluvial soil forms frail banks to confine the
swift current of the Mississippi; and, as might be
imagined, they are continually altering their shape
and location. The channel is capricious and
wayward
in its course. The needle of the compass
turns round and round upon its axis, as it marks the
bearings of your craft, and in a few hours will
frequently
point due north, west, east, and south,
delineating
those tremendous bends in the stream
which nature seems to have formed to check the
head-long current, and keep it from rushing too
madly to the ocean. But the stream does not always
tamely circumscribe these bends: gathering strength
from resistance, it will form new and more direct
channels; and thus it is that large tracts of country once
on the river, become inland, or are entirely swept away
by the current; and so frequently does this happen, that
cut-offs are almost as familiar to the eye on the
Mississippi as its muddy waters. When the
Mississippi
,
in making its cut-offs, is ploughing its
way through the virgin soil, there float upon the top
of this destroying tide thousands of trees, that
covered
the land, and lined its carving banks. These
gigantic wrecks of the primitive forests are tossed
15*
about by the invisible power of the current, as if
they were straws; and they find no rest, until with
associated thousands they are thrown upon some
projecting point of land, where they lie rotting for
miles, their dark forms frequently shooting into the
air like writhing serpents, presenting one of the
most desolate pictures the mind can conceive.
These masses of timber are called rafts. Other
trees become attached to the bottom of the river,
and yet by some elasticity of the roots they are
loose enough to be affected by the strange and
powerful current, which will bear them down under
the surface; and the tree, by its own strength, will
come gracefully up again, to be again engulfed;
and thus they wave upward and downward with a
gracefulness of motion which would not disgrace a
beau of the old school. Boats frequently pass over
these sawyers, as they go down stream, pressing
them under by their weight; but let some
unfortunate
child of the genius of Robert Fulton, as it passes
up stream, be saluted by the visage of one of these
polite gentry, as it rises ten or more feet in the air,
and nothing short of irreparable damage, or swift
destruction ensues, while the cause of all this disaster,
after the concussion, will rise above the ruin as if
nothing had happened, shake the dripping water
from its forked limbs, and sink again, as if rejoicing
in its strength. Other trees will fasten themselves
firmly in the bottom of the river; and their long
trunks, shorn of their limbs, present the most
formidable
objects to navigation. A rock itself,
sharpened
and set by art, could be no more dangerous
than these dread snags. Let the bows of the
strongest vessel come in contact with them, and the
concussion will drive through its timbers as if they
were paper; and the noble craft will sometimes
tremble for a moment like a thing of life, when
suddenly
struck to its vitals, and then sink into its
grave.
Such are the cut-offs, rafts, sawyers,
and snags of the Mississippi; terms significant to
the minds of the western boatman and hunter, of
qualities which they apply to themselves and their
heroes, whenever they wish to express themselves
strongly, and we presume the beau ideal of a
political
character with them, would be one who would
come at the truth by a cut-off, separate and pile
up falsehood for decay, like the trees of a raft,
and do all this with the politeness of a sawyer,
and with principles unyielding as a snag.
The vast extent of the Mississippi is almost
beyond
belief. The stream which may bear you
gently along in midwinter so far south that the
sun is oppressive, finds its beginnings in a country
of eternal snows. Follow it in your imagination
thousands of miles, as you pass on from its head
waters to its mouth, and you find it flowing through
almost every climate under heaven: nay more, the
comparatively small stream on which you look,
receives
within itself the waters of four rivers alone;
Arkansas, Red, Ohio, and Missouri; whose united
lengths, without including their tributaries, is over
eight thousand miles: yet this mighty flood is
swallowed up by the Mississippi, as if it possessed
within itself the very capacity of the ocean, and
disdained
in its narrow limits to acknowledge the
accession
of strength.
The colour of this tremendous flood of water is
always turbid. There seems no rest for it that will
enable it to become quiet or clear. In all seasons,
the same muddy water meets the eye; and this
strange peculiarity, associated with the character
and form of the banks, strikes the mind at once as
the dark sediment which has for centuries settled
upon the river's edge, and thus formed the ridges
through which it runs; or in other words, it has
confined
itself:
and in this we behold one of its most
original features. On the Mississippi we have no
land sloping down in gentle declivities, to the
water's edge; but a bank just high enough, where
it is washed by the river, to protect the back country
from inundation, in the ordinary rises of the stream;
for whenever, from an extensive flood, it rises above
the top of this feeble barrier, the water runs down
into the country. This singular fact shows how all
the land on the Mississippi, south of the thirty-fourth
degree of latitude, is liable to inundation, since
nearly all the inhabitants on the shores of the river
find its level, in ordinarily high water, running above
the land on which they reside. To prevent this
easy and apparently natural inundation, there seems
to be a power constantly exerted to hold the flood
in check, and bid it go so far and no farther;
and but for this interposition of divine power, here
so signally displayed, the fair fields of the south
would become sandbars upon the shores of the
Atlantic, and the country which might now support
the world, would only bear the angry ocean wave.
Suppose, for an instant, that a universal spring
should beam upon our favoured continent, and that
the thousands of streams which are tributary to the
Mississippi were to become at once unloosed: the
mighty flood in its rushing course would destroy
the heart of the north-western continent. But mark
the goodness and wisdom of Providence. Early in
the spring, the waters of the Ohio rise with its
tributaries, and the Mississippi bears them off,
without
injuriously overflowing its banks. When
summer
sets in, its own head-waters about the lakes,
and the swift Missouri, with its melting ice from
the Rocky Mountains, come down, and thus each,
in order, makes the Mississippi its outlet to the Gulf
of Mexico. But were all these streams permitted
to come together in their strength, what, again we
ask, would save the Eden gardens of the south?
In contemplations like these, carried out to their
fullest extent, we may arrive at the character of this
mighty river.
It is in the thoughts it suggests
, and
not in the breadth or length, visible at any given
point to the eye. Depending on the senses alone,
we should never think of being astonished, or even
feeling the least degree of admiration. You may
float upon its bosom, and be lost amid its world of
waters, and yet you will
see
nothing of its vastness;
for the river has no striking beauty: its waves run
scarce as high as a child can reach: upon its banks
we find no towering precipices, no cloud-capped
mountains. All, all is dullI might say tame. But
let us float day after day upon its apparently sluggish
surface, and, by contemplation and comparison, once
begin to comprehend its magnitude, and the mind is
overwhelmed with fearful admiration. There seems
to rise up from its muddy waters a spirit, robed in
mystery, that points back for its beginning to the
deluge, and whispers audibly: I roll on, and on,
and on,
altering
, but
not altered
, while time exists!
Here, too, we behold a power terrible in its
loneliness
;
for on the Mississippi a sameness meets your
eye everywhere, without a single change of scene.
A river incomprehensible, illimitable, and
mysterious
,
flows ever onward, tossing to and fro under its
depths, in its own channel, as if fretting in its
ordered limits; swallowing its banks here, and
disgorging
them elsewhere so suddenly, that the
attentive
pilot, as he repeats his frequent route, feels that
he knows not where he is, and often hesitates
fearfully
along in the mighty flood by the certain lead;
and again and again is he startled by the ominous
cry, Less fathom deep! wher but yesterday the
lead would have in vain gone down for soundings.
Such is the great Aorta of the continent of North
America; alone and unequalled in its majesty;
proclaiming in its course the wisdom and power of
God
, who only can measure its depths, and turn
them about as a very little thing.
THE AMERICAN WILD-CAT.
In
the southern portions of the United States, but
especially in Louisiana, the wild-cat is found in
abundance. The dense swamps that border on the
Mississippi protect this vicious species of game from
extermination, and foster their increase; and, although
every year vast numbers are killed, they remain
seemingly as plentiful as they ever were in the
memory of the oldest inhabitant. The wild-cat
seeks the most solitary retreats in which to rear its
young, where in some natural hole in the ground, or
some hollow tree, it finds protection for itself and its
kittens from the destructive hand of man. At night,
or at early morn, it comes abroad, stealing over the
dried leaves, in search of prey, as quietly as a zephyr,
or ascending the forest tree with almost the ease of a
bird. The nest on the tree and the burrow in the
ground are alike invaded; while the poultry-yard
of the farmer, and his sheepfold, are drawn on
liberally
to supply the cat with food. It hunts down the
rabbit, coon, and possum, and springs from the
elevated
bough upon the bird perched beneath,
catching
it in its mouthand will do this, while
descending
like an arrow in speed, and with the softness of
a feather to the ground. Nothing can exceed its
beauty of motion when in pursuit of game, or
sporting
in play. No leap seems too formidable; no
attitude
is ungraceful. It runs, flies, leaps, skips, and
is at ease in an instant of time; every hair of its body
seems redolent with life.
Its disposition is untamable; it seems insensible
to kindness; a mere mass of ill-nature, having no
sympathies with any, not even of its own kind. It
is for this reason, no doubt, that it is so recklessly
pursued; its paw being, like the Ishmaelite's, against
every man; and it most indubitably follows, that
every man's dogs, sticks, and guns are against it.
The hounds themselves, that hunt equally well the
cat and the fox, pursue the former with a clamorous
joy, and kill it with a zest that they do not display
when finishing off a fine run after Reynard. In fact,
as an animal of sport, the cat in many respects is
preferable
to the fox; its trail is always warmer, and it
shows more sagacity in eluding its enemies.
In Louisiana the sportsman starts out in the
morning
,
professedly for a fox-chase, and it turns out
cat, and often both cat and fox are killed, after
a short but hard morning's work. The chase is
varied, and is frequently full of amusing incident, for
the cat, as might be expected, will take to the trees,
to avoid pursuit, and this habit of the animal allows
the sportsman to meet it on quite familiar terms. If
the tree is a tall one, the excitable creature manages
to have its face obscured by the distance; but if it
takes to a dead limbless trunk, where the height will
permit its head to be fairly seen as it looks down
upon the pack that are yelling at its feet, with such
open mouths, that they
Fetch shrill echoes from the hollow earth,
you will see a rare exhibition of rage and fury; eyes
that seem like living balls of fire, poisonous claws,
that clutch the insensible wood with deep
indentations
;
the foam trembles on its jaws; hair standing
up like porcupine quills; ears pressed down to the
head, forming as perfect a picture of vicious,
ungovernable
destructiveness as can be imagined. A
charge of mustard-seed shot, or a poke with a stick
when at bay, will cause it to desert its airy abode,
and it no sooner touches the ground than it breaks
off at a killing pace, the pack like mad fiends on its
trail.
Besides treeing, the cat will take advantage of
some hole in the ground, and disappear, when it meets
with these hiding-places, as suddenly as ghosts at
cock-crowing. The hounds come up to the
hiding-place
,
and a fight ensues. The first head intruded
into the cat's hole is sure to meet with a warm
reception
.
Claws and teeth do their work. Still the
staunch hound heeds it not, and either he gets a hold
himself, or acts as a bait to draw the cat from its
burrow; thus fastened, the dog, being the most
powerful
in strength, backs out, dragging his enemy
along with him; and no sooner is the cat's head seen
by the rest of the pack, than they pounce upon him,
and in a few moments the nine lives of the
varmint
are literally
chawed-up
.
At one of these burrowings, a huge cat intruded
into a hole so small that an ordinarily large hound
could not follow. A little stunted but excellent dog,
rejoicing in the name of Ringwood, from his
diminutiveness
succeeded in forcing his way into the hole
16
after the cat; in an instant a faint scream was heard,
and the little fellow showed symptoms of having
caught a tartar. One of the party present stooped
down, and running his arm under the dog's body,
pressed it forward, until he could feel that the cat
had the dog firmly clawed by each shoulder, with his
nose in the cat's mouth; in this situation, by
pressing
the dog firmly under the chest, the two were
drawn from the hole. The cat hung on until he
discovered
that his victim was surrounded by numerous
friends, when he let go his cruel hold, the more
vigorously to defend himself. Ringwood, though
covered with jetting blood, jumped upon the cat and
shook away as if unharmed in the contest.
Sportsmen, in hunting the cat, provide themselves
generally with pistolsnot for the purpose of killing
the cat, but to annoy it, so that it will desert from the
tree, when it has taken to one. Sometimes these
infantile
shooting-irons are left at home, and the cat
gets safely out of the reach of sticks, or whatever
other missile may be convenient. This is a most
provoking
affair; dogs and sportsmen loose all patience,
and as no expedient suggests itself, the cat escapes
for the time. I once knew of a cat thus perched out
of reach, that was brought to terms in a very singular
manner. The tree on which the animal was lodged
being a very high one, secure from all interruption,
it looked down upon its pursuers with the most
provoking
complacency; every effort to dislodge it had
failed, and the hunt was about to be abandoned in
despair, when one of the sportsmen discovered a
grape-vine that passed directly over the cat's body,
and by running his eyes along its circumvolutions,
traced it down to the ground; a judicious jerk at the
vine touched the cat on the rump; this was most
unexpected, and it instantly leaped to the ground from
a height of over forty feet, striking on its forepaws,
throwing a sort of rough somerset, and then starting
ing off as sound in limb and wind as if he had leaped
off a huckleberry bush.
The hunter of the wild turkey, while calling,
in imitation of the hen, to allure the gobler within
reach of his rifle, will sometimes be annoyed by the
appearance of the wild-cat stealing up to the place
from whence the sounds proceed. The greatest
caution
on such occasions is visible; the cat advancing
by the slowest possible movements, stealing along
like a serpent. The hunter knows that the intruder
has spoiled his turkey sport for the morning, and his
only revenge is to wait patiently and give the cat the
contents of his gun, then minus all game, he goes
home anathematizing the whole race of cats for thus
interfering with his sport and his dinner.
Of all the peculiarities of the cat, its untamable
and quarrelsome disposition is its most marked
characteristic
.
The western hunter, when he wishes to
cap the climax of braggadocio, with respect to his
own prowess, says, he can whip his weight in wild
cats. This is saying all that can be said, for it
would seem, considering its size, that the cat in a
fight can bite fiercer, scratch harder, and live longer
than any other animal whatever. I am a roaring
earthquake in a fight, sung out one of the half-horse,
half-alligator species of fellows, a real snorter of
the universe. I can strike as hard as fourth proof
lightning, and keep it up, rough and tumble, as long
as a wild-cat. These high encomiums on the
character
of the pugnacity of the cat are beyond question.
A singed cat is an excellent proverb, illustrating
that a person may be smarter than he looks. A
singed
wild-cat
, as such an illustration, would be sublime.
There is no half-way mark, no exception, no
occasional
moment of good nature; starvation and a
surfeit
,
blows and kind words, kicks, cuffs, and fresh
meat, reach not the sympathies of the wild cat. He
has the greediness of a pawnbroker, the ill nature
of a usurer, the meanness of a pettifogging lawyer,
the blind rage of the hog, and the apparent
insensibility
to pain of the turtle: like a woman, the wild-cat
is incomparable with any thing but itself. In
expression
of face, the wild-cat singularly resembles the
rattlesnake
.
The skulls of these two varmints have
the same venomous expression, the same
demonstration
of fangs; and probably no two creatures living
attack each other with more deadly ferocity and hate.
They will stare at each other with eyes filled with
defiance, and burning with fire; one hissing, and the
other snarling, presenting a most terrible picture of
the malevolence of passion. The serpent in his
attitudes
is all gracethe cat all activity. The serpent
moves with the quickness of lightning while making
the attack; the cat defends with motions equally
quick, bounding from side to side, striking with its
pawsboth are often victims, for they seldom
separate
until death-blows have been inflicted on either
side. The Indians, who, in their notions and
traditions
,
are always picturesque and beautiful, imagine
that the rattlesnake, to live, must breathe the
poisonous
air of the swamps, and the exhalations of decayed
animal matter; while the cat has the attribute of
gloating over the meaner displays of evil passions of
a quarrelsome person; for speaking of a quarrelsome
family, they say, the lodge containing them
fattens
the wild-cat
.
16*
TOM OWEN, THE BEE-HUNTER.
As a country becomes cleared up and settled
bee-hunters
disappear, consequently they are seldom or
ever noticed. Among this backwoods fraternity have
flourished men of genius in their way, who have
died unwept and unnoticed, while the heroes of the
turf and of the chase have been lauded to the skies
for every trivial superiority they have displayed in
their respective pursuits. To chronicle the exploits
of sportsmen is commendable; the custom began as
early as the days of the antediluvians, for we read
that Nimrod was a mighty hunter before the Lord.
Familiar, however, as Nimrod's name may be, or
even Davy Crockett's, what does it amount to, when
we reflect that
Tom Owen
, the bee-hunter, is
comparatively
unknown?
Yes, the mighty Tom Owen has hunted from
the time he could stand alone until the present time,
and not a pen has inked paper to record his exploits.
Solitary and alone has he traced his game through
the mazy labyrinth of air, marked, I hunted, I
found, I conquered, upon the carcasses of his
victims
,
and then marched homeward with his spoils,
quietly and satisfiedly sweetening his path through
life, and by its very obscurity adding the principal
element of the sublime.
It was on a beautiful southern October morning,
at the hospitable mansion of a friend, where I was
staying to drown dull care, that I first had the
pleasure
of seeing Tom Owen. He was straggling on
this occasion up the rising ground that led to the
hospitable mansion of mine host, and the difference
between him and ordinary men was visible at a
glance; perhaps it showed itself as much in the
perfect
contempt of fashion he displayed in the
adornment
of his outward man, as it did in the more
elevated
qualities of his mind that were visible in his
face. His head was adorned with an outlandish
pattern of a hathis nether limbs were ensconced in
a pair of inexpressibles, beautifully fringed by the
brier-bushes through which they were often drawn;
coats and vests he considered as superfluities; and
hanging upon his back were a couple of pails, and
an axe in his right hand formed the varieties that
represented the corpus of Tom Owen. As is usual
with great men he had his followers, and with a
courtier-like humility they depended upon the
expression
of his face for all their hopes of success.
The usual salutations of meeting were sufficient to
draw me within the circle of his influence, and I at
once became one of his most ready followers. See
yonder! said Tom, stretching his long arm into
infinite
space, see yonderthere's a bee. We all
looked in the direction he pointed, but that was the
extent of our observation. It was a fine bee,
continued Tom, black body, yellow legs, and into
that tree,pointing to a towering oak, blue in the
distance. In a clear day I can see a bee over a
mile, easy! When did Coleridge talk like that?
And yet Tom Owen uttered such a saying with
perfect
ease.
After a variety of meanderings through the thick
woods, and clambering over fences, we came to our
place of destination as pointed out by Tom, who
selected a mighty tree whose trunk contained the
sweets, the possession of which the poets have
likened to other sweets that leave a sting behind.
The felling of a mighty tree is a sight that calls up
a variety of emotions; and Tom's game was lodged
in one of the finest in the forest. But the axe was
laid at the root of the tree, which, in Tom's mind,
was made expressly for bees to build their nests in,
that he might cut them down, and obtain possession
thereof. The sharp sounds of the axe as it played
in the hands of Tom, and was replied to by a stout
negro from the opposite side, by the rapidity of their
strokes fast gained upon the heart of the lordly
sacrifice
.
There was little poetry in the thought, that
long before this mighty empire of states was formed,
Tom Owen's bee-hive had stretched its brawny
arms to the winter's blast, and grown green in the
summer's sun. Yet such was the case, and how long
I might have moralized I know not, had not the
enraged buzzing about my ears satisfied me that the
occupants of the tree were not going to give up their
home and treasure without showing considerable
practical fight. No sooner had the little insects
satisfied themselves that they were about to be
invaded
,
than they began one after another to descend
from their airy abode and fiercely pitch into our
faces; anon a small company, headed by an old
veteran, would charge with its entire force upon all
parts of our body at once. It need not be said that
the better part of valour was displayed by a
precipitate
retreat from such attacks.
In the midst of this warfare, the tree began to
tremble with the fast-repeated strokes of the axe,
and then might have been seen a bee-hive of stingers
precipitating themselves from above on the
unfortunate
hunter beneath. Now it was that Tom shone
forth in his glory.
His partisans, like many hangers-on about great
men, began to desert him on the first symptoms of
danger; and when the trouble thickened, they, one
and all, took to their heels, and left only our hero
and Sambo to fight their adversaries. Sambo,
however
,
soon dropped his axe, and fell into all kinds
of contortions; first he would seize the back of his
neck with his hands, then his shins, and yell with
pain. Don't holler, nigger, till you get out of the
woods, said the sublime Tom, consolingly; but
writhe he did, until he broke and left Tom alone in
his glory.
Cut-thwack! sounded through the confused hum at
the foot of the tree, marvellously reminding me of
the interruptions that occasionally broke in upon the
otherwise monotonous hours of my school-boy days.
A sharp cracking finally told me the chopping was
done, and looking aloft, I saw the mighty tree
balancing
in the air. Slowly and majestically it bowed
for the first time towards its mother earth, gaining
velocity as it descended, shivering the trees that
interrupted its downward course, and falling with
thundering sound, splintering its mighty limbs and
burying them deeply in the ground.
The sun, for the first time in at least two centuries,
broke uninterruptedly through the chasm made in
the forest, and shone with splendour upon the
magnificent
Tom standing a conqueror among his spoils.
As might be expected, the bees were very much
astonished and confused, and by their united voices
they proclaimed death, had it been in their power,
to all their foes, not, of course, excepting Tom Owen
himself. But the wary hunter was up to the tricks
of this trade, and, like a politician, he knew how
easily an enraged mob could be quelled with smoke;
and smoke he tried until his enemies were
completely
destroyed. We, Tom's hangers-on, now
approached his treasure. It was a rich one, and as
he observed, contained a rich chance of plunder.
Nine feet, by measurement, of the hollow of the tree
was full, and this afforded many pails of pure honey.
Tom was liberal, and supplied us all with more than
we wanted, and toted, by the assistance of
Sambo
,
his share to his own home, soon to be devoured,
and replaced by the destruction of another tree and
another nation of bees.
Thus Tom exhibited within himself an
unconquerable
genius which would have immortalized him,
had he directed it in following the sports of Long
Island or New-Market.
We have seen Colonel Bingaman, the Napoleon of
the southern turf, glorying amid the victories of his
favourite sport,we have heard the great Crockett
detail the soul-stirring adventures of a bear-hunt
we have listened, with almost suffocating interest, to
the tale of a Nantucket seaman, while he portrayed
the death of the mighty whaleand we have also seen
Tom Owen triumphantly engaged in a bee-hunt
we beheld and wondered at the sports of the turf,
the field, and the sea, because the objects acted on
by man were terrible, indeed, when their instincts
were aroused. But in the bee-hunt Tom Owen
and its consummation, the grandeur
visible
was
imparted
by the mighty mind of Tom Owen himself.
THE END.